
NO.1 A company has limited storage available and online presence that cannot for more than four
hours. Which of the following backup methodologies should the company implement to allow for the
FASTEST database restore time In the event of a failure, which being maindful of the limited available
storage space?
(A). Implement fulltape backup every Sunday at 8:00 p.m and perform nightly tape rotations.
(B). Implement different backups every Sunday at 8:00 and nightly incremental backups at 8:00 p.m
(C). Implement nightly full backups every Sunday at 8:00 p.m
(D). Implement full backups every Sunday at 8:00 p.m and nightly differential backups at 8:00
Answer: B

NO.2 Which of the following environments minimizes end-user disruption and is MOST likely to be
used to assess the impacts of any database migrations or major system changes by using the final
version of the code?
(A). Staging
(B). Test
(C). Production
(D). Development
Answer: B

NO.3 A Chief Security Office's (CSO's) key priorities are to improve preparation, response, and
recovery practices to minimize system downtime and enhance organizational resilience to
ransomware attacks. Which of the following would BEST meet the CSO's objectives?
(A). Use email-filtering software and centralized account management, patch high-risk systems, and
restrict administration privileges on fileshares.
(B). Purchase cyber insurance from a reputable provider to reduce expenses during an incident.
(C). Invest in end-user awareness training to change the long-term culture and behavior of staff and
executives, reducing the organization's susceptibility to phishing attacks.
(D). Implement application whitelisting and centralized event-log management, and perform regular
testing and validation of full backups.
Answer: B

NO.4 Interiprsing a secure area requires passing though two doors, both of which require someone
who is already inside to initiate access. Which of the following types of physical security controls does
this describe?
(A). Cameras
B: Faraday cage
(B). Access control vestibule
(C). Sensors
(D). Guards
Answer: B

NO.5 An administrator is configuring a firewall rule set for a subnet to only access DHCP, web pages,
and SFTP, and to specifically block FTP. Which of the following would BEST accomplish this goal?
(A). Option A
(B). Option B
(C). Option C
(D). Option D
Answer: A

NO.6 Which of the following environments utilizes dummy data and is MOST likely to be installed
locally on a system that allows code to be assessed directly and modified easily with each build?
(A). Production
(B). Test
(C). Staging
(D). Development
Answer: B

NO.7 Which of the following employee roles is responsible for protecting an organization's collected
personal information?
(A). CTO
(B). DPO
(C). CEO
(D). DBA
Answer: B

NO.8 A security team suspects that the cause of recent power consumption overloads is the
unauthorized use of empty power outlets in the network rack Which of the following options will
mitigate this issue without compromising the number of outlets available?
(A). Adding a new UPS dedicated to the rack
(B). Installing a managed PDU
(C). Using only a dual power supplies unit
(D). Increasing power generator capacity
Answer: B

A managed Power Distribution Unit (PDU) allows you to monitor and control power outlets on the
rack. This will allow the security team to identify which devices are drawing power and from which
outlets, which can help to identify any unauthorized devices. Moreover, with a managed PDU, you
can also control the power to outlets, turn off outlets that are not in use, and set up alerts if an outlet
is overloaded. This will help to mitigate the issue of power consumption overloads without
compromising the number of outlets available.
NO.9 Which of the following is MOST likely to outline the roles and responsibilities of data
controllers and data processors?
(A). SSAE SOC 2
(B). PCI DSS
(C). GDPR
(D). ISO 31000
Answer: C

NO.10 A penetration tester is fuzzing an application to identify where the EIP of the stack is located
on memory. Which of the following attacks is the penetration tester planning to execute?
(A). Race-condition
(B). Pass-the-hash
(C). Buffer overflow
(D). XSS
Answer: C

NO.11 A SOC is implementing an insider-threat-detection program. The primary concern is that
users may be accessing confidential data without authorization. Which of the following should be
deployed to detect a potential insider threat?
(A). honeyfile
(B). ADMZ
(C). DLP
(D). File integrity monitoring
Answer: A

NO.12 A remote user recently took a two-week vacation abroad and brought along a corporateowned laptop. Upon returning to work, the user has been unable to connect the laptop to the VPN.
Which of the following is the MOST likely reason for the user's inability to connect the laptop to the
VPN?
(A). Due to foreign travel, the user's laptop was isolated from the network.
(B). The user's laptop was quarantined because it missed the latest path update.
(C). The VPN client was blacklisted.
(D). The user's account was put on a legal hold
Answer: A

NO.13 A company acquired several other small companies The company thai acquired the others is
transitioning network services to the cloud The company wants to make sure that performance and
security remain intact Which of the following BEST meets both requirements?
(A). High availability
(B). Application security
(C). Segmentation
(D). Integration and auditing
Answer: A

High availability refers to the ability of a system or service to remain operational and available to
users with minimal downtime. By ensuring high availability, the company can maintain good
performance and ensure that users have access to the network services they need. High availability
can also improve security, as it helps to prevent disruptions that could potentially be caused by
security incidents or other issues.
NO.14 Which of the following describes the BEST approach for deploying application patches?
(A). Apply the patches to systems in a testing environment then to systems in a staging environment,
and finally to production systems.
(B). Test the patches in a staging environment, develop against them in the development
environment, and then apply them to the production systems
(C). Test the patches m a test environment apply them to the production systems and then apply
them to a staging environment
(D). Apply the patches to the production systems apply them in a staging environment, and then test
all of them in a testing environment
Answer: A

https://oroinc.com/b2b-ecommerce/blog/testing-and-staging-environments-in-ecommerceimplementation/
NO.15 A security administrator wants to implement a program that tests a user's ability to recognize
attacks over the organization's email system Which of the following would be BEST suited for this
task?
(A). Social media analysis
(B). Annual information security training
(C). Gamification
(D). Phishing campaign
Answer: C

NO.16 A Chief Information Security Officer has defined resiliency requirements for a new data
center architecture The requirements are as follows
* Critical fileshares will remain accessible during and after a natural disaster
* Frve percent of hard disks can fail at any given time without impacting the data.
* Systems will be forced to shut down gracefully when battery levels are below 20% Which of the
following are required to BEST meet these objectives? (Select THREE)
(A). Fiber switching
(B). laC
(C). NAS
(D). RAID
(E). UPS
(F). Redundant power supplies
(G). Geographic dispersal
(H). Snapshots
(I). Load balancing
Answer: D,E,G

NO.17 A network engineer has been asked to investigate why several wireless barcode scanners and
wireless computers in a warehouse have intermittent connectivity to the shipping server. The
barcode scanners and computers are all on forklift trucks and move around the warehouse during
their regular use. Which of the following should the engineer do to determine the issue? (Choose
two.)
(A). Perform a site survey
(B). Deploy an FTK Imager
(C). Create a heat map
(D). Scan for rogue access points
(E). Upgrade the security protocols
Answer: A,C

NO.18 An attacker has determined the best way to impact operations is to infiltrate third-party
software vendors. Which of the following vectors is being exploited?
(A). Social media
(B). Cloud
(C). Supply chain
(D). Social engineering
Answer: D

NO.19 The Chief Information Security Officer directed a nsk reduction in shadow IT and created a
policy requiring all unsanctioned high-risk SaaS applications to be blocked from user access Which of
the following is the BEST security solution to reduce this risk?
(A). CASB
(B). VPN concentrator
(C). MFA
(D). VPC endpoint
Answer: A

NO.20 A company recently expenenced an attack dunng which #5 main website was directed to the
atacker's web server, allowing the attacker to harvest credentials from unsuspecting customers.
Vhich of the following snould the company Implement to prevent this type of attack from accurting in
the future?
Answer: B

NO.21 An application owner has requested access for an external application to upload data from
the central internal website without providing credentials at any point. Which of the following
authentication methods should be configured to allow this type of integration access?
(A). OAuth
(B). SSO
(C). TACACS+
(D). Kerberos
Answer: B

NO.22 Which of the following is a targeted attack aimed at compromising users within a specific
industry or group?
(A). Watering hole
(B). Typosquatting
(C). Hoax
(D). Impersonation
Answer: A

A targeted attack refers to a type of threat in which threat actors actively pursue and compromise a
target entity's infrastructure while maintaining anonymity. These attackers have a certain level of
expertise and have sufficient resources to conduct their schemes over a long-term period. They can
adapt, adjust, or improve their attacks to counter their victim's defenses. Background Targeted
attacks often employ similar methods found in traditional online threats such as malicious emails,
compromised or malicious sites, exploits, and malware. Targeted attacks differ from traditional
online threats in many ways: * Targeted attacks are typically conducted as campaigns. APTs are often
conducted in campaigns-a series of failed and successful attempts over time to get deeper and
deeper into a target's network-and are thus not isolated incidents. * They usually target specific
industries such as businesses, government agencies, or political groups. Attackers often have longterm goals in mind, with motives that include, but are not limited to, political gain, monetary profit,
or business data theft. Attackers often customize, modify and improve their methods depending on
the nature of their target sector and to circumvent any security measures implemented. Phases of a
Targeted Attack * Intelligence gathering. Threat actors identify and gather publicly available
information about their target to customize their attacks. This initial phase aims to gain strategic
information not only on the intended target's IT environment but also on its organizational structure.
The information gathered can range from the business applications and software an enterprise
utilizes to the roles and relationships that exist within it. This phase also utilizes social engineering
techniques that leverage recent events, work-related issues or concerns, and other areas of interest
for the intended target. * Point of entry. Threat actors may use varied methods to infiltrate a target's
infrastructure. Common methods include customized spearphishing email, zero-day or software
exploits, and watering hole techniques. Attackers also utilize instant-messaging and social networking
platforms to entice targets to click a link or download malware. Eventually, establishing a connection
with the target is acquired. * Command-and-control (C&C) communication. After security has been
breached, threat actors constantly communicate to the malware to either execute malicious routines
or gather information within the company network. Threat actors use techniques to hide this
communication and keep their movements under the radar. * Lateral movement. Once inside the
network, threat actors move laterally throughout the network to seek key information or infect other
valuable systems. * Asset/Data Discovery. Notable assets or data are determined and isolated for
future data exfiltration. Threat actors have access to "territories" that contain valuable information
and noteworthy assets. These data are then identified and transferred through tools like remote
access Trojans (RATs) and customized and legitimate tools. A possible technique used in this stage
may be sending back file lists in different directories so attackers can identify what are valuable. *
Data Exfiltration. This is the main goal of targeted attacks. An attack's objective is to gather key
information and transfer this to a location that the attackers control. Transferring such data can be
conducted quickly or gradually. Targeted attacks strive to remain undetected in the network in order
to gain access to the company's crown jewels or valuable data. These valuable data include
intellectual property, trade secrets, and customer information. In addition, threat actors may also
seek other sensitive data such as top-secret documents from government or military institutions.
Once a targeted attack is successful and has reached as far as the data exfiltration stage, it is not
difficult for attackers to draw out the data. Although targeted attacks are not known to specifically
target consumers, their data are also at risk once target business sectors have been infiltrated. As a
result, such attacks (if successful) may damage a company's reputation.
https://www.trendmicro.com/vinfo/us/security/definition/targetedattacks#:~:text=A%20targeted%20attack%20refers%20to,over%20a%20long%2Dterm%20period.
NO.23 A help desk technician receives a phone call from someone claiming to be a part of the
organization's cybersecurity modem response team The caller asks the technician to verify the
network's internal firewall IP address Which of the following 15 the technician's BEST course of
action?
(A). Direct the caller to stop by the help desk in person and hang up declining any further requests
from the caller
(B). Ask for the callers name, verify the persons identity in the email directory and provide the
requested information over the phone
(C). Write down the phone number of the carter if possible, the name of the person requesting the
information hang up. and notify the organization's cybersecurity officer
(D). Request the caller send an email for identity verification and provide the requested information
via email to the caller
Answer: D

NO.24 An organization routes all of its traffic through a VPN Most users are remote and connect into
a corporate datacenter that houses confidential information There is a firewall at the Internet border
followed by a DIP appliance, the VPN server and the datacenter itself. Which of the following is the
WEAKEST design element?
(A). The DLP appliance should be integrated into a NGFW.
(B). Split-tunnel connections can negatively impact the DLP appliance's performance
(C). Encrypted VPN traffic will not be inspected when entering or leaving the network
(D). Adding two hops in the VPN tunnel may slow down remote connections
Answer: C

NO.25 A systems administrators considering diferent backup solitons forthe IT rkashuchre The
company 5 looky fre sokton tha ofes the fastest recovery ime whie aso saving the most amount of
storage used to maintain the backups Which of the following recovery solubons would be the BEST
option to meet these requirements?
(A). Snapshot
(B). Differentiated
(C). Full
(D). Tape
Answer: B

NO.26 Which of the following incident response steps involves actions to protect critical systems
while maintaining business operations?
(A). Investigation
(B). Containment
(C). Recovery
(D). Lessons learned
Answer: B

NO.27 A company uses specially configured workstations for any work that requires administrator
privileges to its Tier 0 and Tier 1 systems. The company follows a strict process to harden systems
immediately upon delivery. Even with these strict security measures in place, an incident occurred
from one of the workstations. The root cause appears to be that the SoC was tampered with or
replaced. Which of the following MOST likely occurred?
(A). Fileless malware
(B). A downgrade attack
(C). A supply-chain attack
(D). A logic bomb
(E). Misconfigured BIOS
Answer: C

NO.28 A company would like to set up a secure way to transfer data between users via their mobile
phones The company's top pnonty is utilizing technology that requires users to be in as close
proximity as possible to each other. Which of the following connection methods would BEST fulfill
this need?
(A). Cellular
(B). NFC
(C). Wi-Fi
(D). Bluetooth
Answer: B

NFC allows two devices to communicate with each other when they are in close proximity to each
other, typically within 5 centimetres. This makes it the most secure connection method for the
company's data transfer requirements.
NO.29 A major clothing company recently lost of large of priority information. The security officer
must find a solution to ensure this never happens again. Which of the following is the BEST technician
implementation to present this from happeing again?
(A). Configure DLP solution
(B). Disable peer-topeer sharing
(C). Enable role-based access controls.
(D). Mandsha job rotation.
(E). Implement content filters
Answer: A

NO.30 An engineer is configuring AAA authentication on a Cisco MDS 9000 Series Switch. The LDAP
server is located under the IP 10.10.2.2. The data sent to the LDAP server should be encrypted. Which
command should be used to meet these requirements?
Answer: D

NO.31 An analyst has determined that a server was not patched and an external actor exfiltrated
data on port 139. Which of the following sources should the analyst review to BEST ascertain how the
incident could have been prevented?
(A). The vulnerability scan output
(B). The security logs
(C). The baseline report
(D). The correlation of events
Answer: A

NO.32 An analyst receives multiple alerts for beaconing activity for a host on the network, After
analyzing the activity, the analyst observes the following activity:
* A user enters comptia.org into a web browser.
* The website that appears is not the comptia.org site.
* The website is a malicious site from the attacker.
* Users in a different office are not having this issue.
Which of the following types of attacks was observed?
(A). On-path attack
(B). DNS poisoning
(C). Locator (URL) redirection
(D). Domain hijacking
Answer: C

NO.33 A network administrator al a large organization | reviewing methods lo improve the securty
of the wired LAN, Any seourty improvement must be centrally managed and alow corporate-owned
devices lo have access to the intranet bul limit others to Internet access only. Which of the following
should the adeninistrator recommend?
(A). 802.1X ullizing the current PKI ifrastructure
(B). $50 to authenticate comorate users
(C). MAC address filtering with ACLs on the router
(D). PAM for user account management
Answer: A

NO.34 A security analyst is receiving numerous alerts reporting that the response time of an
internet-facing application has been degraded However, the internal network performance was not
degraded. Which of the following MOST likely explains this behavior?
(A). DNS poisoning
(B). MAC flooding
(C). DDoS attack
(D). ARP poisoning
Answer: C

NO.35 A security analyst is preparing a threat for an upcoming internal penetration test. The analyst
needs to identify a method for determining the tactics, techniques, and procedures of a threat
against the organization's network.
Which of the following will the analyst MOST likely use to accomplish the objective?
(A). A table exercise
(B). NST CSF
(C). MTRE ATT$CK
(D). OWASP
Answer: A

NO.36 The technology department at a large global company is expanding its Wi-Fi network
infrastructure at the headquarters building Which of the following should be closely coordinated
between the technology, cybersecurity, and physical security departments?
(A). Authentication protocol
(B). Encryption type
(C). WAP placement
(D). VPN configuration
Answer: A

NO.37 An organization wants to enable built-in FDE on all laptops Which of the following should the
organization ensure is Installed on all laptops?
(A). TPM
(B). CA
(C). SAML
(D). CRL
Answer: A

The organization should ensure that a Trusted Platform Module (TPM) is installed on all laptops in
order to enable built-in Full Disk Encryption (FDE). TPM is a hardware-based security chip that stores
encryption keys and helps to protect data from malicious attacks. It is important to ensure that the
TPM is properly configured and enabled in order to get the most out of FDE.
NO.38 A forensics examiner is attempting to dump password cached in the physical memory of a live
system but keeps receiving an error message. Which of the following BEST describes the cause of the
error?
(A). The examiner does not have administrative privileges to the system
(B). The system must be taken offline before a snapshot can be created
(C). Checksum mismatches are invalidating the disk image
(D). The swap file needs to be unlocked before it can be accessed
Answer: A

NO.39 A network engineer needs to build a solution that will allow guests at the company's
headquarters to access the Internet via WiFi. This solution should not allow access to the internal
corporate network, but it should require guests to sign off on the acceptable use policy before
accessing the Internet. Which of the following should the engineer employ to meet these
requirements?
(A). Implement open PSK on the APs
(B). Deploy a WAF
(C). Configure WIPS on the APs
(D). Install a captive portal
Answer: D

NO.40 A security analyst is reviewing web-application logs and finds the following log:
Which of the following attacks is being observed?
(A). Directory traversal
(B). XSS
(C). CSRF
(D). On-path attack
Answer: A

NO.41 Which of the following BEST describes the MFA attribute that requires a callback on a
predefined landline?
(A). Something you exhibit
(B). Something you can do
(C). Someone you know
(D). Somewhere you are
Answer: D

NO.42 Which of the following provides the BEST protection for sensitive information and data stored
in cloud-based services but still allows for full functionality and searchability of data within the cloudbased services?
(A). Data encryption
(B). Data masking
(C). Anonymization
(D). Tokenization
Answer: A

NO.43 Which of the following describes the continuous delivery software development
methodology?
(A). Waterfall
(B). Spiral
(C). V-shaped
(D). Agile
Answer: D

NO.44 A security engineer needs to select a primary authentication source for use with a client
application. The application requires the user to log in with a username, password, and, when
needed, a challenge response. Which of the follwing solutions BEST meets this requirement?
(A). PSK
(B). LDAP
(C). RADIUS
(D). PAP
Answer: B

NO.45 Which of the following policies would help an organization identify and mitigate potential
single points of failure in the company's IT/security operations?
(A). Least privilege
(B). Awareness training
(C). Separation of duties
(D). Mandatory vacation
Answer: C

NO.46 A research company discovered that an unauthorized piece of software has been detected on
a small number of machines in its lab. The researchers collaborate with other machines using port
445 and on the Internet using port 443. The unauthorized software is starting to be seen on
additional machines outside of the lab and is making outbound communications using HTTPS and
SMB. The security team has been instructed to resolve the problem as quickly as possible causing
minimal disruption to the researchers. Which of the following contains the BEST course of action in
this scenario?
(A). Update the host firewalls to block outbound SMB.
(B). Place the machines with the unapproved software in containment.
(C). Place the unauthorized application in a blocklist.
(D). Implement a content filter to block the unauthorized software communication.
Answer: B

NO.47 A user attempts to load a web-based application, but the expected login screen does not
appear A help desk analyst troubleshoots the issue by running the following command and reviewing
the output on the user's PC
The help desk analyst then runs the same command on the local PC
Which of the following BEST describes the attack that is being detected?
(A). Domain hijacking
(B). DNS poisoning
(C). MAC flooding
(D). Evil twin
Answer: B

NO.48 A company is setting up a web server on the Internet that will utilize both encrypted and
unencrypted web-browsing protocols. A security engineer runs a port scan against the server from
the Internet and sees the following output:
Which of the following steps would be best for the security engineer to take NEXT?
(A). Allow DNS access from the internet.
(B). Block SMTP access from the Internet
(C). Block HTTPS access from the Internet
(D). Block SSH access from the Internet.
Answer: D

NO.49 A security analyst is investigating suspicious traffic on the web server located at IP address
10.10.1.1. A search of the WAF logs reveals the following output:
Which of the following is MOST likely occurring?
(A). XSS attack
(B). SQLi attack
(C). Replay attack
(D). XSRF attack
Answer: B

NO.50 A new company wants to avoid channel interference when building a WLAN. The company
needs to know the radio frequency behavior, identify dead zones, and determine the best place for
access points. Which of the following should be done FIRST?
(A). Configure heat maps.
(B). Utilize captive portals.
(C). Conduct a site survey.
(D). Install Wi-Fi analyzers.
Answer: A

NO.51 Joe, a user at a company, clicked an email link led to a website that infected his workstation.
Joe, was connected to the network, and the virus spread to the network shares. The protective
measures failed to stop this virus, and It has continues to evade detection. Which of the following
should administrator implement to protect the environment from this malware?
(A). Install a definition-based antivirus.
(B). Implement an IDS/IPS
(C). Implement a heuristic behavior-detection solution.
(D). Implement CASB to protect the network shares.
Answer: C

Heuristic analysis is also one of the few methods capable of combating polymorphic viruses - the term
for malicious code that constantly changes and adapts. Heuristic analysis is incorporated into
advanced security solutions offered by companies like Kaspersky Labs to detect new threats before
they cause harm, without the need for a specific signature. https://usa.kaspersky.com/resourcecenter/definitions/heuristic-analysis
NO.52 An organization needs to implement more stringent controls over administrator/root
credentials and service accounts. Requirements for the project include:
Check-in/checkout of credentials
The ability to use but not know the password
Automated password changes
Logging of access to credentials
Which of the following solutions would meet the requirements?
(A). OAuth 2.0
(B). Secure Enclave
(C). A privileged access management system
(D). An OpenID Connect authentication system
Answer: D

NO.53 An organization has expanded its operations by opening a remote office. The new office is
fully furnished with office resources to support up to 50 employees working on any given day. Which
of the following VPN solutions would BEST support the new office?
(A). Always On
(B). Remote access
(C). Site-to-site
(D). Full tunnel
Answer: C

NO.54 A company recently experienced an inside attack using a corporate machine that resulted in
data compromise. Analysis indicated an unauthorized change to the software circumvented
technological protection measures, The analyst was tasked with determining the best method to
ensure the integrity of the systems remains intact and local and remote boot attestation can take
place. Which of the following would provide the BEST solution?
(A). HIPS
(B). Flm
(C). TPM
(D). DLP
Answer: C

https://docs.microsoft.com/en-us/azure/security/fundamentals/measured-boot-host-attestation
NO.55 In which of the following risk management strategies would cybersecurity insurance be used?
(A). Transference
(B). Avoidance
(C). Acceptance
(D). Mitigation
Answer: A

NO.56 A Chief Information Security Officer wants to ensure the organization is validating and
checking the Integrity of zone transfers. Which of the following solutions should be implemented?
(A). DNSSEC
(B). LOAPS
(C). NGFW
(D). DLP
Answer: D

NO.57 A security analyst is reviewing the following attack log output:
Which of the following types of attacks does this MOST likely represent?
(A). Rainbow table
(B). Brute-force
(C). Password-spraying
(D). Dictionary
Answer: C

Password spraying is a type of brute-force attack in which a malicious actor uses a single password
against targeted user accounts before moving on to attempt a second password, and so on. This
technique allows the actor to remain undetected by avoiding rapid or frequent account lockouts.
https://us-cert.cisa.gov/ncas/current-activity/2019/08/08/acsc-releases-advisory-password-sprayingattacks#:~:text=Password%20spraying%20is%20a%20type,rapid%20or%20frequent%20account%20l
ockouts.
NO.58 A security analyst receives the configuration of a current VPN profile and notices the
authentication is only applied to the IP datagram portion of the packet. Which of the following should
the analyst implement to authenticate the entire packet?
(A). AH
(B). ESP
(C). SRTP
(D). LDAP
Answer: B

NO.59 Which of the following controls would provide the BEST protection against tailgating?
(A). Access control vestibule
(B). Closed-circuit television
(C). Proximity card reader
(D). Faraday cage
Answer: A

NO.60 An enterprise has hired an outside security firm lo conduct a penetration test on its network
and applications, The enterprise provided the firm with access to a guest account. Which af the
following BEST represents the type of testing that is being used?
(A). Black-box
(B). Red-team
(C). Gray-box
(D). Bug bounty
(E). White-box
Answer: C

NO.61 After a phishing scam for 9 user's credentals, the red team was able to craft a payload to
deploy on @ server. The attack allowed the installaton of malicious software that intiates @ new
remote session.
Which of the following types of attacks has occurred?
(A). Privilege escalation
(B). Session replay
(C). Application programming interface
(D). Directory traversal
Answer: A

NO.62 Which of the following are the MOST likely vectors for the unauthorized inclusion of
vulnerable code in a software company's final software releases? (Select TWO.)
(A). Unsecure protocols
(B). Use of penetration-testing utilities
(C). Weak passwords
(D). Included third-party libraries
(E). Vendors/supply chain
(F). Outdated anti-malware software
Answer: A,C

NO.63 Which of the following refers to applications and systems that are used within an
organization without consent or approval?
(A). Shadow IT
(B). OSINT
(C). Dark web
(D). Insider threats
Answer: A

NO.64 A company recently moved sensitive videos between on-premises. Company-owned
websites. The company then learned the videos had been uploaded and shared to the internet.
Which of the following would MOST likely allow the company to find the cause?
(A). Checksums
(B). Watermarks
(C). Oder of volatility
(D). A log analysis
(E). A right-to-audit clause
Answer: D

https://www.sumologic.com/glossary/log-analysis/
"While companies can operate private clouds, forensics in a public cloud are complicated by the right
to audit permitted to you by your service level agreement (SLA) with the cloud provider."
NO.65 Which of the following corporate policies is used to help prevent employee fraud and to
detect system log modifications or other malicious activity based on tenure?
(A). Background checks
(B). Mandatory vacation
(C). Social media analysis
(D). Separation of duties
Answer: B

NO.66 A company's bank has reported that multiple corporate credit cards have been stolen over
the past several weeks. The bank has provided the names of the affected cardholders to the
company's forensics team to assist in the cyber-incident investigation.
An incident responder learns the following information:
The timeline of stolen card numbers corresponds closely with affected users making Internet-based
purchases from diverse websites via enterprise desktop PCs.
All purchase connections were encrypted, and the company uses an SSL inspection proxy for the
inspection of encrypted traffic of the hardwired network.
Purchases made with corporate cards over the corporate guest WiFi network, where no SSL
inspection occurs, were unaffected.
Which of the following is the MOST likely root cause?
(A). HTTPS sessions are being downgraded to insecure cipher suites
(B). The SSL inspection proxy is feeding events to a compromised SIEM
(C). The payment providers are insecurely processing credit card charges
(D). The adversary has not yet established a presence on the guest WiFi network
Answer: C

NO.67 An employee, receives an email stating he won the lottery. The email includes a link that
requests a name, mobile phone number, address, and date of birth be provided to confirm
employee's identity before sending him the prize. Which of the following BEST describes this type of
email?
(A). Spear phishing
(B). Whaling
(C). Phishing
(D). Vishing
Answer: C

NO.68 An enterprise to keep cryptpgraphic keys in a sade manner.Whihc of the fikkowug network
appliances can achieve this goals?
(A). HSM
(B). CASB
(C). TPM
(D). DLP
Answer: A

NO.69 Which of the following will provide the BEST physical security countermeasures to stop
intruders? (Select TWO.)
(A). Alarms
(B). Signage
(C). Lighting
(D). Access control vestibules
(E). Fencing
(F). Sensors
Answer: D,E

Alarms=deterrent, Signage=deterrent, Lighting=deterrent, Mantraps=physical countermeasure,
Fencing=physical countermeasure and Sensors are either reactive or technical.
https://www.professormesser.com/security-plus/sy0-501/physical-security-controls-2/
NO.70 A smart switch has the ability to monitor electrical levels and shut off power to a building in
the event of power surge or other fault situation. The switch was installed on a wired network in a
hospital and is monitored by the facilities department via a cloud application. The security
administrator isolated the switch on a separate VLAN and set up a patch routine. Which of the
following steps should also be taken to harden the smart switch?
Answer: B

NO.71 A Chief information Officer is concemed about employees using company-issued laptops to
steal dala when accessing network shares Which of the following should the company implement?
(A). DLP
(B). CASB
(C). HIDS
(D). EDR
(E). UEFI
Answer: A

NO.72 Which of the following conditions impacts data sovereignty?
(A). Rights management
(B). Criminal investigations
(C). Healthcare data
(D). Intemational operations
Answer: D

NO.73 A company recently decided to allow its employees to use their personally owned devices for
tasks like checking email and messaging via mobile applications. The company would like to use
MDM, but employees are concerned about the loss of personal dat a. Which of the following should
the IT department implement to BEST protect the company against company data loss while still
addressing the employees' concerns?
(A). Enable the remote-wiping option in the MDM software in case the phone is stolen.
(B). Configure the MDM software to enforce the use of PINs to access the phone.
(C). Configure MDM for FDE without enabling the lock screen.
(D). Perform a factory reset on the phone before installing the company's applications.
Answer: B

NO.74 Which of the following is a security best practice that ensures the integrity of aggregated log
files within a SIEM?
(A). Set up hashing on the source log file servers that complies with local regulatory requirements,
(B). Back up the aggregated log files at least two times a day or as stated by local regulatory
requirements.
(C). Write protect the aggregated log files and move them to an isolated server with limited access.
(D). Back up the source log files and archive them for at least six years or in accordance with local
regulatory requirements.
Answer: A

NO.75 A security analyst is hardening a network infrastructure. The analyst is given the following
requirements:
* Preserve the use of public IP addresses assigned to equipment on the core router.
* Enable "in transport" encryption protection to the web server with the strongest ciphers.
Which of the following should the analyst implement to meet these requirements? (Select TWO).
(A). Configure VLANs on the core router.
(B). Configure NAT on the core router.
(C). Configure BGP on the core router.
(D). Enable AES encryption on the web server.
(E). Enable 3DES encryption on the web server.
(F). Enable TLSv2 encryption on the web server.
Answer: A,E

NO.76 The Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) has requested that a third-party vendor provide
supporting documents that show proper controls are in place to protect customer dat a. Which of the
following would be BEST for the third-party vendor to provide to the CISO?
(A). GDPR compliance attestation
(B). Cloud Security Alliance materials
(C). SOC 2 Type 2 report
(D). NIST RMF workbooks
Answer: C

https://www.itgovernance.co.uk/soc-reporting
NO.77 he Chief Information Secunty Officer came across a news arbcle outining a mechan'sm thal
allows certan OS passwords to be bypassed The security team was then tasked with determining
which method could be used to prevent data loss in the corporate environment in case an attacker
bypasses authentication Which of the following will accomplish this objective?
(A). FDE
(B). Proper patch management protocols
(C). TPM
(D). Input validations
Answer: A

NO.78 A researcher has been analyzing large data sets for the last ten months. The researcher works
with colleagues from other institutions and typically connects via SSH to retrieve additional dat a.
Historically, this setup has worked without issue, but the researcher recently started getting the
following message:
Which of the following network attacks is the researcher MOST likely experiencing?
(A). MAC cloning
(B). Evil twin
(C). Man-in-the-middle
(D). ARP poisoning
Answer: C

NO.79 Several attempts have been made lo pick the door lock of a secure facility As a result the
security engineer has been assigned to implement a stronger preventative access control Which of
the following would BEST complete the engineer's assignment?
(A). Replacing the traditional key with an RFID key
(B). Installing and monitoring a camera facing the door
(C). Setting motion-sensing lights to illuminate the door on activity
(D). Surrounding the property with fencing and gates
Answer: D

NO.80 Which of the following would BEST provide a systems administrator with the ability to more
efficiently identify systems and manage permissions and policies based on location, role, and service
level?
Answer: C

NO.81 The Chief Compliance Officer from a bank has approved a background check policy for all new
hires Which of the following is the policy MOST likely protecting against?
(A). Preventing any current employees' siblings from working at the bank to prevent nepotism
(B). Hiring an employee who has been convicted of theft to adhere to industry compliance
(C). Filtenng applicants who have added false information to resumes so they appear better qualified
(D). Ensuring no new hires have worked at other banks that may be trying to steal customer
information
Answer: B

NO.82 A compart jut heplmanieg 6 new tlewor ploy thet owe eriptoyens f wee personel doce or
ocala and fe aherag wo wong tow howe. Some of ie
* Employees must provide an alternate work location (i.e., a home address)
* Employees must install software on the device that will prevent the loss of proprietary data but will
not restrict any other software from being installed.
Which of the following BEST describes the MDM options the company is using?
(A). Geofencing, content management, remote wipe, containerization, and storage segmentation
(B). Content management, remote wipe, geolocation, context-aware authentication, and
containerization
(C). Application management, remote wipe, geofencing, context-aware authentication, and
containerization
(D). Remote wipe, geolocation, screen locks, storage segmentation, and full-device encryption
Answer: D

NO.83 An organization recently acquired an ISO 27001 certification. Which of the following would
MOST likely be considered a benefit of this certification?
(A). It allows for the sharing of digital forensics data across organizations
(B). It provides insurance in case of a data breach
(C). It provides complimentary training and certification resources to IT security staff.
(D). It certifies the organization can work with foreign entities that require a security clearance
(E). It assures customers that the organization meets security standards
Answer: E

party libraries embedded on software before it is released into production?
(A). Employ different techniques for server- and client-side validations.
(B). Use a different version control system for third-party libraries.
(C). Implement a vulnerability scan to assess dependencies earlier on SDLC.
(D). Increase the number of penetration tests before software release.
Answer: C

NO.85 An analyst needs to identify the applications a user was running and the files that were open
before the user's computer was shut off by holding down the power button. Which of the following
would MOST likely contain that information?
(A). NGFW
(B). Pagefile
(C). NetFlow
(D). RAM
Answer: C

NO.86 An organization's help desk is flooded with phone calls from users stating they can no longer
access certain websites. The help desk escalates the issue to the security team, as these websites
were accessible the previous day. The security analysts run the following command: ipconfig
/flushdns, but the issue persists. Finally, an analyst changes the DNS server for an impacted machine,
and the issue goes away. Which of the following attacks MOST likely occurred on the original DNS
server?
(A). DNS cache poisoning
(B). Domain hijacking
(C). Distributed denial-of-service
(D). DNS tunneling
Answer: D

NO.87 A manufacturing company has several one-off legacy information systems that cannot be
migrated to a newer OS due to software compatibility issues. The OSs are still supported by the
vendor, but the industrial software is no longer supported. The Chief Information Security Officer
(CISO) has created a resiliency plan for these systems that will allow OS patches to be installed in a
non-production environment, while also creating backups of the systems for recovery. Which of the
following resiliency techniques will provide these capabilities?
(A). Redundancy
(B). RAID 1+5
(C). Virtual machines
(D). Full backups
Answer: D

NO.88 A company recently experienced a data breach and the source was determined to be an
executive who was charging a phone in a public are a. Which of the following would MOST likely have
prevented this breach?
(A). A firewall
(B). A device pin
(C). A USB data blocker
(D). Biometrics
Answer: C

https://www.promorx.com/blogs/blog/how-does-a-usb-data-blocker-work Connecting via the data
port of your mobile device, the Data Blockers creates a barrier between your mobile device and the
charging station. Your phone will draw power as usual, allowing you to use it normally and charge it
at the same time, but this clever piece of equipment will prevent any data exchange.
"Malicious USB charging cables and plugs are also a widespread problem. As with card skimming, a
device may be placed over a public charging port at airports and other transit locations. A USB data
blocker can provide mitigation against these juice- jacking attacks by preventing any sort of data
transfer when the smartphone or laptop is connected to a charge point "
NO.89 Which of the following BEST reduces the security risks introduced when running systems that
have expired vendor support and lack an immediate replacement?
(A). Implement proper network access restrictions
(B). Initiate a bug bounty program
(C). Classify the system as shadow IT.
(D). Increase the frequency of vulnerability scans
Answer: A

NO.90 A company's Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) recently warned the security manager
that the company's Chief Executive Officer (CEO) is planning to publish a controversial option article
in a national newspaper, which may result in new cyberattacks Which of the following would be BEST
for the security manager to use in a threat mode?
Answer: A

NO.91 A network engineer created two subnets that will be used for production and development
servers. Per security policy, production and development servers must each have a dedicated
network that cannot communicate with one another directly. Which of the following should be
deployed so that server administrators can access these devices?
(A). VLANS
(B). Internet proxy servers
(C). NIDS
(D). Jump servers
Answer: D

NO.92 A large enterprise has moved all Hs data to the cloud behind strong authentication and
encryption A sales director recently had a laptop stolen and later, enterprise data was round to have
been compromised database.
Which of the following was the MOST likely cause?
(A). Shadow IT
(B). Credential stuffing
(C). SQL injection
(D). Man-in-the-browser
(E). Bluejacking
Answer: A

NO.93 uring an investigation, a security manager receives notification from local authorities that
company proprietary data was found on a former employee's home computer. The former
employee's corporate workstation has since been repurposed, and the data on the hard drive has
been overwritten. Which of the following would BEST provide the security manager with enough
details to determine when the data was removed from the company network?
(A). Properly configured hosts with security logging
(B). Properly configured endpoint security tool with alerting
(C). Properly configured SIEM with retention policies
(D). Properly configured USB blocker with encryption
Answer: C

NO.94 During a routine scan of a wireless segment at a retail company, a security administrator
discovers several devices are connected to the network that do not match the company's naming
convention and are not in the asset Inventory. WiFi access Is protected with 255-Wt encryption via
WPA2. Physical access to the company's facility requires two-factor authentication using a badge and
a passcode Which of the following should the administrator implement to find and remediate the
Issue? (Select TWO).
(A). Check the SIEM for failed logins to the LDAP directory.
(B). Enable MAC filtering on the switches that support the wireless network.
(C). Run a vulnerability scan on all the devices in the wireless network
(D). Deploy multifactor authentication for access to the wireless network
(E). Scan the wireless network for rogue access points.
(F). Deploy a honeypot on the network
Answer: B,E

NO.95 A security engineer is setting up passwordless authentication for the first time.
INSTRUCTIONS -
Use the minimum set of commands to set this up and verify that it works. Commands cannot be
reused.
If at any time you would like to bring back the initial state of the simulation, please click the Reset All
button.
Answer:

NO.96 As part of the building process for a web application, the compliance team requires that all
PKI certificates are rotated annually and can only contain wildcards at the secondary subdomain
level. Which of the following certificate properties will meet these requirements?
(A). HTTPS://.comptia.org, Valid from April 10 00:00:00 2021 - April 8 12:00:00 2022
(B). HTTPS://app1.comptia.org, Valid from April 10 00:00:00 2021-April 8 12:00:00 2022
(C). HTTPS:// app1.comptia.org, Valid from April 10 00:00:00 2021-April 8 12:00:00 2022
(D). HTTPS://.comptia.org, Valid from April 10 00:00:00 2021 - April 8 12:00:00
Answer: C

NO.97 An employee has been charged with fraud and is suspected of using corporate assets. As
authorities collect evidence, and to preserve the admissibility of the evidence, which of the following
forensic techniques should be used?
(A). Order of volatility
(B). Data recovery
(C). Chain of custody
(D). Non-repudiation
Answer: C

NO.98 An end user reoorts a computer has been acting slower than normal for a few weeks, During
an investigation, an analyst determines the system 3 sending the users email address and a ten-cigit
number ta an IP ackiress ance a day. The anly resent (ag entry regarding the user's computer is the
fallowing:
Which of the following is the MOST likely cause of the issue?
(A). The end user purchased anc installed 2 PUP from a wab browser.
(B). bot on the cornputer is rule forcing passwords aguinsl vy websile.
(C). A hacker Is attempting to ex'itrate sens tve cata.
(D). Ransomwere is communicating with 8 commard-and-contral server.
Answer: A

NO.99 Hackers recently attacked a company's network and obtained several unfavorable pictures
from the Chief Executive Officer's workstation. The hackers are threatening to send the images to the
press if a ransom is not paid. Which of the following is impacted the MOST?
(A). Identify theft
(B). Data loss
(C). Data exfiltration
(D). Reputation
Answer: D

NO.100 An analyst is working on an email security incident in which the target opened an
attachment containing a worm. The analyst wants to implement mitigation techniques to prevent
further spread. Which of the following is the BEST course of action for the analyst to take?
(A). Apply a DLP solution.
(B). Implement network segmentation
(C). Utilize email content filtering,
(D). isolate the infected attachment.
Answer: B

NO.101 The process of passively gathering information prior to launching a cyberattack is called:
(A). tailgating.
(B). reconnaissance.
(C). pharming.
(D). prepending.
Answer: B

NO.102 A security engineer needs to Implement the following requirements:
* All Layer 2 switches should leverage Active Directory tor authentication.
* All Layer 2 switches should use local fallback authentication If Active Directory Is offline.
* All Layer 2 switches are not the same and are manufactured by several vendors.
Which of the following actions should the engineer take to meet these requirements? (Select TWO).
Implement RADIUS.
(A). Configure AAA on the switch with local login as secondary
(B). Configure port security on the switch with the secondary login method.
(C). Implement TACACS+
(D). Enable the local firewall on the Active Directory server.
(E). Implement a DHCP server
Answer: A,B

NO.103 After reading a security bulletin, a network security manager is concerned that a malicious
actor may have breached the network using the same software flaw. The exploit code is publicly
available and has been reported as being used against other industries in the same vertical. Which of
the following should the network security manager consult FIRST to determine a priority list for
forensic review?
(A). The vulnerability scan output
(B). The IDS logs
(C). The full packet capture data
(D). The SIEM alerts
Answer: A

NO.104 A forensics investigator is examining a number of unauthorized payments the were reported
on the company's website. Some unusual log entries show users received an email for an unwanted
mailing list and clicked on a link to attempt to unsubscribe. One of the users reported the email to
the phishing team, and the forwarded email revealed the link to be:
<a href-"https://www.company.com/payto.do?routing=00001111&accc=22223334&amount250">Click here to unsubscribe</a> Which of the following will the forensics investigator MOST likely
determine has occurred?
(A). SQL injection
(B). CSRF
(C). XSS
(D). XSRF
Answer: D

NO.105 A large enterprise has moved all its data to the cloud behind strong authentication and
encryption. A sales director recently had a laptop stolen, and later, enterprise data was found to have
been compromised from a local database. Which of the following was the MOST likely cause?
(A). Shadow IT
(B). Credential stuffing
(C). SQL injection
(D). Man in the browser
(E). Bluejacking
Answer: A

NO.106 A secunty engineer needs to build @ solution to satisty regulatory requirements that stale
certain critcal servers must be accessed using MFA However, the critical servers are older and are
unable to support the addition of MFA, Which of te following will the engineer MOST likely use to
achieve this objective?
(A). A forward proxy
(B). A statetul frewail
(C). A jump server
(D). A port tap
Answer: C

NO.107 A network administrator is setting up wireless access points in all the conference rooms and
wants to authenticate device using PKI. Which of the following should the administrator configure?
(A). A captive portal
(B). PSK
(C). 802.1X
(D). WPS
Answer: C

NO.108 Local guidelines require that all information systems meet a minimum-security baseline to
be compliant.
Which of the following can security administrators use to assess their system configurations against
the baseline?
(A). SOAR playbook
(B). Security control matrix
(C). Risk management framework
(D). Benchmarks
Answer: D

NO.109 Which of the following is a difference between a DRP and a BCP?
(A). A BCP keeps operations running during a disaster while a DRP does not.
(B). A BCP prepares for any operational interruption while a DRP prepares for natural disasters.
(C). BCP is a technical response to disasters while a DRP is operational.
(D). A BCP is formally written and approved while a DRP is not.
Answer: C

NO.110 A financial nstitution wauid like to stare its customer data in a coud but still allaw the data
ta he accessed and manipulated while encrypted. Doing so would prevent the claud servine provider
from heing adle ta decipher the cata due ta its sensitivity. The financial institutan is not concernec
about computational averheads and slow speeds, Which of the follawing cryotographic techniques
would BEST meet the requirement?
Answer: B

NO.111 A manufacturer creates designs for very high security products that are required to be
protected and controlled
(A). Session replay
(B). Evil twin
(C). Bluejacking
(D). ARP poisoning
Answer: B

NO.112 An organization wants to integrate its incident response processes into a workflow with
automated decision points and actions based on predefined playbooks. Which of the following
should the organization implement?
(A). SIEM
(B). SOAR
(C). EDR
(D). CASB
Answer: B

NO.113 An organization is tuning SIEM rules based off of threat intelligence reports. Which of the
following phases of the incident response process does this scenario represent?
(A). Lessons learned
(B). Eradication
(C). Recovery
(D). Preparation
Answer: A

NO.114 Which of the following secure coding techniques makes compromised code more difficult
for hackers to use?
(A). Obfuscation
(B). Normalization
(C). Execution
(D). Reuse
Answer: A

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Obfuscation_(software)
NO.115 Ann, a customer, received a notification from her mortgage company stating her PII may be
shared with partners, affiliates, and associates to maintain day-to-day business operations.
Which of the following documents did Ann receive?
(A). An annual privacy notice
(B). A non-disclosure agreement
(C). A privileged-user agreement
(D). A memorandum of understanding
Answer: A

NO.116 A security architect is required to deploy to conference rooms some workstations that will
allow sensitive data to be displayed on large screens. Due to the nature of the data, it cannot be
stored in the conference rooms. The fiieshare is located in a local data center. Which of the following
should the security architect recommend to BEST meet the requirement?
(A). Fog computing and KVMs
(B). VDI and thin clients
(C). Private cloud and DLP
(D). Full drive encryption and thick clients
Answer: B

NO.117 Which of the following authentication methods sends out a unique password to be used
within a specific number of seconds?
(A). TOTP
(B). Biometrics
(C). Kerberos
(D). LDAP
Answer: A

NO.118 A company just developed a new web application for a government agency. The application
must be assessed and authorized prior to being deployed. Which of the following is required to
assess the vulnerabilities resident in the application?
(A). Repository transaction logs
(B). Common Vulnerabilities and Exposures
(C). Static code analysis
(D). Non-credentialed scans
Answer: B

NO.119 During a security incident investigation, an analyst consults the company's SIEM and sees an
event concerning high traffic to a known, malicious command-and-control server. The analyst would
like to determine the number of company workstations that may be impacted by this issue. Which of
the following can provide the information?
(A). WAF logs
(B). DNS logs
(C). System logs
(D). Application logs
Answer: B

NO.120 Which of the following will increase cryptographic security?
Answer: C

NO.121 A security Daalyst is taking part in an evaluation process that analyzes and categorizes
threat actors of real-world events in order to improve the incident response team's process.
Which of the following is the analyst MOST likely participating in?
(A). MITRE ATT&CK
B Walk-through
(B). Red team
(C). Purple team
(D). TAXII
Answer: B

NO.122 Which of the following risk management strategies would an organization use to maintain a
legacy system with known risks for operational purposes?
(A). Acceptance
(B). Transference
(C). Avoidance
(D). Mitigation
Answer: A

NO.123 An attacker browses a company's online job board attempting to find any relevant
information regarding the technologies the company uses. Which of the following BEST describes this
social engineering technique?
(A). Hoax
(B). Reconnaissance
(C). Impersonation
(D). pretexting
Answer: A

NO.124 Which of the following would an organizaton use to assign a value to risks based on
probability of occurrence and impact?
(A). Risk matrix
(B). Risk register
(C). Risk appetite
(D). Risk mitgation plan
Answer: B

NO.125 A systems administrator is troubleshooting a server's connection to an internal web server.
The administrator needs to determine the correct ports to use. Which of the following tools BEST
shows which ports on the web server are in a listening state?
(A). Ipconfig
(B). ssh
(C). Ping
(D). Netstat
Answer: D

https://www.sciencedirect.com/topics/computer-science/listening-port
NO.126 A security analyst is looking for a solution to help communicate to the leadership team the
seventy levels of the organization's vulnerabilities. Which of the following would BEST meet this
need?
(A). CVE
(B). SIEM
(C). SOAR
(D). CVSS
Answer: D

The Common Vulnerability Scoring System (CVSS) is a system widely used in vulnerability
management programs. CVSS indicates the severity of an information security vulnerability, and is an
integral component of many vulnerability scanning tools.
NO.127 The Chief Information Secunty Officer (CISO) requested a report on potential areas of
improvement following a security incident. Which of the following incident response processes is the
CISO requesting?
(A). Lessons learned
(B). Preparation
(C). Detection
(D). Containment
(E). Root cause analysis
Answer: A

NO.128 A company is receiving emails with links to phishing sites that look very similar to the
company's own website address and content. Which of the following is the BEST way for the
company to mitigate this attack?
(A). Create a honeynet to trap attackers who access the VPN with credentials obtained by phishing.
(B). Generate a list of domains similar to the company's own and implement a DNS sinkhole for each.
(C). Disable POP and IMAP on all Internet-facing email servers and implement SMTPS.
(D). Use an automated tool to flood the phishing websites with fake usernames and passwords.
Answer: B

NO.129 A security analyst wants to verify that a client-server (non-web) application is sending
encrypted traffic. Which of the following should the analyst use?
(A). openssl
(B). hping
(C). netcat
(D). tcpdump
Answer: A

NO.130 Which of the following function as preventive, detective, and deterrent controls to reduce
the risk of physical theft? (Select TWO).
Answer: A,B

NO.131 During a recent incident an external attacker was able to exploit an SMB vulnerability over
the internet. Which of the following action items should a security analyst perform FIRST to prevent
this from occurring again?
(A). Check for any recent SMB CVEs
(B). Install AV on the affected server
(C). Block unneeded TCP 445 connections
(D). Deploy a NIDS in the affected subnet
Answer: C

NO.132 The following is an administrative control that would be MOST effective to reduce the
occurrence of malware execution?
(A). Security awareness training
(B). Frequency of NIDS updates
(C). Change control procedures
(D). EDR reporting cycle
Answer: A

NO.133 Which of the following is MOST likely to contain ranked and ordered information on the
likelihood and potential impact of catastrophic events that may affect business processes and
systems, while also highlighting the residual risks that need to be managed after mitigating controls
have been implemented?
(A). An RTO report
(B). Arisk register
(C). A business impact analysis
(D). An asset value register
Answer: B

E: A disaster recovery plan
NO.134 A company's security team received notice of a critical vulnerability affecting a high-profile
device within the web infrastructure. The vendor patch was just made available online but has not
yet been regression tested in development environments. In the interim, firewall rules were
implemented to reduce the access to the interface affected by the vulnerability. Which of the
following controls does this scenario describe?
(A). Deterrent
(B). Compensating
(C). Detective
(D). Preventive
Answer: B

NO.135 Which of the following would cause a Chief information Security Officer the MOST concer
regarding newly installed Internet-accessible 4K surveillance cameras?
(A). An inability to monitor 100% of every facility could expose the company to unnecessary risk.
(B). The cameras could be compromised if not patched in a timely manner.
(C). Physical security at the facility may not protect the cameras from theft.
(D). Exported videos may take up excessive space on the file servers.
Answer: C

NO.136 A company Is concerned about ts securkty afler a red-tearn exercise. The report shows the
team was able to reach the critical servers due to Ihe SMB being exposed fo the Internet and running
NTLMV1, Which of the following BEST explains the findings?
(A). Default settings on the servers
(B). Unsecuted administrator accounts
(C). Open ports and services
(D). Weak Gata encryption
Answer: C

NO.137 Which of the following will MOST likely adversely impact the operations of unpatched
traditional programmable-logic controllers, running a back-end LAMP server and OT systems with
human-management interfaces that are accessible over the Internet via a web interface? (Choose
two.)
(A). Cross-site scripting
(B). Data exfiltration
(C). Poor system logging
(D). Weak encryption
(E). SQL injection
(F). Server-side request forgery
Answer: D,E

NO.138 Given the following snippet of Python code:
(A). Logic bomb
(B). Keylogger
(C). Backdoor
(D). Ransomware
Answer: B

NO.139 A Chief Security Officer (CSO) has asked a technician to devise a solution that can detect
unauthorized execution privileges from the OS in both executable and data files and can work in
conjunction with proxies or UTM. Which of the following would BEST meet the CSO's requirements?
(A). Fuzzing
(B). Sandboxing
(C). Static code analysis
(D). Code review
Answer: B

NO.140 An engineer recently deployed a group of 100 web servers in a cloud environment. Per the
security policy, all web-server ports except 443 should be disabled. Which of the following can be
used to accomplish this task?
(A). Application allow list
(B). SWG
(C). Host-based firewall
(D). VPN
Answer: B

NO.141 Data exftitration analysis indicates that an attacker managed to download system
configuration notes from a web server. The web-server logs have been deleted, but analysts have
determined that the system configuration notes were stored in the database administrator's folder
on the web server Which of the following attacks explains what occurred? (Select TWO)
(A). Pass-the- hash
(B). Directory traversal
(C). SQL injection
(D). Privilege escalation
(E). Cross-site scnpting
(F). Request forgery
Answer: A,D

NO.142 A security analyst is investigating multiple hosts that are communicating to external IP
addresses during the hours of 2:00 a.m - 4:00 am. The malware has evaded detection by traditional
antivirus software. Which of the following types of malware is MOST likely infecting the hosts?
(A). A RAT
(B). Ransomware
(C). Polymophic
(D). A worm
Answer: C

NO.143 The SIEM at an organization has detected suspicious traffic coming a workstation in its
internal network. An analyst in the SOC the workstation and discovers malware that is associated
with a botnet is installed on the device A review of the logs on the workstation reveals that the
privileges of the local account were escalated to a local administrator. To which of the following
groups should the analyst report this real-world event?
(A). The NOC team
(B). The vulnerability management team
(C). The CIRT
(D). The read team
Answer: C

NO.144 A cyber-security administrator is using an enterprise firewall. The administrator created
some rules, but now Seems to be unresponsive. All connections being dropped by the firewall. Which
of the following would be the BEST option to remove the rules?
(A). # iptables -t mangle -x
(B). # iptables -f
(C). # iptables -z
(D). # iptables -p input -j drop
Answer: A

NO.145 An employee received a word processing file that was delivered as an email attachment The
subject line and email content enticed the employee to open the attachment. Which of the following
attack vectors BEST matches this malware?
(A). Embedded Python code
(B). Macro-enabled file
(C). Bash scripting
(D). Credential-harvesting website
Answer: B

NO.146 An analyst Is generating a security report for the management team. Security guidelines
recommend disabling all listening unencrypted services. Given this output from Nmap:
Which of the following should the analyst recommend to disable?
(A). 21/tcp
(B). 22/tcp
(C). 23/tcp
(D). 443/tcp
Answer: C

NO.147 A security engineer is installing a WAF to protect the company's website from malicious web
requests over SSL. Which of the following is needed to meet the objective?
(A). A reverse proxy
(B). A decryption certificate
(C). A spill-tunnel VPN
(D). Load-balanced servers
Answer: B

NO.148 A cybersecurity administrator needs to allow mobile BYOD devices to access network
resources. As the devices are not enrolled to the domain and do not have policies applied to them,
which of the following are best practices for authentication and infrastructure security? (Select
TWO).
(A). Create a new network for the mobile devices and block the communication to the internal
network and servers
(B). Use a captive portal for user authentication.
(C). Authenticate users using OAuth for more resiliency
(D). Implement SSO and allow communication to the internal network
(E). Use the existing network and allow communication to the internal network and servers.
(F). Use a new and updated RADIUS server to maintain the best solution
Answer: B,C

NO.149 DDoS attacks are causing an overload on the cluster of cloud servers. A security architect is
researching alternatives to make the cloud environment respond to load fluctuation in a costeffective way. Which of the following options BEST fulfils the architect's requirements?
(A). An orchestration solution that can adjust scalability of cloud assets
(B). Use of multipath by adding more connections to cloud storage
(C). Cloud assets replicated on geographically distributed regions
(D). An on-site backup that is deployed and only used when the load increases
Answer: A

Scaling cloud infrastructures can experience lag during the periods of high activity, where other
assets have to either be added, or become active. This is the compromise for a cost-effective solution
that scales. The company could go for a system that is absolutely overkill on assets at all times, in
preparation for those brief peak moments. But this is expensive, and unlikely to be taken by most
companies. Only case you would want to use one of these is if you have a sensitive or critical service
that MUST remain online. Stock exchange servers, military servers, bank servers, etc. come to mind
for this criteria.
NO.150 A company is moving its retail website to a public cloud provider. The company wants to
tokenize credit card data but not allow the cloud provider to see the stored credit card information.
Which of the following would BEST meet these objectives?
(A). WAF
(B). CASB
(C). VPN
(D). TLS
Answer: B

NO.151 A security analyst needs to complete an assessment. The analyst is logged into a server and
must use native tools to map services running on it to the server's listening ports. Which of the
following tools can BEST accomplish this talk?
(A). Netcat
(B). Netstat
(C). Nmap
(D). Nessus
Answer: B

NO.152 A scurity analyst must enforce policies to harden an MDM infrastructure. The requirements
are as follows:
* Ensure mobile devices can be tracked and wiped.
* Confirm mobile devices are encrypted.
Which of the following should the analyst enable on all the devices to meet these requirements?
(A). A Geofencing
(B). Biometric authentication
(C). Geolocation
(D). Geotagging
Answer: A

NO.153 A company uses wireless tor all laptops and keeps a very detailed record of its assets, along
with a comprehensive list of devices that are authorized to be on the wireless network. The Chief
Information Officer (CIO) is concerned about a script kiddie potentially using an unauthorized device
to brute force the wireless PSK and obtain access to the internal network. Which of the following
should the company implement to BEST prevent this from occurring?
(A). A BPDU guard
(B). WPA-EAP
(C). IP filtering
(D). A WIDS
Answer: B

"EAP is in wide use. For example, in IEEE 802.11 (WiFi) the WPA and WPA2 standards have adopted
IEEE 802.1X (with various EAP types) as the canonical authentication mechanism."
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Extensible_Authentication_Protocol The Wi-Fi Alliance added EAPFAST (along with EAP-TLS and EAP-TTLS) to its list of supported protocols for WPA/WPA2 in 2010.
Source: https://jaimelightfoot.com/blog/comptia-security-wireless-security/ "EAP has been
expanded into multiple versions." * "The Wi-Fi Alliance added PEAP to its list of supported protocols
for WPA/WPA2/WPA3." * "The Wi-Fi Alliance added EAP-FAST to its list of supported protocols for
WPA/WPA2/WPA3." * "The Wi-Fi Alliance added EAP-TTLS to its list of supported protocols for
WPA/WPA2/WPA3." Excerpt From: Wm. Arthur Conklin. "CompTIA Security+ All-in-One Exam Guide
(Exam SY0-601))."
NO.154 A security analyst is reviewing a new website that will soon be made publicly available. The
analyst sees the following in the URL:
http://dev-site.comptia.org/home/show.php?sessionID=77276554&loc=us
The analyst then sends an internal user a link to the new website for testing purposes, and when the
user clicks the link, the analyst is able to browse the website with the following URL:
http://dev-site.comptia.org/home/show.php?sessionID=98988475&loc=us
Which of the following application attacks is being tested?
(A). Pass-the-hash
(B). Session replay
(C). Object deference
(D). Cross-site request forgery
Answer: B

NO.155 An organization's Chief Information Security Officer is creating a position that will be
responsible for implementing technical controls to protect data, including ensuring backups are
properly maintained Which of the following roles would MOST likely include these responsibilities?
(A). Data protection officer
(B). Data owner
(C). Backup administrator
(D). Data custodian
(E). Internal auditor
Answer: C

The role that would most likely include the responsibilities of implementing technical controls to
protect data and ensuring backups are properly maintained would be a Backup Administrator. A
Backup Administrator is responsible for maintaining and managing an organization's backup systems
and procedures, which includes ensuring that backups are properly configured, tested and securely
stored. They are also responsible for the recovery of data in case of a disaster or data loss.
NO.156 A development team employs a practice of bringing all the code changes from multiple
team members into the same development project through automation. A tool is utilized to validate
the code and track source code through version control. Which of the following BEST describes this
process?
(A). Continuous delivery
(B). Continuous integration
(C). Continuous validation
(D). Continuous monitoring
Answer: B

NO.157 An audit Identified Pll being utilized In the development environment of a critical
application. The Chief Privacy Officer (CPO) Is adamant that this data must be removed; however, the
developers are concerned that without real data they cannot perform functionality tests and search
for specific dat a. Which of the following should a security professional implement to BEST satisfy
both the CPO's and the development team's requirements?
(A). Data anonymlzallon
(B). Data encryption
(C). Data masking
(D). Data tokenization
Answer: C

Data masking can mean that all or part of the contents of a field are redacted, by substituting all
character strings with "x" for example. A field might be partially redacted to preserve metadata for
analysis purposes. For example, in a telephone number, the dialing prefix might be retained, but the
subscriber number redacted. Data masking can also use techniques to preserve the original format of
the field. Data masking is an irreversible deidentification technique
NO.158 A startup company is using multiple SaaS and IaaS platform to stand up a corporate
infrastructure and build out a customer-facing web application. Which of the following solutions
would be BEST to provide security, manageability, and visibility into the platforms?
(A). SIEM
(B). DLP
(C). CASB
(D). SWG
Answer: C

A cloud access security broker is on-premises or cloud based software that sits between cloud service
users and cloud applications, and monitors all activity and enforces security policies A CASB has a
separate, and more distinctive role. Differing from the use case for SWG, which focuses on the
broader filtering and protection against inbound threats and filtering illegitimate web traffic, a CASB
is more deeply integrated and has control over your cloud application usage. It can be tied into an
applications API to scan data at rest or can be used with a proxy based deployment to enforce inline
policies for more real time protection.
NO.159 A securily analysl has receved several reporls of an issue on an inlemal web application.
Users state they are having to provide their credentials brice to log in. The analyst checks with he
application team and noles Unis is not an expected bohavier. After looking at several lags, the analysi
deciies to in some commands on the gateway and obtains the following output:
Which of the following BEST describes the attack the company is experiencing?
(A). MAC fleoding
(B). URL redirection
(C). ARP paisoning
(D). DNS hijacking
Answer: C

NO.160 Which of the following is a policy that provides a greater depth of knowldge across an
organization?
(A). Asset manahement policy
(B). Separation of duties policy
(C). Acceptable use policy
(D). Job Rotation policy
Answer: C

NO.161 Which of the following in the incident response process is the BEST approach to improve the
speed of the identification phase?
(A). Activate verbose logging in all critical assets.
(B). Tune monitoring in order to reduce false positive rates.
(C). Redirect all events to multiple syslog servers.
(D). Increase the number of sensors present on the environment.
Answer: B

NO.162 An organization regularly scans its infrastructure for missing security patches but is
concerned about hackers gaining access to the scanner's account. Which of the following would be
BEST to minimize this risk?
(A). Require a complex, eight-character password that is updated every 90 days.
(B). Perform only non-intrusive scans of workstations.
(C). Use non-credentialed scans against high-risk servers.
(D). Log and alert on unusual scanner account logon times.
Answer: D

NO.163 An organization Chief information Security Officer a position that will be responsibles for
implementing technical controls to protect data, include ensuring backups are properly maintained.
Which of the following roles would MOST likely include these responsibilities?
(A). Data protection officer
(B). Data owner
(C). Backup administrator
(D). Data custodian
(E). Internal auditor
Answer: A

NO.164 An administrator needs to protect user passwords and has been advised to hash the
passwords. Which of the following BEST describes what the administrator is being advised to do?
(A). Perform a mathematical operation on the passwords that will convert them into umgue stnngs
(B). Add extra data to the passwords so their length is increased, making them harder to brute force
(C). Store all passwords in the system in a rainbow table that has a centralized location
(D). Enforce the use of one-time passwords that are changed for every login session.
Answer: D

NO.165 An incident response technician collected a mobile device during an investigation. Which of
the following should the technician do to maintain chain of custody?
(A). Document the collection and require a sign-off when possession changes.
(B). Lock the device in a safe or other secure location to prevent theft or alteration.
(C). Place the device in a Faraday cage to prevent corruption of the data.
(D). Record the collection in a blockchain-protected public ledger
Answer: A

NO.166 A systems analyst is responsible for generating a new digital forensics chain-of-custody
form. Which of the following should the analyst include in this documentation? (Select TWO).
(A). The order of volatility
(B). A CRC32 checksum
(C). The provenance of the artifacts
(D). The vendor's name
(E). The date time
(F). A warning banner
Answer: A,E

NO.167 Some laptops recently went missing from a locked storage area that is protected by keyless
RFID-enabled locks. There is no obvious damage to the physical space. The security manager
identifies who unlocked the door, however, human resources confirms the employee was on
vacation at the time of the incident. Which of the following describes what MOST likely occurred?
(A). The employee's physical access card was cloned.
(B). The employee is colluding with human resources
(C). The employee's biometrics were harvested
(D). A criminal used lock picking tools to open the door.
Answer: A

NO.168 Which of the following incident response steps occurs before containment?
(A). Eradication
(B). Recovery
(C). Lessons learned
(D). Identification
Answer: D

NO.169 A company is concerned about individuals driving a car into the building to gain access.
Which of the following security controls would work BEST to prevent this from happening?
(A). Bollard
(B). Camera
(C). Alarms
(D). Signage
(E). Access control vestibule
Answer: A

Bollards are posts designed to prevent vehicles from entering an area. They are usually made of steel
or concrete and are placed close together to make it difficult for vehicles to pass through. In addition
to preventing vehicles from entering an area, bollards can also be used to protect buildings and
pedestrians from ramming attacks. They are an effective and cost-efficient way to protect buildings
and pedestrians from unauthorized access.
NO.170 A developer is concerned about people downloading fake malware-infected replicas of a
popular game. Which of the following should the developer do to help verify legitimate versions of
the game for users?
Answer: A

NO.171 A security proposal was set up to track requests for remote access by creating a baseline of
the users' common sign-in properties. When a baseline deviation is detected, an Iv1FA challenge will
be triggered. Which of the following should be configured in order to deploy the proposal?
(A). Context-aware authentication
(B). Simultaneous authentication of equals
(C). Extensive authentication protocol
(D). Agentless network access control
Answer: A

An access control scheme that verifies an object's identity based on various environmental factors,
like time, location, and behavior.
NO.172 A cybersecurity analyst needs to implement secure authentication to third-party websites
without users' passwords. Which of the following would be the BEST way to achieve this objective?
(A). OAuth
(B). SSO
(C). SAML
(D). PAP
Answer: C

NO.173 A Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) is evaluating (he dangers involved in deploying a
new ERP system tor the company. The CISO categorizes the system, selects the controls mat apply to
the system, implements the controls, and then assesses the success of the controls before
authorizing the system Which of the following is the CISO using to evaluate Hie environment for this
new ERP system?
(A). The Diamond Model of Intrusion Analysis
(B). CIS Critical Security Controls
(C). NIST Risk Management Framevtoik
(D). ISO 27002
Answer: D

NO.174 A security analyst is investigating some users who are being redirected to a fake website
that resembles www.comptia.org. The following output was found on the naming server of the
organization:
Which of the following attacks has taken place?
(A). Domain reputation
(B). Domain hijacking
(C). Disassociation
(D). DNS poisoning
Answer: D

NO.175 A vulnerability assessment report will include the CVSS score of the discovered
vulnerabilities because the score allows the organization to better.
(A). validate the vulnerability exists in the organization's network through penetration testing
(B). research the appropriate mitigation techniques in a vulnerability database
(C). find the software patches that are required to mitigate a vulnerability
(D). prioritize remediation of vulnerabilities based on the possible impact.
Answer: D

The Common Vulnerability Scoring System (CVSS) is a free and open industry standard for assessing
the severity of computer system security vulnerabilities. CVSS attempts to assign severity scores to
vulnerabilities, allowing responders to prioritize responses and resources according to threat
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Common_Vulnerability_Scoring_System
NO.176 Which of the following organizational policies are MOST likely to detect fraud that is being
conducted by existing employees? (Select TWO).
(A). Offboarding
(B). Mandatory vacation
(C). Job rotation
(D). Background checks
(E). Separation of duties
(F). Acceptable use
Answer: B,C

NO.177 An engineer wants to access sensitive data from a corporate-owned mobile device. Personal
data is not allowed on the device. Which of the following MDM configurations must be considered
when the engineer travels for business?
(A). Screen locks
(B). Application management
(C). Geofencing
(D). Containerization
Answer: D

NO.178 A company has decided to move its operations to the cloud. It wants to utilize technology
that will prevent users from downloading company applications for personal use, restrict data that is
uploaded, and have visibility into which applications are being used across the company. Which of
the following solutions will BEST meet these requirements?
(A). An NGFW
(B). A CASB
(C). Application whitelisting
(D). An NG-SWG
Answer: B

NO.179 A secunity engineer needs to create a network segment that can be used for servers thal
require connections from untrusted networks. Which of the following should the engineer
implement?
(A). An air gap
(B). A hot site
(C). A VUAN
(D). A screened subnet
Answer: D

NO.180 A security manager has tasked the security operations center with locating all web servers
that respond to an unsecure protocol. Which of the following commands could an analyst run to find
requested servers?
(A). nslookup 10.10.10.0
(B). nmap -p 80 10.10.10.0/24
(C). pathping 10.10.10.0 -p 80
(D). no -1 -p 80
Answer: B

NO.181 A security analyst Is investigating a malware incident at a company. The malware is
accessing a command-and-control website at www.comptia.com. All outbound Intemet traffic is
logged to a syslog server and stored in / logfiles/messages. Which of the following commands would
be BEST for the analyst to use on the syslog server to search for recent traffic to the command-andcontrol website?
(A). head -500 www.comptia.com | grep /logfiles/messages
(B). cat /logfiles/messages | tail -500 wew.comptia.com
(C). tail -500 /legfiles/messages | grep www.comptia.com
(D). grep -500 /logfiles/messages | cat www.comptia.com
Answer: B

NO.182 A secullly operations analyst is using the company's SIEM solufon to correlate alens. Which
of the following stages of the Inciden reapanse process is this an example af?
(A). Eradication
(B). Recowery
(C). identiticalion
(D). Preparation
Answer: C

NO.183 A SOC operator is analyzing a log file that contains the following entries:
(A). SQL injection and improper input-handling attempts
(B). Cross-site scripting and resource exhaustion attempts
(C). Command injection and directory traversal attempts
(D). Error handling and privilege escalation attempts
Answer: C

NO.184 Which of the following processes will eliminate data using a method that will allow the
storage device to be reused after the process is complete?
(A). Pulverizing
(B). Overwriting
(C). Shredding
(D). Degaussing
Answer: D

https://dataspan.com/blog/what-are-the-different-types-of-data-destruction-and-which-one-shouldyou-use/
NO.185 A financial institution would like to store its customer data in a cloud but still allow the data
to be accessed and manipulated while encrypted. Doing so would prevent the cloud service provider
from being able to decipher the data due to its sensitivity. The financial institution is not concerned
about computational overheads and slow speeds. Which of the following cryptographic techniques
would BEST meet the requirement?
(A). Asymmetric
(B). Symmetric
(C). Homomorphic
(D). Ephemeral
Answer: B

NO.186 A network technician is installing a guest wireless network at a coffee shop. When a
customer purchases an Item, the password for the wireless network is printed on the recent so the
customer can log in. Which of the following will the technician MOST likely configure to provide the
highest level of security with the least amount of overhead?
(A). WPA-EAP
(B). WEP-TKIP
(C). WPA-PSK
(D). WPS-PIN
Answer: C

NO.187 A dynamic application vulnerability scan identified code injection could be performed using
a web form. Which of the following will be BEST remediation to prevent this vulnerability?
(A). Implement input validations
(B). Deploy MFA
(C). Utilize a WAF
(D). Configure HIPS
Answer: B

NO.188 An organization with a low tolerance for user inconvenience wants to protect laptop hard
drives against loss or data theft. Which of the following would be the MOST acceptable?
(A). SED
(B). HSM
(C). DLP
(D). TPM
Answer: A

NO.189 The spread of misinformation sorrounding the outbreak of a bnovel virus on election day led
to eligible voters chooseing not to take risk of goding to the polls. This is an exampla of:
(A). Prepending
(B). An influence compain
(C). A watering-hole attack.
(D). Intimidation.
(E). Information elicitation.
Answer: D

NO.190 In the middle of a cybersecurity, a security engineer removes the infected devices from the
network and lock down all compromised accounts. In which of the following incident response
phases is the security engineer currently operating?
(A). Identification
(B). Preparation
(C). Eradiction
(D). Recovery
(E). Containment
Answer: E

Isolation involves removing affected components from any environment the greater one. This can be
anything from removing the server from the network after become the target of DoS attacks, to the
point of placing applications in a VM sandbox outside the environment where the host usually runs.
Whatever the situation, you'll want to make sure you don't there is another Interface between the
affected component and the production network or the Internet.
NO.191 Which of the following actions would be recommended to improve an incident response
process?
(A). Train the team to identify the difference between events and incidents
(B). Modify access so the IT team has full access to the compromised assets
(C). Contact the authorities if a cybercrime is suspected
(D). Restrict communication surrounding the response to the IT team
Answer: A

NO.192 During a recent penetration test, the tester discovers large amounts of data were exfiltrated
over the course of 12 months via the internet. The penetration tester stops the test to inform the
client of the findings Which of the following should be the client's NEXT step to mitigate the issue''
(A). Conduct a full vulnerability scan to identify possible vulnerabilities
(B). Perform containment on the critical servers and resources
(C). Review the firewall and identify the source of the active connection
(D). Disconnect the entire infrastructure from the internet
Answer: D

NO.193 A security analyst Is reviewing the following output from a system:
Which of the following is MOST likely being observed?
(A). ARP polsoning
(B). Man in the middie
(C). Denial of service
(D). DNS poisoning
Answer: C

NO.194 Due to unexpected circumstances, an IT company must vacate its main office, forcing all
operations to alternate, off-site locations. Which of the following will the company MOST likely
reference for guidance during this change?
(A). The business continuity plan
(B). The retention policy
(C). The disaster recovery plan
(D). The incident response plan
Answer: A

BCP is to empower an organization to keep crucial functions running during downtime. This, in turn,
helps the organization respond quickly to an interruption, while creating resilient operational
protocols.
NO.195 A systems administrator reports degraded performance on a virtual server. The
administrator increases the virtual memory allocation which improves conditions, but performance
degrades again after a few days. The administrator runs an anarysis tool and sees the following
output:
The administrator terminates the timeAttend.exe observes system performance over the next few
days, and notices that the system performance does not degrade Which of the following issues is
MOST likely occurring?
(A). DLL injection
(B). API attack
(C). Buffer oveiflow
(D). Memory leak
Answer: C

NO.196 A database administrator needs to ensure all passwords are stored in a secure manner, so
the administrate adds randomly generated data to each password before string. Which of the
following techniques BEST explains this action?
(A). Predictability
(B). Key stretching
(C). Salting
(D). Hashing
Answer: C

https://www.techtarget.com/searchsecurity/definition/salt
NO.197 When used at the design stage, which of the following improves the efficiency, accuracy,
and speed of a database?
(A). Tokenization
(B). Data masking
(C). Normalization
(D). Obfuscation
Answer: C

NO.198 An enterprise needs to keep cryptographic keys in a safe manner. Which of the following
network appliances can achieve this goal?
(A). HSM
(B). CASB
(C). TPM
(D). DLP
Answer: A

NO.199 A security researcher is tracking an adversary by noting its attacks and techniques based on
its capabilities, infrastructure, and victims. Which of the following is the researcher MOST likely
using?
(A). The Diamond Mode! of Intrusion Analysis
(B). The Cyber Kill Chain e
(C). The MITRE CVE database
(D). The incident response process
Answer: C

NO.200 A network administrator has been asked to design a solution to improve a company's
security posture The administrator is given the following, requirements?
* The solution must be inline in the network
* The solution must be able to block known malicious traffic
* The solution must be able to stop network-based attacks
Which of the following should the network administrator implement to BEST meet these
requirements?
(A). HIDS
(B). NIDS
(C). HIPS
(D). NIPS
Answer: D

NO.201 A systems administrator needs to install a new wireless network for authenticated guest
access. The wireless network should support 802. IX using the most secure encryption and protocol
available.
Perform the following steps:
1. Configure the RADIUS server.
2. Configure the WiFi controller.
3. Preconfigure the client for an incoming guest. The guest AD credentials are:
User: guest01
Password: guestpass
Answer:

Use the same settings as describe in below images.
NO.202 A securtly analyst wants to reference a standard to develop a risk management program.
Which af the following ts the BEST source for the analyst to use?
(A). SSAE SOC 2
(B). SO 31000
(C). NIST CSF
(D). GDPR
Answer: B

NO.203 A cybersecurity administrator needs to add disk redundancy for a critical server. The
solution must have a two- drive failure for better fault tolerance. Which of the following RAID levels
should the administrator select?
(A). 0
(B). 1
(C). 5
(D). 6
Answer: B

NO.204 A well-known organization has been experiencing attacks from APIs. The organization is
concerned that custom malware is being created and emailed into the company or installed on USB
sticks that are dropped in parking lots. Which of the following is the BEST defense against this
scenario?
(A). Configuring signature-based antivirus io update every 30 minutes
(B). Enforcing S/MIME for email and automatically encrypting USB drives upon insertion.
(C). Implementing application execution in a sandbox for unknown software.
(D). Fuzzing new files for vulnerabilities if they are not digitally signed
Answer: C

NO.205 A retail company that is launching @ new website to showcase the company's product line
and other information for online shoppers registered the following URLs:
* www companysite com
* shop companysite com
* about-us companysite com
contact-us. companysite com
secure-logon companysite com
Which of the following should the company use to secure its website if the company is concemed
with convenience and cost?
(A). A self-signed certificate
(B). A root certificate
(C). A code-signing certificate
(D). Awildcard certificate
(E). An extended validation certificate
Answer: B

NO.206 A company is implementing a new SIEM to log and send alerts whenever malicious activity is
blocked by its antivirus and web content filters. Which of the following is the primary use case for this
scenario?
(A). Implementation of preventive controls
(B). Implementation of detective controls
(C). Implementation of deterrent controls
(D). Implementation of corrective controls
Answer: B

NO.207 Under GDPR, which of the following is MOST responsible for the protection of privacy and
website user rights?
(A). The data protection officer
(B). The data processor
(C). The data owner
(D). The data controller
Answer: C

NO.208 A company has drafted an insider-threat policy that prohibits the use of external storage
devices. Which of the following would BEST protect the company from data exfiltration via
removable media?
(A). Monitoring large data transfer transactions in the firewall logs
(B). Developing mandatory training to educate employees about the removable media policy
(C). Implementing a group policy to block user access to system files
(D). Blocking removable-media devices and write capabilities using a host-based security tool
Answer: D

NO.209 Whiich of the following Gieuster recovery tests ie the LEAST time coneuntng for tie easier
recovery tearm?
(A). Tabletop
(B). Parallel
(C). Full interruption
(D). Simulation
Answer: A

NO.210 During an incident a company CIRT determine it is necessary to observe the continued
network-based transaction between a callback domain and the malware running on an enterprise PC.
Which of the following techniques would be BEST to enable this activity while reducing the risk of
lateral spread and the risk that the adversary would notice any changes?
(A). Physical move the PC to a separate internet pint of presence
(B). Create and apply microsegmantion rules.
(C). Emulate the malware in a heavily monitored DM Z segment.
(D). Apply network blacklisting rules for the adversary domain
Answer: B

NO.211 A security analyst sees the following log output while reviewing web logs:
Which of the following mitigation strategies would be BEST to prevent this attack from being
successful?
(A). Secure cookies
(B). Input validation
(C). Code signing
(D). Stored procedures
Answer: B

NO.212 Which of the following would be used to find the MOST common web-application
vulnerabilities?
(A). OWASP
(B). MITRE ATT&CK
(C). Cyber Kill Chain
(D). SDLC
Answer: A

NO.213 A security manager runs Nessus scans of the network after every maintenance vandow
Which of the following ts the securty manager MOST likely trying to accomplish?
(A). A Verifying that system patching has effectively removed known vulnerabilities
(B). identifying assets on the network that may not exist on the network asset inventory
(C). Validating the hosts do not have vulnerable ports exposed to the Intemet
(D). Checking the status of the automated malware analyses that is beang performed
Answer: A

NO.214 Which of the following are the BEST ways to implement remote home access to a company's
intranet systems if establishing an always-on VPN is not an option? (Select Two)
(A). Install VPN concentrations at home offices
(B). Create NAT on the firewall for intranet systems
(C). Establish SSH access to a jump server
(D). Implement a SSO solution
(E). Enable MFA for intranet systems
(F). Configure SNMPv3 server and clients.
Answer: A,E

NO.215 Which of the following would be the BEST method for creating a detailed diagram of
wireless access points and hot-spots?
(A). Footprinting
(B). White-box testing
(C). A drone/UAV
(D). Pivoting
Answer: A

NO.216 A client sent several inquiries to a project manager about the delinquent delivery status of
some critical reports. The project manager claimed the reports were previously sent via email, but
then quickly generated and backdated the reports before submitting them as plain text within the
body of a new email message thread. Which of the following actions MOST likely supports an
investigation for fraudulent submission?
(A). Establish chain of custody.
(B). Inspect the file metadata.
(C). Reference the data retention policy.
(D). Review the email event logs
Answer: D

NO.217 A smail business office is setting up a wireless infrastructure with primary requirements
centered around protecting customer information and preventing unauthorized access to the
business network. Which of the following would BEST support the office's business needs? (Select
TWO)
(A). Installing WAPs with strategic placement
(B). Configuring access using WPA3
(C). Installing a WIDS
(D). Enabling MAC filtering
(E). Changing the WiFi password every 30 days
(F). Reducing WiFi transmit power throughout the office
Answer: B,D

NO.218 The Chief Information Security Officer wants to prevent exfiltration of sensitive information
from employee cell phones when using public USB power charging stations. Which of the following
would be the BEST solution to Implement?
(A). DLP
(B). USB data blocker
(C). USB OTG
(D). Disabling USB ports
Answer: A

USB data blockers are good, but they're reliant on the employee actually using them. A DLP solution
such as MobileIron forces compliance, by locking corporate resources behind a secure application.
For example: Users any mobile device policy, such as BYOD, CYOD, and COPE. If they want to access
their corporate email on their phone. They will need to sign into the MobileIron application, in order
to be granted visibility to their corporate email account. Since the emails are being read/sent through
the MobileIron application. Safeguards can be applied even on an outside network-mobile level. If an
employee attempts to send a customers social security number, the MobileIron will either block it,
alert it, or both, contingent on how the company setup the MobileIron service to work.
NO.219 An organidation recently discovered that a purchasing officer approved an invoice for an
amount that was different than the original purchase order. After further investigation, a security
analyst determines that the digital signature for the fraudulent invoice is exactly the same as the
digital signature for the correct invoice that had been approved. Which of the following attacks MOST
likely explains the behavior?
(A). Birthday
(B). Rainbow table
(C). Impersonation
(D). Whaling
Answer: C

NO.220 An organization has been experiencing outages during holiday sales and needs to ensure
availability of its point-of-sale systems The IT administrator has been asked to improve both serverdata fault tolerance and site availability under high consumer load Which of the following are the
BEST options to accomplish this objective'? (Select TWO)
(A). Load balancing
(B). Incremental backups
(C). UPS
(D). RAID
(E). Dual power supply
(F). NIC teaming
Answer: A,D

NO.221 An organization has developed an application that needs a patch to fix a critical vulnerability
In which of the following environments should the patch be deployed LAST?
(A). Test
(B). Staging
(C). Development
(D). Production
Answer: A

NO.222 Which of the following is an effective tool to stop or prevent the exfiltration of data from a
network?
(A). DLP
(B). NIDS
(C). TPM
(D). FDE
Answer: A

Data loss prevention (DLP) makes sure that users do not send sensitive or critical information outside
the corporate network
NO.223 Users have been issued smart cards that provide physical access to a building. The cards also
contain tokens that can be used to access information systems. Users can log m to any thin client
located throughout the building and see the same desktop each time. Which of the following
technologies are being utilized to provide these capabilities? (Select TWO)
(A). COPE
(B). VDI
(C). GPS
(D). TOTP
(E). RFID
(F). BYOD
Answer: B,E

NO.224 A security analyst receives an alert from trie company's SIEM that anomalous activity is
coming from a local source IP address of 192.168.34.26. The Chief Information Security Officer asks
the analyst to block the originating source Several days later, another employee opens an internal
ticket stating that vulnerability scans are no longer being performed properly. The IP address the
employee provides is 192 168.3426. Which of the following describes this type of alert?
(A). True positive
(B). True negative
(C). False positive
(D). False negative
Answer: C

NO.225 An organization that is located in a flood zone is MOST likely to document the concerns
associated with the restoration of IT operation in a:
(A). business continuity plan
(B). communications plan.
(C). disaster recovery plan.
(D). continuity of operations plan
Answer: C

NO.226 An organization wants seamless authentication to its applications. Which of the following
should the organization employ to meet this requirement?
(A). SOAP
(B). SAML
(C). SSO
(D). Kerberos
Answer: C

NO.227 The Chief Information Security Officer wants to pilot a new adaptive, user-based
authentication method. The concept Includes granting logical access based on physical location and
proximity. Which of the following Is the BEST solution for the pilot?
(A). Geofencing
(B). Self-sovereign identification
(C). PKl certificates
(D). SSO
Answer: A

NO.228 Which of the following describes a maintenance metric that measures the average time
required to troubleshoot and restore failed equipment?
(A). RTO
(B). MTBF
(C). MTTR
(D). RPO
Answer: C

NO.229 An organization has hired a ted team to simulate attacks on its security posture Which of
the following will the blue team do after detecting an loC?
(A). Reimage the impacted workstations
(B). Activate runbooks for incident response
(C). Conduct forensics on the compromised system
(D). Conduct passive reconnaissance to gather information
Answer: B

NO.230 A security analyst is performing a packet capture on a series of SOAP HTTP requests for a
security assessment. The analyst redirects the output to a file After the capture is complete, the
analyst needs to review the first transactions quickly and then search the entire series of requests for
a particular string Which of the following would be BEST to use to accomplish the task? (Select TWO).
Answer: A,C

A - "analyst needs to review the first transactions quickly"
C - "search the entire series of requests for a particular string"
NO.231 An organization is moving away from the use of client-side and server-side certificates for
EAR The company would like for the new EAP solution to have the ability to detect rogue access
points. Which of the following would accomplish these requirements?
(A). PEAP
(B). EAP-FAST
(C). EAP-TLS
(D). EAP-TTLS
Answer: C

NO.232 A recent audit uncovered a key finding regarding the use of a specific encryption standard in
a web application that is used to communicate with business customers. Due to the technical
limitations of its customers the company is unable to upgrade the encryption standard. Which of the
following types of controls should be used to reduce the risk created by this scenario?
(A). Physical
(B). Detective
(C). Preventive
(D). Compensating
Answer: D

NO.233 The following are the logs of a successful attack.
Which of the following controls would be BEST to use to prevent such a breach in the future?
(A). Password history
(B). Account expiration
(C). Password complexity
(D). Account lockout
Answer: D

NO.234 A user recently entered a username and password into a recruiting application website that
had been forged to look like the legitimate site Upon investigation, a security analyst the identifies
the following:
* The legitimate websites IP address is 10.1.1.20 and eRecruit local resolves to the IP
* The forged website's IP address appears to be 10.2.12.99. based on NetFtow records
* AH three at the organization's DNS servers show the website correctly resolves to the legitimate IP
* DNS query logs show one of the three DNS servers returned a result of 10.2.12.99 (cached) at the
approximate time of the suspected compromise.
Which of the following MOST likely occurred?
(A). A reverse proxy was used to redirect network traffic
(B). An SSL strip MITM attack was performed
(C). An attacker temporarily pawned a name server
(D). An ARP poisoning attack was successfully executed
Answer: B

NO.235 Which of the following biometric authentication methods is the MOST accurate?
(A). Gait
(B). Retina
(C). Signature
(D). Voice
Answer: B

Retina authentication is the most accurate biometric authentication method. Retina authentication is
based on recognizing the unique pattern of blood vessels and other features in the retina. This makes
it virtually impossible to duplicate or bypass, making it the most secure form of biometric
authentication currently available.
NO.236 A software company adopted the following processes before releasing software to
production;
* Peer review
* Static code scanning
* Signing
A considerable number of vulnerabilities are still being detected when code is executed on
production Which of the following security tools can improve vulnerability detection on this
environment?
(A). File integrity monitonng for the source code
(B). Dynamic code analysis tool
(C). Encrypted code repository
(D). Endpoint detection and response solution
Answer: A

NO.237 A grocery store is expressing security and reliability concerns regarding the on-site backup
strategy currently being performed by locally attached disks. The main concerns are the physical
security of the backup media and the durability of the data stored on these devices Which of the
following is a cost-effective approach to address these concerns?
(A). Enhance resiliency by adding a hardware RAID.
(B). Move data to a tape library and store the tapes off-site
(C). Install a local network-attached storage.
(D). Migrate to a cloud backup solution
Answer: D

NO.238 Which of the following control sets should a well-written BCP include? (Select THREE)
(A). Preventive
(B). Detective
(C). Deterrent
(D). Corrective
(E). Compensating
(F). Physical
(G). Recovery
Answer: A,D,G

NO.239 A recent phishing campaign resulted in several compromised user accounts. The security
incident response team has been tasked with reducing the manual labor of filtering through all the
consuming mitigation actions. Which of the following can be configured to streamline those tasks?
(A). SOAR playbook
(B). MOM policy
(C). Firewall rules
(D). URL filter
(E). SIEM data collection
Answer: A

NO.240 A security analyst has been asked to investigate a situation after the SOC started to receive
alerts from the SIEM. The analyst first looks at the domain controller and finds the following events:
To better understand what is going on, the analyst runs a command and receives the following
output:
Based on the analyst's findings, which of the following attacks is being executed?
(A). Credential harvesting
(B). Keylogger
(C). Brute-force
(D). Spraying
Answer: D

Brute forcing focuses intensively on one account with every computable password attempt, whereas
spraying simply attempts a few or several passwords on an account before moving on.
NO.241 The Chief information Security Officer has directed the security and networking team to
retire the use of shared passwords on routers and switches. Which of the following choices BEST
meets the requirements?
(A). SAML
(B). TACACS+
(C). Password vaults
(D). OAuth
Answer: B

NO.242 A company is required to continue using legacy software to support a critical service. Which
of the following BEST explains a risk of this practice?
(A). Default system configuration
(B). Unsecure protocols
(C). Lack of vendor support
(D). Weak encryption
Answer: C

NO.243 A security analyst is configuring a large number of new company-issued laptops. The analyst
received the following requirements:
* The devices will be used internationally by staff who travel extensively.
* Occasional personal use is acceptable due to the travel requirements.
* Users must be able to install and configure sanctioned programs and productivity suites.
* The devices must be encrypted
* The devices must be capable of operating in low-bandwidth environments.
Which of the following would provide the GREATEST benefit to the security posture of the devices?
(A). Configuring an always-on VPN
(B). Implementing application whitelisting
(C). Requiring web traffic to pass through the on-premises content filter
(D). Setting the antivirus DAT update schedule to weekly
Answer: A

NO.244 Which of the following BEST explains the difference between a data owner and a data
custodian?
(A). The data owner is responsible for adhering to the rules for using the data, while the data
custodian is responsible for determining the corporate governance regarding the data
(B). The data owner is responsible for determining how the data may be used, while the data
custodian is responsible for implementing the protection to the data
(C). The data owner is responsible for controlling the data, while the data custodian is responsible for
maintaining the chain of custody when handling the data
(D). The data owner grants the technical permissions for data access, while the data custodian
maintains the database access controls to the data
Answer: B

NO.245 Server administrators want to configure a cloud solution so that computing memory and
processor usage is maximized most efficiently across a number or virtual servers. They also need to
avoid potential dental-of-service situations caused by availability. Which of the following should
administrators configure to maximize system availability while efficiently utilizing available
computing power?
(A). Dynamic resource allocation
(B). High availably
(C). Segmentation
(D). Container security
Answer: A

NO.246 ihic ofthe lowing iste BEST resnon to meitsin efrciona ani SSUES Rane ETS or cricai?
(A). To provide data to quantify risk based on the organization's systems
(B). To keep all software and hardware fully patched for known vulnerabilities
(C). To only allow approved, organization-owned devices onto the business network
(D). To standardize by selecting one laptop model for all users in the organization
Answer: A

NO.247 You received the output of a recent vulnerability assessment.
Review the assessment and scan output and determine the appropriate remedialion(s} 'or each
dewce.
Remediation options may be selected multiple times, and some devices may require more than one
remediation.
If at any time you would like to biing bade the initial state ot the simulation, please dick me Reset All
button.
Answer:

NO.248 A security engineer has enabled two-factor authentication on all workstations. Which of the
following approaches are the MOST secure? (Select TWO).
(A). Password and security question
(B). Password and CAPTCHA
(C). Password and smart card
(D). Password and fingerprint
(E). Password and one-time token
(F). Password and voice
Answer: C,D

NO.249 Which of the following documents provides guidance regarding the recommended
deployment of network security systems from the manufacturer?
(A). Cloud control matrix
(B). Reference architecture
(C). NIST RMF
(D). CIS Top 20
Answer: C

NO.250 A security analyst is tasked with defining the "something you are" factor of the company's
MFA settings. Which of the following is BEST to use to complete the configuration?
(A). Gait analysis
(B). Vein
(C). Soft token
(D). HMAC-based, one-time password
Answer: A

NO.251 On which of the following is the live acquisition of data for forensic analysis MOST
dependent? (Choose two.)
(A). Data accessibility
(B). Legal hold
(C). Cryptographic or hash algorithm
(D). Data retention legislation
(E). Value and volatility of data
(F). Right-to-audit clauses
Answer: E,F

NO.252 A company i working on mobile device security afer a report revealed that users granted
non-verified sofware access to corporate dat a. Which of the folowing ts the MOST effective security
control to mitigate this risk?
(A). Block access to application stores.
(B). Implement OTA updates
(C). Update the BYOD pot
(D). Deploy a urttoem firmware
Answer: A

NO.253 After a ransomware attack a forensics company needs to review a cryptocurrency
transaction between the victim and the attacker. Which of the following will the company MOST
likely review to trace this transaction?
(A). The public ledger
(B). The NetFlow data
(C). A checksum
(D). The event log
Answer: A

https://www.investopedia.com/tech/what-cryptocurrency-public-ledger/
NO.254 A local server recently crashed, and the team is attempting to restore the server from a
backup. During the restore process, the team notices the file size of each daily backup is large and
will run out of space at the current rate. The current solution appears to do a full backup every night.
Which of the following would use the LEAST amount of storage space for backups?
(A). Aweekly, incremental backup with daily differential backups
(B). Aweekly, full backup with daily snapshot backups
(C). Aweekly, full backup with daily differential backups
(D). Aweekly, full backup with daily incremental backups
Answer: C

NO.255 A recent malware outbreak across a subnet included successful rootkit installations on many
PCs, ensuring persistence by rendering remediation efforts ineffective. Which of the following would
BEST detect the presence of a rootkit in the future?
(A). FDE
(B). NIDS
(C). EDR
(D). DLP
Answer: C

NO.256 one of the attendees starts to notice delays in the connection. and the HTTPS site requests
are reverting to HTTP. Which of the following BEST describes what is happening?
(A). Birthday collision on the certificate key
(B). DNS hyacking to reroute traffic
(C). Brute force to the access point
(D). A SSUTLS downgrade
Answer: D

NO.257 During a recent security incident at a multinational corporation a security analyst found the
following logs for an account called user:
Which Of the following account policies would BEST prevent attackers from logging in as user?
(A). Impossible travel time
(B). Geofencing
(C). Time-based logins
(D). Geolocation
Answer: A

NO.258 A security analyst has identified malware spreading through the corporate network and has
activated the CSIRT Which of the following should the analyst do NEXT?
(A). Review how the malware was introduced to the network.
(B). Attempt to quarantine all infected hosts to limit further spread.
(C). Create help desk tickets to get infected systems reimaged.
(D). Update all endpoint antivirus solutions with the latest updates.
Answer: B

NO.259 After installing a Windows server, a cybersecurity administrator needs to harden it,
following security best practices. Which of the following will achieve the administrator's goal? (Select
TWO).
(A). Disabling guest accounts
(B). Disabling service accounts
(C). Enabling network sharing
(D). Disabling NetBIOS over TCP/IP
(E). Storing LAN manager hash values
(F). Enabling NTLM
Answer: A,D

NO.260 A privileged user at a company stole several proprietary documents from a server. The user
also went into the log files and deleted all records of the incident. The systems administrator has Just
informed investigators that other log files are available for review. Which of the following did the
administrator MOST likely configure that will assist the investigators?
(A). Memory dumps
(B). The syslog server
(C). The application logs
(D). The log retention policy
Answer: B

NO.261 Which of the following is a physical security control that ensures onty the authorized user is
present when gaining access to a secured area?
(A). A biometric scanner
(B). A smart card reader
(C). APKItoken
(D). A PIN pad
Answer: A

A biometric scanner uses physical characteristics such as fingerprints to identify an individual user. It
is used to ensure that only the authorized user is present when gaining access to a secured area.
NO.262 An organization's finance department is implementing a policy to protect against collusion.
Which of the following control types and corresponding procedures should the organization
implement to fulfill this policy's requirement? (Select TWO).
(A). Corrective
(B). Deterrent
(C). Preventive
(D). Mandatory vacations
(E). Job rotation
(F). Separation of duties
Answer: D,E

NO.263 Two organizations plan to collaborate on the evaluation of new SIEM solutions for their
respective companies. A combined effort from both organizations' SOC teams would speed up the
effort. Which of the following can be written to document this agreement?
(A). MOU
(B). ISA
(C). SLA
(D). NDA
Answer: A

A document that regulates security-relevant aspects of an intended connection between an agency
and an external system. It regulates the security interface between any two systems operating under
two different distinct authorities. It includes a variety of descriptive, technical, procedural, and
planning information. It is usually preceded by a formal MOA/MOU that defines high- level roles and
responsibilities in management of a cross-domain connection.
https://csrc.nist.gov/glossary/term/interconnection_security_agreement
NO.264 A security analyst needs to implement security features across smartphones, laptops, and
tablets. Which of the following would be the MOST effective across heterogeneous platforms?
(A). Enforcing encryption
(B). Deploying GPOs
(C). Removing administrative permissions
(D). Applying MDM software
Answer: D

MDM stands for Mobile Device Management, is software that assists in the implementation of the
process of managing, monitoring, and securing several mobile devices such as tablets, smartphones,
and laptops used in the organization to access the corporate information.
NO.265 A Chief Information Officer receives an email stating a database will be encrypted within 24
hours unless a payment of $20,000 is credited to the account mentioned In the email. This BEST
describes a scenario related to:
(A). whaling.
(B). smishing.
(C). spear phishing
(D). vishing
Answer: C

NO.266 A Chief Information Officer is concerned about employees using company-issued laptops lo
steal data when accessing network shares. Which of the following should the company Implement?
(A). DLP
(B). CASB
(C). HIDS
(D). EDR
(E). UEFI
Answer: A

Chmod removes the setuido permission, that is, it removes the S bit. Setuido is the specific
permission, but it is removed with Chmod. https://www.cbtnuggets.com/blog/technology/systemadmin/linux-file-permissions-understanding-setuid-setgid-and-the-sticky-bit
NO.267 A security manager needs to assess the security posture of one of the organization's
vendors. The contract with the vendor does not allow for auditing of the vendor's security controls.
Which of (he following should the manager request to complete the assessment?
(A). A service-level agreement
(B). A business partnership agreement
(C). A SOC 2 Type 2 report
(D). A memorandum of understanding
Answer: A

NO.268 A Chief Security Officer is looking for a solution that can reduce the occurrence of customers
receiving errors from back-end infrastructure when systems go offline unexpectedly. The security
architect would like the solution to help maintain session persistence. Which of the following would
BEST meet the requirements?
(A). Reverse proxy
(B). NIC teaming
(C). Load balancer
(D). Forward proxy
Answer: B

NO.269 An analyst visits an internet forum looking for information about a tool. The analyst finds a
threat that appears to contain relevant information. One of the posts says the following:
Which of the following BEST describes the attack that was attempted against the forum readers?
(A). SOU attack
(B). DLL attack
(C). XSS attack
(D). API attack
Answer: C

Cross-site scripting attacks may occur anywhere that possibly malicious users are allowed to post
unregulated material to a trusted website for the consumption of other valid users. The most
common example can be found in bulletin-board websites which provide web based mailing list-style
functionality. https://owasp.org/www-community/attacks/xss/
https://www.acunetix.com/websitesecurity/cross-site-scripting/
NO.270 The website http://companywebsite.com requires users to provide personal information,
including security question responses, for registration. Which of the following would MOST likely
cause a data breach?
(A). Lack of input validation
(B). Open permissions
(C). Unsecure protocol
(D). Missing patches
Answer: C

NO.271 While preparing a software Inventory report, a security analyst discovers an unauthorized
program installed on most of the company's servers. The program utilizes the same code signing
certificate as an application deployed to only the accounting team. Which of the following mitigations
would BEST secure the server environment?
(A). Revoke the code signing certificate used by both programs.
(B). Block all unapproved file hashes from installation.
(C). Add the accounting application file hash to the allowed list.
(D). Update the code signing certificate for the approved application.
Answer: C

NO.272 A security analyst in a SOC has been tasked with onboarding a new network into the SIEM.
Which of the following BEST describes the information that should feed into a SIEM solution in order
to adequately support an investigation?
(A). Logs from each device type and security layer to provide correlation of events
(B). Only firewall logs since that is where attackers will most likely try to breach the network
(C). Email and web-browsing logs because user behavior is often the cause of security breaches
(D). NetFlow because it is much more reliable to analyze than syslog and will be exportable from
every device
Answer: A

NO.273 A technician was dispatched to complete repairs on a server in a data center. While locating
the server, the technician entered a restricted area without authorization. Which of the following
security controls would BEST prevent this in the future?
(A). Use appropriate signage to mark all areas.
(B). Utilize cameras monitored by guards.
(C). Implement access control vestibules.
(D). Enforce escorts to monitor all visitors.
Answer: C

NO.274 A junior security analyst is reviewing web server logs and identifies the following pattern in
the log file:
Which ol the following types of attacks is being attempted and how can it be mitigated?
(A). XSS. mplement a SIEM
(B). CSRF. implement an IPS
(C). Directory traversal implement a WAF
(D). SQL infection, mplement an IDS
Answer: C

NO.275 Whichppf the following will MOST likely cause machine-learning and Al-enabled systems to
operate with unintended consequences?
(A). Stored procedures
(B). Buffer overflows
(C). Data bias
(D). Code reuse
Answer: A

NO.276 Which of the following is the MOST secure but LEAST expensive data destruction method for
data that is stored on hard drives?
(A). Pulverizing
(B). Shredding
(C). Incinerating
(D). Degaussing
Answer: D

NO.277 A security policy states that common words should not be used as passwords. A security
auditor was able to perform a dictionary attack against corporate credentials Which of the following
controls was being violated?
(A). Password complexity
(B). Password history
(C). Password reuse
(D). Password length
Answer: B

NO.278 The new Chief Information Security Officer at a company has asked the security team to
implement stronger user account policies. The new policies require:
* Users to choose a password unique to their last ten passwords
* Users to not log in from certain high-risk countries
Which of the following should the security team implement? (Select TWO).
(A). Password complexity
(B). Password history
(C). Geolocation
(D). Geofencing
(E). Geotagging
(F). Password reuse
Answer: A,B

NO.279 A cybersecurity manager has scheduled biannual meetings with the IT team and department
leaders to discuss how they would respond to hypothetical cyberattacks. During these meetings, the
manager presents a scenario and injects additional information throughout the session to replicate
what might occur in a dynamic cybersecurity event involving the company, its facilities, its data, and
its staff. Which of the following describes what the manager is doing?
(A). Developing an incident response plan
(B). Building a disaster recovery plan
(C). Conducting a tabletop exercise
(D). Running a simulation exercise
Answer: C

NO.280 Which of the following is the purpose of a risk register?
(A). To define the level or risk using probability and likelihood
(B). To register the risk with the required regulatory agencies
(C). To identify the risk, the risk owner, and the risk measures
(D). To formally log the type of risk mitigation strategy the organization is using
Answer: C

NO.281 A company owns a public-facing e-commerce website. The company outsources credit card
transactions to a payment company. Which of the following BEST describes the role of the payment
company?
(A). Data controller
(B). Data custodian
(C). Data owners
(D). Data processor
Answer: D

A data processor is an organization that processes personal data on behalf of a data controller. In this
scenario, the company that owns the e-commerce website is the data controller, as it determines the
purposes and means of processing personal data (e.g. credit card information). The payment
company is a data processor, as it processes personal data on behalf of the e-commerce company
(i.e. it processes credit card transactions).
NO.282 A company wants to build a new website to sell products online. The website will host a
storefront application that will allow visitors to add products to a shopping cart and pay for the
products using a credit card. Which of the following protocols would be the MOST secure to
implement?
(A). SSL
(B). FTP
(C). SNMP
(D). TLS
Answer: D

NO.283 An analyst is reviewing logs associated with an attack. The logs indicate an attacker
downloaded a malicious file that was quarantined by the AV solution. The attacker utilized a local
non-administrative account to restore the malicious file to a new location. The file was then used by
another process to execute a payload. Which of the following attacks did the analyst observe?
(A). Privilege escalation
(B). Request forgeries
(C). Injection
(D). Replay attack
Answer: A

Cross-site request forgery, also known as one-click attack or session riding and abbreviated as CSRF
(sometimes pronounced sea-surf[1]) or XSRF, is a type of malicious exploit of a website where
unauthorized commands are submitted from a user that the web application trusts.[2] There are
many ways in which a malicious website can transmit such commands; specially-crafted image tags,
hidden forms, and JavaScript XMLHttpRequests, for example, can all work without the user's
interaction or even knowledge. Unlike cross-site scripting (XSS), which exploits the trust a user has for
a particular site, CSRF exploits the trust that a site has in a user's browser.[3] In a CSRF attack, an
innocent end user is tricked by an attacker into submitting a web request that they did not intend.
This may cause actions to be performed on the website that can include inadvertent client or server
data leakage, change of session state, or manipulation of an end user's account.
NO.284 A security administrator is analyzing the corporate wireless network The network only has
two access points running on channels 1 and 11. While using airodump-ng. the administrator notices
other access points are running with the same corporate ESSID on all available channels and with the
same BSSID of one of the legitimate access ports Which of the following attacks in happening on the
corporate network?
(A). Man in the middle
(B). Evil twin
(C). Jamming
(D). Rogue access point
(E). Disassociation
Answer: B

NO.285 A user is attempting to navigate to a website from inside the company network using a
desktop. When the user types in the URL. https://www.site.com, the user is presented with a
certificate mismatch warning from the browser. The user does not receive a warning when visiting
http://www.anothersite.com. Which of the following describes this attack?
(A). On-path
(B). Domain hijacking
(C). DNS poisoning
(D). Evil twin
Answer: C

NO.286 A network engineer is troubleshooting wireless network connectivity issues that were
reported by users. The issues are occurring only in the section of the building that is closest to the
parking lot. Users are intermittently experiencing slow speeds when accessing websites and are
unable to connect to network drives. The issues appear to increase when laptop users return desks
after using their devices in other areas of the building. There have also been reports of users being
required to enter their credentials on web pages in order to gain access to them. Which of the
following is the MOST likely cause of this issue?
(A). An external access point is engaging in an evil-twin attack.
(B). The signal on the WAP needs to be increased in that section of the building.
(C). The certificates have expired on the devices and need to be reinstalled.
(D). The users in that section of the building are on a VLAN that is being blocked by the firewall
Answer: A

NO.287 Which of the following holds staff accountable while escorting unathorized personal?
(A). Locks
(B). Badges
(C). Cameras
(D). Visitor logs
Answer: D

NO.288 Which of the following relets to applications and systems that are used within an
organization without consent or approval?
(A). Shadow IT
(B). OSINT
(C). Dark web
(D). Insider threats
Answer: A

NO.289 In a phishing attack, the perpetrator is pretending to be someone in a position of power in
an effort to influence the target to click or follow the desired response. Which of the following
principles is being used?
(A). Authority
(B). Intimidation
(C). Consensus
(D). Scarcity
Answer: B

NO.290 A security analyst is reviewing the vulnerability scan report for a web server following an
incident. The vulnerability that was used to exploit the server is present in historical vulnerability scan
reports, and a patch is available for the vulnerability. Which of the following is the MOST likely cause
?
Answer: A

NO.291 A company is concerned about individuals dnvmg a car into the building to gam access
Which of the following security controls would work BEST to prevent this from happening?
(A). Bollard
(B). Camera
(C). Alarms
(D). Signage
(E). Access control vestibule
Answer: A

A bollard would work best to prevent individuals from driving a car into the building. A bollard is a
short, vertical post that can be used to block vehicles from entering a designated area. It is
specifically designed to stop cars from crashing into buildings or other structures.
NO.292 A security analyst needs to be proactive in understand the types of attacks that could
potentially target the company's execute. Which of the following intelligence sources should to
security analyst review?
(A). Vulnerability feeds
(B). Trusted automated exchange of indicator information
(C). Structured threat information expression
(D). Industry information-sharing and collaboration groups
Answer: D

NO.293 As part of a security compliance assessment, an auditor performs automated vulnerability
scans. In addition, which of the following should the auditor do to complete the assessment?
(A). User behavior analysis
(B). Packet captures
(C). Configuration reviews
(D). Log analysis
Answer: D

A vulnerability scanner is essentially doing that. It scans every part of your network configuration that
it can, and determines if known vulnerabilities are known at any point of that.
NO.294 A network engineer and a security engineer are discussing ways to monitor network
operations. Which of the following is the BEST method?
(A). Disable Telnet and force SSH.
(B). Establish a continuous ping.
(C). Utilize an agentless monitor
(D). Enable SNMPv3 With passwords.
Answer: A

NO.295 Which of the following control types would be BEST to use to identify violations and
incidents?
(A). Detective
(B). Compensating
(C). Deterrent
(D). Corrective
(E). Recovery
(F). Preventive
Answer: A

NO.296 hich of the following would be MOST effective to contain a rapidly spreading attack that is
affecting a large number of organizations?
(A). Machine learning
(B). DNS sinkhole
(C). Blocklist
(D). Honeypot
Answer: C

NO.297 A systems administrator is considering different backup solutions for the IT infrastructure.
The company is looking for a solution that offers the fastest recovery time while also saving the most
amount of storage used to maintain the backups. Which of the following recovery solutions would be
the BEST option to meet these requirements?
(A). Snapshot
(B). Differential
(C). Full
(D). Tape
Answer: B

NO.298 A customer service representative reported an unusual text message that was sent to the
help desk. The message contained an unrecognized invoice number with a large balance due and a
link to click for more details. Which of the following BEST descnbes this technique?
(A). Vishing
(B). Whaling
(C). Phishing
(D). Smishing
Answer: D

NO.299 nteping a secure area requires passing though two doors, both of which require someone
who is already inside to initiate access. Which of the following types of physical security controls does
this describe?
(A). Cameras
B: Faraday cage
(B). Access control vestibule
(C). Sensors
(D). Guards
Answer: B

NO.300 After a WiFi scan of a local office was conducted, an unknown wireless signal was identified
Upon investigation, an unknown Raspberry Pi device was found connected to an Ethernet port using
a single connection. Which of the following BEST describes the purpose of this device?
Answer: C

NO.301 Which of the following would MOST likely support the integrity of a voting machine?
(A). Asymmetric encryption
(B). Blockchain
(C). Transport Layer Security
(D). Perfect forward secrecy
Answer: D

NO.302 An organization wants to implement a biometric system with the highest likelihood that an
unauthorized user will be denied access. Which of the following should the organization use to
compare biometric solutions?
(A). FRR
(B). Difficulty of use
(C). Cost
(D). FAR
(E). CER
Answer: A

NO.303 An information security policy states that separation of duties is required for all highly
sensitive database changes that involve customers' financial dat a. Which of the following will this be
BEST to prevent?
(A). Least privilege
(B). An insider threat
(C). Adata breach
(D). A change control violation
Answer: B

NO.304 To reduce costs and overhead, an organization wants to move from an on-premises email
solution to a cloud-based email solution. At this time, no other services will be moving. Which of the
following cloud models would BEST meet the needs of the organization?
(A). MaaS
(B). laaS
(C). SaaS
(D). PaaS
Answer: D

NO.305 Which of the following isa risk that is specifically associated with hesting applications iin the
public cloud?
(A). Unsecured root accounts
(B). Zero day
(C). Shared tenancy
(D). Insider threat
Answer: C

NO.306 A security modern may have occurred on the desktop PC of an organization's Chief
Executive Officer (CEO) A duplicate copy of the CEO's hard drive must be stored securely to ensure
appropriate forensic processes and the chain of custody are followed. Which of the following should
be performed to accomplish this task?
(A). Install a new hard drive in the CEO's PC, and then remove the old hard drive and place it in a
tamper-evident bag
(B). Connect a write blocker to the hard drive Then leveraging a forensic workstation, utilize the dd
command m a live Linux environment to create a duplicate copy
(C). Remove the CEO's hard drive from the PC, connect to the forensic workstation, and copy all the
contents onto a remote fileshare while the CEO watches
(D). Refrain from completing a forensic analysts of the CEO's hard drive until after the incident is
confirmed, duplicating the hard drive at this stage could destroy evidence
Answer: B

"To obtain a forensically sound image from nonvolatile storage, you need to ensure that nothing you
do alters data or metadata (properties) on the source disk or file system. A write blocker assures this
process by preventing any data on the disk or volume from being changed by filtering write
commands at the driver and OS level. Data acquisition would normally proceed by attaching the
target device to a forensics workstation or field capture device equipped with a write blocker." For
purposes of knowing, https://security.opentext.com/tableau/hardware/details/t8u write blockers
like this are the most popular hardware blockers
NO.307 Which of the following involves the inclusion of code in the main codebase as soon as it is
written?
(A). Continuous monitoring
(B). Continuous deployment
(C). Continuous Validation
(D). Continuous integration
Answer: D

NO.308 An end user reports a computer has been acting slower than normal for a few weeks. During
an investigation, an analyst determines the system is sending the user's email address and a ten-digit
number to an IP address once a day. The only recent log entry regarding the user's computer is the
following:
Which of the following is the MOST likely cause of the issue?
(A). The end user purchased and installed a PUP from a web browser
(B). A bot on the computer is brute forcing passwords against a website
(C). A hacker is attempting to exfiltrate sensitive data
(D). Ransomware is communicating with a command-and-control server
Answer: A

NO.309 A startup company is using multiple SaaS and IaaS platforms to stand up a corporate
infrastructure and build out a customer-facing web application. Which of the following solutions
would be BEST to provide security, manageability, and visibility into the platforms?
(A). SIEM
(B). DLP
(C). CASB
(D). SWG
Answer: C

NO.310 An application developer accidentally uploaded a company's code-signing certificate private
key to a public web server. The company is concerned about malicious use of its certificate. Which of
the following should the company do FIRST?
(A). Delete the private key from the repository.
(B). Verify the public key is not exposed as well.
(C). Update the DLP solution to check for private keys.
(D). Revoke the code-signing certificate.
Answer: A

We need to revoke the code-signing certificate as this is the most secure way to ensure that the
comprised key wont be used by attackers. Usually there are bots crawking all over repos searching
this kind of human errors.
NO.311 Which of the following is a known security nsk associated with data archives that contain
financial information?
(A). Data can become a liability if archived longer than required by regulatory guidance
(B). Data must be archived off-site to avoid breaches and meet business requirements
(C). Companies are prohibited from providing archived data to e-discovery requests
(D). Unencrypted archives should be preserved as long as possible and encrypted
Answer: A

NO.312 An employee's company account was used in a data breach Interviews with the employee
revealed:
* The employee was able to avoid changing passwords by using a previous password again.
* The account was accessed from a hostile, foreign nation, but the employee has never traveled to
any other countries.
Which of the following can be implemented to prevent these issues from reoccuring? (Select TWO)
(A). Geographic dispersal
(B). Password complexity
(C). Password history
(D). Geotagging
(E). Password lockout
(F). Geofencing
Answer: B,E

NO.313 Which of the following scenarios BEST describes a risk reduction technique?
(A). A security control objective cannot be met through a technical change, so the company
purchases insurance and is no longer concerned about losses from data breaches.
(B). A security control objective cannot be met through a technical change, so the company
implements a policy to train users on a more secure method of operation.
(C). A security control objective cannot be met through a technical change, so the company changes
as method of operation
(D). A security control objective cannot be met through a technical change, so the Chief Information
Officer (CIO) decides to sign off on the risk.
Answer: B

NO.314 An organization wants to implement a third factor to an existing multifactor authentication.
The organization already uses a smart card and password. Which of the following would meet the
organization's needs for a third factor?
(A). Date of birth
(B). Fingerprints
(C). PIN
(D). TPM
Answer: B

NO.315 An organization recently recovered from a data breach. During the root cause analysis, the
organization determined the source of the breach to be a personal cell phone that had been reported
lost. Which of the following solutions should the organization implement to reduce the likelihood of
future data breaches?
(A). MDM
(B). MAM
(C). VDI
(D). DLP
Answer: A

NO.316 An organization is having difficulty correlating events from its individual AV, EDR. DLP. SWG,
WAF, MDM. HIPS. and CASB systems. Which of the following Is the BEST way to improve the
situation?
(A). Remove expensive systems that generate few alerts,
(B). Modify the systems to alert only on critical issues.
(C). Utilize a SIEM to centralize logs and dashboards.
(D). implement a new syslog/NetFlow appliance.
Answer: B

NO.317 A security administrator is working on a solution to protect passwords stored in a database
against rainbow table attacks Which of the following should the administrator consider?
(A). Hashing
(B). Salting
(C). Lightweight cryptography
(D). Steganography
Answer: B

NO.318 Which of the following would satisfy three-factor authentication?
(A). Password, retina scanner, and NFC card
(B). Password, fingerprint scanner, and retina scanner
(C). Password, hard token, and NFC card
(D). Fingerpnint scanner, hard token, and retina scanner
Answer: C

NO.319 A company needs to validate its updated incident response plan using a real-world scenario
that will test decision points and relevant incident response actions without interrupting daily
operations. Which of the following would BEST meet the company's requirements?
(A). Red-team exercise
(B). Capture-the-flag exercise
(C). Tabletop exercise
(D). Phishing exercise
Answer: C

NO.320 A SOC operator is receiving continuous alerts from multiple Linux systems indicating that
unsuccessful SSH attempts to a functional user ID have been attempted on each one of them in a
short period of time. Which of the following BEST explains this behavior?
Answer: B

Password Spraying is a variant of what is known as a brute force attack. In a traditional brute force
attack, the perpetrator attempts to gain unauthorized access to a single account by guessing the
password "repeatedly" in a very short period of time.
NO.321 A company wants the ability to restrict web access and monitor the websites that
employees visit. Which of the following would BEST meet these requirements?
(A). internet proxy
(B). VPN
(C). WAF
(D). Firewall
Answer: C

NO.322 Which of the following stores data directly on devices with limited processing and storage
capacity?
(A). Thin client
(B). Containers
(C). Edge
(D). Hybrid cloud
Answer: A

NO.323 An engineer needs to deploy a security measure to identify and prevent data tampering
within the enterprise. Which of the following will accomplish this goal?
(A). Antivirus
(B). IPS.
(C). FTP
(D). FIM
Answer: D

NO.324 A security analyst is reviewing information regarding recent vulnerabilities. Which of the
following will the analyst MOST likely consult to validate which platforms have been affected?
(A). SINT
(B). SIEM
(C). CVSS
(D). CVE
Answer: D

NO.325 A security analyst has identified malv/are spreading through the corporate network and has
activated the CSIRT Which of the following should the analyst do NEXT? A
(A). Review how the malware was introduced to the network
(B). Attempt to quarantine all infected hosts to limit further spread
(C). Create help desk tickets to get infected systems reimaged
(D). Update all endpomt antivirus solutions with the latest updates
Answer: C

NO.326 A user recent an SMS on a mobile phone that asked for bank delays. Which of the following
social-engineering techniques was used in this case?
(A). SPIM
(B). Vishing
(C). Spear phishing
(D). Smishing
Answer: D

NO.327 A security engineer obtained the following output from a threat intelligence source that
recently performed an attack on the company's server:
Which of the following BEST describes this kind of attack?
(A). Directory traversal
(B). SQL injection
(C). API
(D). Request forgery
Answer: D

NO.328 Which of the following controls is used to make an organization initially aware of a data
compromise?
(A). Protective
(B). Preventative
(C). Corrective
(D). Detective
Answer: D

https://purplesec.us/security-controls/
NO.329 Which of the following would satisfy three-factor authentication requirements?
(A). Password, PIN, and physical token
(B). PIN, fingerprint scan, and ins scan
(C). Password, fingerprint scan, and physical token
(D). PIN, physical token, and ID card
Answer: C

Three-factor authentication combines three types of authentication methods: something you know
(password), something you have (physical token), and something you are (fingerprint scan). Option C
satisfies these requirements, as it uses a password (something you know), a physical token
(something you have), and a fingerprint scan (something you are) for authentication.
Reference:
Note: There could be other options as well that could satisfy the three-factor authentication
requirements as per the organization's security policies.
NO.330 A security analyst has received an alert about being sent via email. The analyst's Chief
information Security Officer (CISO) has made it clear that PII must be handle with extreme care From
which of the following did the alert MOST likely originate?
(A). S/MIME
(B). DLP
(C). IMAP
(D). HIDS
Answer: B

Network-based DLP monitors outgoing data looking for sensitive data. Network-based DLP systems
monitor outgoing email to detect and block unauthorized data transfers and monitor data stored in
the cloud.
NO.331 A system administrator needs to implement an access control scheme that will allow an
object's access policy be determined by its owner. Which of the following access control schemes
BEST fits the requirements?
(A). Role-based access control
(B). Discretionary access control
(C). Mandatory access control
(D). Attribute-based access control
Answer: B

Discretionary access control (DAC) is a model of access control based on access being determined "by
the owner" of the resource in question. The owner of the resource can decide who does and does not
have access, and exactly what access they are allowed to have.
NO.332 When planning to build a virtual environment, an administrator need to achieve the
following,
* Establish polices in Limit who can create new VMs
* Allocate resources according to actual utilization'
* Require justification for requests outside of the standard requirements.
* Create standardized categories based on size and resource requirements Which of the following is
the administrator MOST likely trying to do?
(A). Implement IaaS replication
(B). Product against VM escape
(C). Deploy a PaaS
(D). Avoid VM sprawl
Answer: D

NO.333 An organization is building backup server rooms in geographically diverse locations The
Chief Information Security Officer implemented a requirement on the project that states the new
hardware cannot be susceptible to the same vulnerabilities in the existing server room Which of the
following should the systems engineer consider?
(A). Purchasing hardware from different vendors
(B). Migrating workloads to public cloud infrastructure
(C). Implementing a robust patch management solution
(D). Designing new detective security controls
Answer: A

NO.334 During an incident, a company's CIRT determines it is necessary to observe the continued
network-based transactions between a callback domain and the malware running on an enterprise
PC. Which of the following techniques would be BEST to enable this activity while reducing the nsk of
lateral spread and the nsk that the adversary would notice any changes?
(A). Physically move the PC to a separate Internet point of presence.
(B). Create and apply microsegmentation rules,
(C). Emulate the malware in a heavily monitored DMZ segment
(D). Apply network blacklisting rules for the adversary domain
Answer: C

NO.335 Law enforcement officials sent a company a notification that states electronically stored
information and paper documents cannot be destroyed. Which of the following explains this process
?
(A). Data breach notification
(B). Accountability
(C). Legal hald
(D). Chain of custody
Answer: C

NO.336 A security architect is implementing a new email architecture for a company. Due to
security concerns, the Chief Information Security Officer would like the new architecture to support
email encryption, as well as provide for digital signatures. Which of the following should the architect
implement?
(A). TOP
(B). IMAP
(C). HTTPS
(D). S/MIME
Answer: D

NO.337 A small company that does not have security staff wants to improve its security posture.
Which of the following would BEST assist the company?
(A). MSSP
(B). SOAR
(C). IaaS
(D). PaaS
Answer: B

NO.338 A cybersecurity department purchased o new PAM solution. The team is planning to
randomize the service account credentials of the Windows server first. Which of the following would
be the BEST method to increase the security on the Linux server?
(A). Randomize the shared credentials
(B). Use only guest accounts to connect.
(C). Use SSH keys and remove generic passwords
(D). Remove all user accounts.
Answer: C

NO.339 Which of the following utilize a subset of real data and are MOST likely to be used to assess
the features and functions of a system and how it interacts or performs from an end user's
perspective against defined test cases? (Select TWO).
(A). A Production
(B). Test
(C). Research and development
(D). PoC
(E). UAT
(F). SDLC
Answer: B,E

NO.340 The SOC for a large MSSP is meeting to discuss the lessons learned from a recent incident
that took much too long to resolve This type of incident has become more common in recent weeks
and is consuming large amounts of the analysts' time due to manual tasks being performed Which of
the following solutions should the SOC consider to BEST improve its response time?
Answer: C

SOAR (Security Orchestration, Automation, and Response) Can use either playbook or runbook. It
assists in collecting threat related data from a range of sources and automate responses to low level
threats. (frees up some of the CSIRT time)
NO.341 Which of the following prevents an employee from seeing a colleague who is visting an
inappropriate website?
(A). Job roration policy
(B). NDA
(C). AUP
(D). Separation of duties policy
Answer: C

NO.342 A user recently attended an exposition and received some digital promotional materials The
user later noticed blue boxes popping up and disappearing on the computer, and reported receiving
several spam emails, which the user did not open Which of the following is MOST likely the cause of
the reported issue?
(A). There was a drive-by download of malware
(B). The user installed a cryptominer
(C). The OS was corrupted
(D). There was malicious code on the USB drive
Answer: D

NO.343 After a phishing scam fora user's credentials, the red team was able to craft payload to
deploy on a server. The attack allowed the installation of malicious software that initiates a new
remote session Which of the following types of attacks has occurred?
(A). Privilege escalation
(B). Session replay
(C). Application programming interface
(D). Directory traversal
Answer: A

NO.344 An attacker is attempting to harvest user credentials on a client's wedsite, A security analyst
notices multiple attempts of rencom usemames and passwords. When the analyst types in a random
username and password, the logon screen displays the following message:
The username you entered does not exist.
Which of the following should the analyst recommend be enabled?
(A). Input validation
(B). Obfuscation
(C). Error handling
(D). Username lockout
Answer: B

NO.345 The website http://companywebsite.com requires users to provide personal information
including security responses, for registration. which of the following would MOST likely cause a date
breach?
(A). LACK OF INPUT VALIDATION
(B). OPEN PERMISSIONS
(C). UNSCECURE PROTOCOL
(D). MISSING PATCHES
Answer: A

NO.346 A security analyst notices several attacks are being blocked by the NIPS but does not see
anything on the boundary firewall logs. The attack seems to have been thwarted Which of the
following resiliency techniques was applied to the network to prevent this attack?
(A). NIC Teaming
(B). Port mirroring
(C). Defense in depth
(D). High availability
(E). Geographic dispersal
Answer: C

NO.347 A security analyst needs to produce a document that details how a security incident
occurred, the steps that were taken for recovery, and how future incidents can be avoided. During
which of the following stages of the response process will this activity take place?
(A). Recovery
(B). Identification
(C). Lessons learned
(D). Preparation
Answer: C

NO.348 Which of the following is a detective and deterrent control against physical intrusions?
(A). Alock
(B). An alarm
(C). A fence
(D). Asign
Answer: B

NO.349 A company is considering transitioning to the cloud. The company employs individuals from
various locations around the world The company does not want to increase its on-premises
infrastructure blueprint and only wants to pay for additional compute power required. Which of the
following solutions would BEST meet the needs of the company?
(A). Private cloud
(B). Hybrid environment
(C). Managed security service provider
(D). Hot backup site
Answer: B

NO.350 Security analysts are conducting an investigation of an attack that occurred inside the
organization's network. An attacker was able to connect network traffic between workstation
throughout the network. The analysts review the following logs:
The layer 2 address table has hundred of entries similar to the ones above. Which of the following
attacks has MOST likely occurred?
(A). SQL injection
(B). DNS spoofing
(C). MAC flooding
(D). ARP poisoning
Answer: D

NO.351 A company wants to deploy PKI on its Internet-facing website. The applications that are
currently deployed are:
www.company.com (main website)
contactus.company.com (for locating a nearby location)
quotes.company.com (for requesting a price quote)
The company wants to purchase one SSL certificate that will work for all the existing applications and
any future applications that follow the same naming conventions, such as store.company.com. Which
of the following certificate types would BEST meet the requirements?
(A). SAN
(B). Wildcard
(C). Extended validation
(D). Self-signed
Answer: B

NO.352 A global pandemic is forcing a private organization to close some business units and reduce
staffing at others. Which of the following would be BEST to help the organization's executives
determine the next course of action?
(A). An incident response plan
(B). A communications plan
(C). A disaster recovery plan
(D). A business continuity plan
Answer: D

Business continuity may be defined as "the capability of an organization to continue the delivery of
products or services at pre-defined acceptable levels following a disruptive incident",[1] and business
continuity planning [2][3] (or business continuity and resiliency planning) is the process of creating
systems of prevention and recovery to deal with potential threats to a company.[4] In addition to
prevention, the goal is to enable ongoing operations before and during execution of disaster
recovery.[5] Business continuity is the intended outcome of proper execution of both business
continuity planning and disaster recovery.
NO.353 Which of the following would be BEST to establish between organizations that have agreed
cooperate and are engaged in early discussion to define the responsibilities of each party, but do not
want to establish a contractually binding agreement?
(A). An SLA
(B). AnNDA
(C). ABPA
(D). AnMOU
Answer: D

NO.354 A user reports constant lag and performance issues with the wireless network when
working at a local coffee shop. A security analyst walks the user through an installation of Wireshark
and get a five-minute pcap to analyze. The analyst observes the following output:
Which of the following attacks does the analyst MOST likely see in this packet capture?
(A). Session replay
(B). Evil twin
(C). Bluejacking
(D). ARP poisoning
Answer: B

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wi-Fi_deauthentication_attack
One of the main purposes of deauthentication used in the hacking community is to force clients to
connect to an evil twin access point which then can be used to capture network packets transferred
between the client and the access point.
NO.355 A security analyst has been tasked with creating a new WiFi network for the company. The
requirements received by the analyst are as follows:
* Must be able to differentiate between users connected to WiFi
* The encryption keys need to change routinely without interrupting the users or forcing
reauthentication
* Must be able to integrate with RADIUS
* Must not have any open SSIDs
Which of the following options BEST accommodates these requirements?
(A). WPA2-Enterprise
(B). WPA3-PSK
(C). 802.11n
(D). WPS
Answer: A

NO.356 Which of the following control Types would be BEST to use in an accounting department to
reduce losses from fraudulent transactions?
(A). Recovery
(B). Deterrent
(C). Corrective
(D). Detective
Answer: C

Corrective controls are implemented after detective controls to rectify the problem and (ideally)
prevent it from happening again.
NO.357 Aweb server administrator has redundant servers and needs to ensure failover to the
secondary server when the primary server goes down. Which of the following should the
administrator implement to avoid disruption?
(A). NIC teaming
(B). High availability
(C). Dual power supply
(D). laaS
Answer: B

NO.358 Developers are writing code and merging it into shared repositones several times a day,
where it is tested automabecally. Which of the following concepts does this BEST represent?
(A). Functional testing
(B). Stored procedures
(C). Elasticity
(D). Continuous integration
Answer: C

NO.359 Which of the following allows for functional test data to be used in new systems for testing
and training purposes to protect the read data?
(A). Data encryption
(B). Data masking
(C). Data deduplication
(D). Data minimization
Answer: B

NO.360 A ecurily analyst b concemed alout iratic initiated to he dark web fom the corporate LAN.
Which of the folowing motworks should he analyst monior?
(A). SFTP
(B). AS
(C). Tor
(D). LoC
Answer: C

NO.361 The Spread of misinformation sorrounding the outbreak of a novel on election day led to
eligible voters choosing not take risk of going to the polls.
This is an example of:
(A). Prepending
(B). An inflence campaign
(C). A watering-hole attack
(D). Itimidation
(E). Information elicition
Answer: D

NO.362 A backdoor was detected on the containerized application environment. The investigation
detected that a zero-day vulnerability was introduced when the latest container image version was
downloaded from a public registry. Which of the following is the BEST solution to prevent this type of
incident from occurring again?
(A). Enforce the use of a controlled trusted source of container images
(B). Deploy an IPS solution capable of detecting signatures of attacks targeting containers
(C). Define a vulnerability scan to assess container images before being introduced on the
environment
(D). Create a dedicated VPC for the containerized environment
Answer: D

NO.363 An organization has hired a security analyst to perform a penetration test. The analyst
captures 1Gb worth of inbound network traffic to the server and transfer the pcap back to the
machine for analysis. Which of the following tools should the analyst use to further review the pcap?
(A). Nmap
(B). cURL
(C). Netcat
(D). Wireshark
Answer: D

https://www.comparitech.com/net-admin/pcapguide/#:~:text=Packet%20Capture%20or%20PCAP%20(also,packet%20data%20from%20a%20networ
k.
NO.364 An enterpnse has hired an outside security firm to facilitate penetration testing on its
network and applications. The firm has agreed to pay for each vulnerability that ts discovered. Which
of the following BEST represents the type of testing that is being used?
(A). White-box
(B). Red-leam
(C). Bug bounty
(D). Gray-box
(E). Black-box
Answer: A

NO.365 A security researcher has aferted an organuzation that its sensifive user data was found for
sale on a website. Which af the followang should the organzabon use to inform the affected partes?
(A). A An incident response plan
(B). A communications plan
(C). A business continuity plan
(D). A disaster recovery plan
Answer: A

NO.366 After reluming from a conference, a user's laptop has been operating slower than normal
and overheating and the fans have been running constantly Dunng the diagnosis process, an
unknown piece of hardware is found connected to the laptop's motherboard Which of the following
attack vectors was exploited to install the hardware?
(A). Removable media
(B). Spear phishing
(C). Supply chain
(D). Direct access
Answer: D

NO.367 Several employees have noticed other bystanders can clearly observe a terminal where
passcodes are being entered, Which of the following can be eliminated with the use of a privacy
screen?
(A). Shoulder surfing
(B). Spear phishing
(C). Impersonation attack
(D). Card cloning
Answer: A

NO.368 A security administrator is trying to determine whether a server is vulnerable to a range of
attacks. After using a tool, the administrator obtains the following output:
Which of the following attacks was successfully implemented based on the output?
(A). Memory leak
(B). Race conditions
(C). SQL injection
(D). Directory traversal
Answer: D

NO.369 During an investigation, the incident response team discovers that multiple administrator
accounts were suspected of being compromised. The host audit logs indicate a repeated brute-force
attack on a single administrator account followed by suspicious logins from unfamiliar geographic
locations. Which of the following data sources would be BEST to use to assess the accounts impacted
by this attack?
(A). User behavior analytics
(B). Dump files
(C). Bandwidth monitors
(D). Protocol analyzer output
Answer: A

NO.370 A workwide manufacturing company has been experiencing email account compromised. In
one incident, a user logged in from the corporate office in France, but then seconds later, the same
user account attempted a login from Brazil. Which of the following account policies would BEST
prevent this type of attack?
(A). Network location
(B). Impossible travel time
(C). Geolocation
(D). Geofencing
Answer: D

NO.371 Which of the following is required in order for an IDS and a WAF to be effective on HTTPS
traffic?
(A). Hashing
(B). DNS sinkhole
(C). TLS inspection
(D). Data masking
Answer: B

NO.372 An analyst needs to set up a method for securely transferring files between systems. One of
the requirements is to authenticate the IP header and the payload. Which of the following services
would BEST meet the criteria?
(A). TLS
(B). PFS
(C). ESP
(D). AH
Answer: A

NO.373 A company is implementing BYOD and wants to ensure all users have access to the same
cloud-based services. Which of the following would BEST allow the company to meet this
requirement?
(A). laaS
(B). PasS
(C). MaaS
(D). SaaS
Answer: D

NO.374 An application owner reports suspicious activity on an internal financial application from
various internal users within the past 14 days. A security analyst notices the following:
* Financial transactions were occurring during irregular time frames and outside of business hours by
unauthorized users.
* Internal users in question were changing their passwords frequently during that time period.
* A jump box that several domain administrator users use to connect to remote devices was recently
compromised.
* The authentication method used in the environment is NTLM.
Which of the following types of attacks is MOST likely being used to gain unauthorized access?
(A). Pass-the-hash
(B). Brute-force
(C). Directory traversal
(D). Replay
Answer: A

NO.375 A network manager is concerned that business may be negatively impacted if the firewall in
its datacenter goes offline. The manager would like to implement a high availability pair to:
(A). ned that business may be negatecrease the mean time between failures.
(B). remove the single point of failure.
(C). cut down the mean time to repair,
(D). reduce the recovery time objective.
Answer: B

NO.376 A forensic analyst needs to prove that data has not been tampered with since it was
collected Which of the following methods will the analyst MOST likely use?
(A). Look for tampenng on the evidence collection bag
(B). Encrypt the collected data using asymmetric encryption
(C). Ensure proper procedures for chain of custody are being followed
(D). Calculate the checksum using a hashing algorithm
Answer: D

NO.377 A security analyst must determine if either SSH or Telnet is being used to log in to servers.
Which of the following should the analyst use?
(A). logger
(B). Metasploit
(C). tcpdump
(D). netstat
Answer: D

NO.378 The IT department's on-site developer has been with the team for many years. Each time an
application is released, the security team is able to identify multiple vulnerabilities. Which of the
following would BEST help the team ensure the application is ready to be released to production?
(A). Limit the use of third-party libraries.
(B). Prevent data exposure queries.
(C). Obfuscate the source code.
(D). Submit the application to QA before releasing it.
Answer: D

NO.379 A bank detects fraudulent activity on user's account. The user confirms transactions
completed yesterday on the bank's website at https:/Awww.company.com. A security analyst then
examines the user's Internet usage logs and observes the following output:
Which of the following has MOST likely occurred?
(A). Replay attack
(B). SQL injection
(C). SSL stripping
(D). Race conditions
Answer: A

NO.380 An organization is migrating several SaaS applications that support SSO. The security
manager wants to ensure the migration is completed securely. Which of the following should the
organization consider before implementation? (Select TWO).
(A). The back-end directory source
(B). The identity federation protocol
(C). The hashing method
(D). The encryption method
(E). The registration authority
(F). The certificate authority
Answer: C,F

NO.381 To further secure a company's email system, an administrator is adding public keys to DNS
records in the company's domain Which of the following is being used?
(A). PFS
(B). SPF
(C). DMARC
(D). DNSSEC
Answer: B

NO.382 A company recently experienced a significant data loss when proprietary Information was
leaked to a competitor. The company took special precautions by using proper labels; however, email
filter logs do not have any record of the incident. An Investigation confirmed the corporate network
was not breached, but documents were downloaded from an employee's COPE tablet and passed to
the competitor via cloud storage. Which of the following is the BEST mitigation strategy to prevent
this from happening in the future?
(A). User training
(B). CASB
(C). MDM
(D). EDR
Answer: D

NO.383 An IT security manager requests a report on company information that is publicly available.
The manager's concern is that malicious actors will be able to access the data without engaging in
active reconnaissance. Which of the following is the MOST efficient approach to perform the
analysis?
(A). Provide a domain parameter to tool.
(B). Check public DNS entries using dnsenum.
(C). Perform a vulnerability scan targeting a public company's IR
(D). Execute nmap using the options: scan all ports and sneaky mode.
Answer: D

NO.384 The Chief information Security Officer wants to prevent exfilitration of sensitive information
from employee cell phones when using public USB power charging stations. Which of the following
would be the Best solution to implement?
(A). DLP
(B). USB data blocker
(C). USB OTG
(D). Disabling USB ports
Answer: C

NO.385 A Chief Security Officer (CSO) is concerned that cloud-based services are not adequately
protected from advanced threats and malware The CSO believes there is a high risk that a data
breach could occur in the near future due to the lack of detective and preventive controls Which of
the following should be implemented to BEST address the CSO's concerns? {Select TWO)
(A). AWAF
(B). ACASB
(C). An NG-SWG
(D). Segmentation
(E). Encryption
(F). Containerization
Answer: B,F

NO.386 A company wants to improve end users experiences when they tog in to a trusted partner
website The company does not want the users to be issued separate credentials for the partner
website Which of the following should be implemented to allow users to authenticate using their
own credentials to log in to the trusted partner's website?
(A). Directory service
(B). AAA server
(C). Federation
(D). Multifactor authentication
Answer: C

NO.387 A security analyst is reviewing application logs to determine the source of a breach and
locates the following log:
Which Of the following has been observed?
(A). DLL Injection
(B). API attack
(C). SQLI
(D). XSS
Answer: C

NO.388 A network administrator has been alerted that web pages are experiencing long load times.
After determining it is not a routing or DNS issue, the administrator logs in to the router, runs a
command, and receives the following output:
Which of the following is the router experiencing?
(A). DDoS attack
(B). Memory leak
(C). Buffer overflow
(D). Resource exhaustion
Answer: D

NO.389 A security analyst is reviewing the following command-line output:
Which of the following Is the analyst observing?
(A). IGMP spoofing
(B). URL redirection
(C). MAG address cloning
(D). DNS poisoning
Answer: C

NO.390 A company's Chief Information Office (CIO) is meeting with the Chief Information Security
Officer (CISO) to plan some activities to enhance the skill levels of the company's developers. Which
of the following would be MOST suitable for training the developers'?
(A). A capture-the-flag competition
(B). A phishing simulation
(C). Physical security training
(D). Baste awareness training
Answer: B

NO.391 An n that has a large number of mobile devices is explonng enhanced secunty controls to
manage unauthonzed access if a device is lost or stolen. Specifically, a mobile devices are mor than
dmi (4 8km) from the busding, the management team would like to have the secunty team alerted
and server resources restricted on those devices. Which of the following controls should the
organization implement?
(A). Geofencing
(B). Lockout
(C). Near-field communication
(D). GPS tagging
Answer: A

NO.392 Which of the following BEST helps to demonstrate integrity during a forensic investigation?
(A). Event logs
(B). Encryption
(C). Hashing
(D). Snapshots
Answer: C

NO.393 A business operations manager is concerned that a PC that is critical to business operations
will have a costly hardware failure soon. The manager is looking for options to continue business
operations without incurring large costs. Which of the following would mitigate the manager's
concerns?
(A). Implement a full system upgrade
(B). Perform a physical-to-virtual migration
(C). Install uninterruptible power supplies
(D). Purchase cybersecurity insurance
Answer: B

NO.394 The CSIRT is reviewing the lessons learned from a recent incident. A worm was able to
spread unhindered throughout the network and infect a large number of computers and servers.
Which of the following recommendations would be BEST to mitigate the impacts of a similar incident
in the future?
(A). Install a NIDS device at the boundary.
(B). Segment the network with firewalls.
(C). Update all antivirus signatures daily.
(D). Implement application blacklisting
Answer: B

NO.395 An annual information security assessment has revealed that several OS-level configurations
are not in compliance due to outdated hardening standards the company is using. Which of the
following would be BEST to use to update and reconfigure the OS-level security configurations?
(A). CIS benchmarks
(B). GDPR guidance
(C). Regional regulations
(D). ISO 27001 standards
Answer: A

https://www.beyondtrust.com/resources/glossary/systems-hardening
NO.396 A security analyst discovers several .jpg photos from a cellular phone during a forensics
investigation involving a compromised system. The analyst runs a forensics tool to gather file
metadat a. Which of the following would be part of the images if all the metadata is still intact?
(A). The GPS location
(B). When the file was deleted
(C). The total number of print jobs
(D). The number of copies made
Answer: A

NO.397 Certain users are reporting their accounts are being used to send unauthorized emails and
conduct suspicious activities. After further investigation, a security analyst notices the following:
* All users share workstations throughout the day.
* Endpoint protection was disabled on several workstations throughout the network.
* Travel times on logins from the affected users are impossible.
* Sensitive data is being uploaded to external sites.
* All user account passwords were forced to be reset and the issue continued.
Which of the following attacks is being used to compromise the user accounts?
(A). Brute-force
(B). Keylogger
(C). Dictionary
(D). Rainbow
Answer: B

NO.398 The facilities supervisor for a government agency is concerned about unauthorized access to
environmental systems in the event the staff WiFi network is breached. Which of the blowing would
BEST address this security concern?
(A). install a smart meter on the staff WiFi.
(B). Place the environmental systems in the same DHCP scope as the staff WiFi.
(C). Implement Zigbee on the staff WiFi access points.
(D). Segment the staff WiFi network from the environmental systems network.
Answer: B

NO.399 The IT department at a university is concerned about professors placing servers on the
university network in an attempt to bypass security controls. Which of the following BEST represents
this type of threat?
(A). A script kiddie
(B). Shadow IT
(C). Hacktivism
(D). White-hat
Answer: B

NO.400 Which of the following would be the BEST resource for a software developer who is looking
to improve secure coding practices for web applications?
Answer: A

NO.401 A systems analyst determines the source of a high number of connections to a web server
that were initiated by ten different IP addresses that belong to a network block in a specific country.
Which of the following techniques will the systems analyst MOST likely implement to address this
issue?
(A). Content filter
(B). SIEM
(C). Firewall rules
(D). DLP
Answer: B

NO.402 A developer is building a new portal to deliver single-pane-of-glass management capabilities
to customers with multiple firewalls. To Improve the user experience, the developer wants to
implement an authentication and authorization standard that uses security tokens that contain
assertions to pass user Information between nodes. Which of the following roles should the
developer configure to meet these requirements? (Select TWO).
(A). Identity processor
(B). Service requestor
(C). Identity provider
(D). Service provider
(E). Tokenized resource
(F). Notarized referral
Answer: B,C

NO.403 A company recently transitioned to a strictly BYOD culture due to the cost of replacing lost
or damaged corporate-owned mobile devices. Which of the following technologies would be BEST to
balance the BYOD culture while also protecting the company's data?
(A). Containerization
(B). Geofencing
(C). Full-disk encryption
(D). Remote wipe
Answer: C

NO.404 A retail executive recently accepted a job with a major competitor. The following week, a
security analyst reviews the security logs and identifies successful logon attempts to access the
departed executive's accounts. Which of the following security practices would have addressed the
issue?
(A). A non-disclosure agreement
(B). Least privilege
(C). An acceptable use policy
(D). Ofboarding
Answer: D

NO.405 The president of a regional bank likes to frequently provide SOC tours to potential investors.
Which of the following policies BEST reduces the risk of malicious activity occurring after a tour?
(A). Password complexity
(B). Acceptable use
(C). Access control
(D). Clean desk
Answer: D

NO.406 A recently discovered zero-day exploit utilizes an unknown vulnerability in the SMB network
protocol to rapidly infect computers. Once infected, computers are encrypted and held for ransom.
Which of the following would BEST prevent this attack from reoccurring?
(A). Configure the perimeter firewall to deny inbound external connections to SMB ports.
(B). Ensure endpoint detection and response systems are alerting on suspicious SMB connections.
(C). Deny unauthenticated users access to shared network folders.
(D). Verify computers are set to install monthly operating system, updates automatically.
Answer: A

NO.407 Which of the following should a data owner require all personnel to sign to legally protect
intellectual property?
(A). An NDA
(B). An AUP
(C). An ISA
(D). An MOU
Answer: D

NO.408 Which of the following would detect intrusions at the perimeter of an airport?
(A). Signage
(B). Fencing
(C). Motion sensors
(D). Lighting
(E). Bollards
Answer: C

NO.409 Phishing and spear-phishing attacks have been occurring more frequently against a
company's staff. Which of the following would MOST likely help mitigate this issue?
(A). DNSSEC and DMARC
(B). DNS query logging
(C). Exact mail exchanger records in the DNS
(D). The addition of DNS conditional forwarders
Answer: C

NO.410 A user's account is constantly being locked out. Upon further review, @ security analyst
found the following in the SIEM:
Which of the following describes what is occurring?
(A). An attacker is utilizing a password-spraying attack against the account
(B). An attacker is utilizing a dictionary attack against the account
(C). An attacker is utilizing a brute-force attack against the account
(D). An attacker is utilizing a rainbow table attack against the account
Answer: B

NO.411 Which of the following environments can be stood up in a short period of time, utilizes
either dummy data or actual data, and is used to demonstrate and model system capabilities and
functionality for a fixed, agreed-upon duration of time?
(A). PoC
(B). Production
(C). Test
(D). Development
Answer: A

NO.412 A security analyst is investigation an incident that was first reported as an issue connecting
to network shares and the internet, While reviewing logs and tool output, the analyst sees the
following:
Which of the following attacks has occurred?
(A). IP conflict
(B). Pass-the-hash
(C). MAC flooding
(D). Directory traversal
(E). ARP poisoning
Answer: E

https://www.radware.com/security/ddos-knowledge-center/ddospedia/arp-poisoning
NO.413 While reviewing pcap data, a network security analyst is able to locate plaintext usernames
and passwords being sent from workstations to network witches. Which of the following is the
security analyst MOST likely observing?
(A). SNMP traps
(B). A Telnet session
(C). An SSH connection
(D). SFTP traffic
Answer: B

NO.414 The Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) has decided to reorganize security staff to
concentrate on incident response and to outsource outbound Internet URL categorization and
filtering to an outside company. Additionally, the CISO would like this solution to provide the same
protections even when a company laptop or mobile device is away from a home office. Which of the
following should the CISO choose?
(A). CASB
(B). Next-generation SWG
(C). NGFW
(D). Web-application firewall
Answer: B

NO.415 The Chief Financial Officer (CFO) of an insurance company received an email from Ann, the
company's Chief Executive Officer (CEO), requesting a transfer of $10,000 to an account. The email
states Ann is on vacation and has lost her purse, containing cash and credit cards. Which of the
following social-engineering techniques is the attacker using?
(A). Phishing
(B). Whaling
(C). Type squatting
(D). Pharming
Answer: B

NO.416 Which of the following is the BEST example of a cost-effective physical control to enforce a
USB removable media restriction policy?
(A). Putting security/antitamper tape over USB ports logging the port numbers and regularly
inspecting the ports
(B). Implementing a GPO that will restrict access to authorized USB removable media and regularly
verifying that it is enforced
(C). Placing systems into locked key-controlled containers with no access to the USB ports
(D). Installing an endpoint agent to detect connectivity of USB and removable media
Answer: B

NO.417 Users are presented with a banner upon each login to a workstation. The banner mentions
that users are not entitled to any reasonable expectation of privacy and access is for authorized
personnel only.
In order to proceed past that banner. users must click the OK button. Which of the following is this an
example of?
(A). AUP
(B). NDA
(C). SLA
(D). MOU
Answer: A

NO.418 A technician needs to prevent data loss in a laboratory. The laboratory is not connected to
any external networks. Which of the following methods would BEST prevent the exfiltration of data?
(Select TWO).
(A). VPN
(B). Drive encryption
(C). Network firewall
(D). File level encryption
(E). USB blocker
(F). MFA
Answer: B,E

NO.419 Which of the following would produce the closet experience of responding to an actual
incident response scenario?
(A). Lessons learned
(B). Simulation
(C). Walk-through
(D). Tabletop
Answer: B

NO.420 A commercial cyber-threat intelligence organization observes IoCs across a variety of
unrelated customers.
Prior to releasing specific threat intelligence to other paid subscribers, the organization is MOST likely
obligated by contracts to:
(A). perform attribution to specific APTs and nation-state actors.
(B). anonymize any PII that is observed within the IoC data.
(C). add metadata to track the utilization of threat intelligence reports.
(D). assist companies with impact assessments based on the observed data
Answer: B

NO.421 A security analyst is responding to an alert from the SIEM. The alert states that malware was
discovered on a host and was not automatically deleted. Which of the following would be BEST for
the analyst to perform?
(A). Add a deny-all rule to that host in the network ACL
(B). Implement a network-wide scan for other instances of the malware.
(C). Quarantine the host from other parts of the network
(D). Revoke the client's network access certificates
Answer: C

NO.422 After consulting with the Chief Risk Officer (CRO). a manager decides to acquire
cybersecurity insurance for the company Which of the following risk management strategies is the
manager adopting?
(A). Risk acceptance
(B). Risk avoidance
(C). Risk transference
(D). Risk mitigation
Answer: C

NO.423 An attacker replaces a digitally signed document with another version that foes unnoticed.
Upon reviewing the document's contents, the author notices some additional verbaige that was not
originally in the document but can't validate an integrity issue. Which of the following attacks was
used?
(A). Cryptomalware
(B). Prepending
(C). Collision
(D). Phising
Answer: C

NO.424 A company ts required to continue using legacy softveare to support a critical serwce.
Whech of the folowing BEST explans a reek of this prachce?
(A). Default system configuraton
(B). Unsecure protocols
(C). Lack of vendor support
(D). Weak encryption
Answer: B

NO.425 During a trial, a judge determined evidence gathered from a hard drive was not admissible.
Which of the following BEST explains this reasoning?
(A). The forensic investigator forgot to run a checksum on the disk image after creation
(B). The chain of custody form did not note time zone offsets between transportation regions
(C). The computer was turned off. and a RAM image could not be taken at the same time
(D). The hard drive was not properly kept in an antistatic bag when rt was moved
Answer: A

NO.426 A security administrator has discovered that workstations on the LAN are becoming infected
with malware. The cause of the infections appears to be users receiving phishing emails that are
bypassing the current email-filtering technology. As a result, users are being tricked into clicking on
malicious URLs, as no internal controls currently exist in the environment to evaluate their safety.
Which of the following would be BEST to implement to address the issue?
(A). Forward proxy
(B). HIDS
(C). Awareness training
(D). A jump server
(E). IPS
Answer: D

NO.427 A company is providing security awareness training regarding the importance of not
forwarding social media messages from unverified sources. Which of the following risks would this
training help to prevent?
(A). Hoaxes
(B). SPIMs
(C). Identity fraud
(D). Credential harvesting
Answer: A

Hoax
A hoax is a falsehood deliberately fabricated to masquerade as the truth. It is distinguishable from
errors in observation or judgment, rumors, urban legends, pseudo sciences, and April Fools' Day
events that are passed along in good faith by believers or as jokes.
Identity theft
Identity theft occurs when someone uses another person's personal identifying information, like their
name, identifying number, or credit card number, without their permission, to commit fraud or other
crimes. The term identity theft was coined in 1964. Identity fraud (also known as identity theft or
crime) involves someone using another individual's personal information without consent, often to
obtain a benefit.
Credential Harvesting
Credential Harvesting (or Account Harvesting) is the use of MITM attacks, DNS poisoning, phishing,
and other vectors to amass large numbers of credentials (username / password combinations) for
reuse.
NO.428 An enterprise has hired an outside security firm to conduct penetration testing on its
network and applications.
The firm has only been given the documentation available to the customers of the applications.
Which of the following BEST represents the type of testing that will occur?
(A). Bug bounty
(B). Black-box
(C). Gray-box
(D). White-box
Answer: A

NO.429 Which of the following scenarios would make a DNS sinkhole effective in thwarting an
attack?
(A). An attacker is sniffing traffic to port 53, and the server is managed using unencrypted usernames
and passwords.
(B). An organization is experiencing excessive traffic on port 53 and suspects an attacker is trying to
DoS the domain name server.
(C). Malware trying to resolve an unregistered domain name to determine if it is running in an
isolated sandbox
(D). Routing tables have been compromised, and an attacker is rerouting traffic to malicious websites
Answer: A

NO.430 A user contacts the help desk to report the following:
Two days ago, a pop-up browser window prompted the user for a name and password after
connecting to the corporate wireless SSID. This had never happened before, but the user entered the
information as requested.
The user was able to access the Internet but had trouble accessing the department share until the
next day.
The user is now getting notifications from the bank about unauthorized transactions.
Which of the following attack vectors was MOST likely used in this scenario?
Answer: A

NO.431 An organization just experienced a major cyberattack modem. The attack was well
coordinated sophisticated and highly skilled. Which of the following targeted the organization?
(A). Shadow IT
(B). An insider threat
(C). A hacktivist
(D). An advanced persistent threat
Answer: D

https://www.imperva.com/learn/application-security/apt-advanced-persistent-threat/
https://csrc.nist.gov/glossary/term/advanced_persistent_threat
NO.432 The Chief Executive Officer announced a new partnership with a strategic vendor and asked
the Chief Information Security Officer to federate user digital identities using SAML-based protocols.
Which of the following will this enable?
(A). SSO
(B). MFA
(C). PKI
(D). OLP
Answer: A

NO.433 Which of the following is the MOST effective control against zero-day vulnerabilities?
(A). Network segmentation
(B). Patch management
(C). Intrusion prevention system
(D). Multiple vulnerability scanners
Answer: A

NO.434 hich of the folowing would be BEST for a technician to review to determing the total figk an
organizalion can bear when assessing a "cloud-firet" adoption sraiegy?
(A). Risk matrix
(B). Risk tolerance
C Risk register
(C). Risk appetite
Answer: B

NO.435 A company recently experienced an attack in which a malicious actor was able to exfiltrate
data by cracking stolen passwords, using a rainbow table the sensitive dat a. Which of the following
should a security engineer do to prevent such an attack in the future?
(A). Use password hashing.
(B). Enforce password complexity.
(C). Implement password salting.
(D). Disable password reuse.
Answer: B

NO.436 A major Clotting company recently lost 4 aege amount of propeetary wvformaton The
security olficer must fied a solution t ensure frs never happens agan tht 8 the BEST tachrycal
implementation tp prevent thes fom happening agai?
(A). Configure OLP soktons
(B). Disable peer-to-peer sharing
(C). Enable role-based access controls.
(D). Mandate job rotabon
(E). Implement content ters
Answer: A

NO.437 An organization is planning to roll out a new mobile device policy and issue each employee a
new laptop, These laptops would access the users' corporate operating system remotely and allow
them to use the laptops for purposes outside of their job roles. Which of the following deployment
models is being utilized?
(A). MDM and application management
(B). BYOO and containers
(C). COPE and VDI
(D). CYOD and VMs
Answer: C

NO.438 A company Is planning to install a guest wireless network so visitors will be able to access
the Internet. The stakeholders want the network to be easy to connect to so time is not wasted
during meetings. The WAPs are configured so that power levels and antennas cover only the
conference rooms where visitors will attend meetings. Which of the following would BEST protect the
company's Internal wireless network against visitors accessing company resources?
(A). Configure the guest wireless network to be on a separate VLAN from the company's internal
wireless network
(B). Change the password for the guest wireless network every month.
(C). Decrease the power levels of the access points for the guest wireless network.
(D). Enable WPA2 using 802.1X for logging on to the guest wireless network.
Answer: A

NO.439 n attack relies on an end user visiting a website the end user would typically visit; however,
the site is compromised and uses vulnerabilities in the end user's browser to deploy malicious
software. Which of the following types of attack does this describe?
(A). Smishing
(B). Whaling
(C). Watering hole
(D). Phishing
Answer: C

NO.440 The board of doctors at a company contracted with an insurance firm to limit the
organization's liability. Which of the following risk management practices does the BEST describe?
Answer: A

NO.441 The manager who is responsible for a data set has asked a security engineer to apply
encryption to the data on a hard disk. The security engineer is an example of a:
(A). data controller.
(B). data owner
(C). data custodian.
(D). data processor
Answer: D

NO.442 Which of the following uses six initial steps that provide basic control over system security
by including hardware and software inventory, vulnerability management, and continuous
monitoring to minimize risk in all network environments?
(A). ISO 27701
(B). The Center for Internet Security
(C). SSAE SOC 2
(D). NIST Risk Management Framework
Answer: B

NO.443 A security analyst reports a company policy volation ina case in which a large amount of
sensitive data is being downloaded after hours from various mobile devices to an external site. Upon
further investigation, the analyst notices that successful login attempts are being conducted with
impossible travel times during the same time periods when the unauthorized dowloads are occurring.
The @nalyst also discovers a couple of WAP are using the same SSID, but they have non-siandard
DHCP configurations and an overlapping channel. Which of the following attacks is being conducted?
(A). Evil twin
(B). Jamming
(C). DNS poisoning
(D). Bluesnarfing
(E). DDoS
Answer: A

NO.444 Which of the following control types fixes a previously identified issue and mitigates a risk?
(A). Detective
(B). Corrective
(C). Preventative
(D). Finalized
Answer: B

NO.445 Which of the following would BEST identify and remediate a data-loss event in an enterprise
using third-party, web-based services and file-sharing platforms?
(A). SIEM
(B). CASB
(C). UTM
(D). DLP
Answer: B

Microsoft has a straightforward definition and it includes DLP. "is a security policy enforcement point
positioned between enterprise users and cloud service providers" https://www.microsoft.com/enus/security/business/security-101/what-is-a-cloud-access-security-broker-casb A cloud access
security broker (CASB) works by securing data flowing to and from in-house IT architectures and
cloud vendor environments using an organization's security policies. CASBs protect enterprise
systems against cyberattacks through malware prevention and provide data security through
encryption, making data streams unreadable to outside parties. CASBs were created with one thing in
mind: protecting proprietary data stored in external, third-party media. CASBs deliver capabilities not
generally available in traditional controls such as secure web gateways (SWGs) and enterprise
firewalls. CASBs provide policy and governance concurrently across multiple cloud services and
provide granular visibility into and control over user activities. https://www.forcepoint.com/cyberedu/casb-cloud-access-security-broker
NO.446 A social media company based in North Amenca is looking to expand into new global
markets and needs to maintain compliance with international standards With which of the following
is the company's data protection officer MOST likely concerned''
(A). NIST Framework
(B). ISO 27001
(C). GDPR
(D). PCI-DSS
Answer: B

NO.447 During a security assessment, a security finds a file with overly permissive permissions.
Which of the following tools will allow the analyst to reduce the permission for the existing users and
groups and remove the set-user-ID from the file?
(A). 1s
(B). chflags
(C). chmod
(D). lsof
(E). setuid
Answer: C

NO.448 Which of the following describes the exploitation of an interactive process to gain access to
restncted areas?
(A). Persistence
(B). Buffer overflow
(C). Privilege escalation
(D). Pharming
Answer: C

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Privilege_escalation#:~:text=Privilege%20escalation%20is%20the%20a
ct,from%20an%20application%20or%20user
NO.449 An organization discovered a disgruntled employee exfiltrated a large amount of PII data by
uploading files Which of the following controls should the organization consider to mitigate this risk?
(A). EDR
(B). Firewall
(C). HIPS
(D). DLP
Answer: D

NO.450 A security analyst is reviewing the output of a web server log and notices a particular
account is attempting to transfer large amounts of money:
Which of the following types of attack is MOST likely being conducted?
(A). SQLi
(B). CSRF
(C). Session replay
(D). API
Answer: C

NO.451 A document that appears to be malicious has been discovered in an email that was sent to a
company's Chief Financial Officer (CFO). Which of the following would be BEST to allow a security
analyst to gather information and confirm it is a malicious document without executing any code it
may contain?
(A). Open the document on an air-gapped network
(B). View the document's metadata for origin clues
(C). Search for matching file hashes on malware websites
(D). Detonate the document in an analysis sandbox
Answer: D

NO.452 A web server has been compromised due to a ransomware attack. Further investigation
reveals the ransomware has been in the server for the past 72 hours. The systems administrator
needs to get the services back up as soon as possible. Which of the following should the
administrator use to restore services to a secure state?
(A). The last incremental backup that was conducted 72 hours ago Most Voted
(B). The last known-good configuration Most Voted
(C). The last full backup that was conducted seven days ago
(D). The baseline OS configuration
Answer: C

Ransomware will most likely render the web server unusable and must be isolated for forensic
investigation. This will leave the only option to start a new web server from scratch and restore the
last full backup, plus any differential or incremental backups which are sure to be clean from
ransomware (if available).
NO.453 Which of the following are common VoIP-associated vulnerabilities? (Select TWO).
(A). SPIM
(B). vishing
(C). Hopping
(D). Phishing
(E). Credential harvesting
(F). Tailgating
Answer: A,B

NO.454 An attacker is attempting to exploit users by creating a fake website with the URL users.
Which of the following social-engineering attacks does this describe?
(A). Information elicitation
(B). Type squatting
(C). Impersonation
(D). Watering-hole attack
Answer: D

NO.455 An organization is concerned about hackers potentially entering a facility and plugging in a
remotely accessible Kali Linux box. Which of the following should be the first lines of defense against
such an attack? (Select TWO)
(A). MAC filtering
(B). Zero trust segmentation
(C). Network access control
(D). Access control vestibules
(E). Guards
(F). Bollards
Answer: B,D

NO.456 A consultant is configuring a vulnerability scanner for a large, global organization in multiple
countries. The consultant will be using a service account to scan systems with administrative
privileges on a weekly basis, but there is a concern that hackers could gain access to account to the
account and pivot through the global network. Which of the following would be BEST to help mitigate
this concern?
(A). Create consultant accounts for each region, each configured with push MFA notifications.
(B). Create one global administrator account and enforce Kerberos authentication
(C). Create different accounts for each region. limit their logon times, and alert on risky logins
(D). Create a guest account for each region. remember the last ten passwords, and block password
reuse
Answer: C

https://www.crowdstrike.com/blog/service-accounts-performing-interactive-logins/
NO.457 A company is launching a new internet platform for its clients. The company does not want
to implement its own authorization solution but instead wants to rely on the authorization provided
by another platform. Which of the following is the BEST approach to implement the desired solution?
(A). OAuth
(B). TACACS+
(C). SAML
(D). RADIUS
Answer: D

NO.458 A DBA reports that several production server hard drives were wiped over the weekend. The
DBA also reports that several Linux servers were unavailable due to system files being deleted
unexpectedly. A security analyst verified that software was configured to delete data deliberately
from those servers. No backdoors to any servers were found. Which of the following attacks was
MOST likely used to cause the data toss?
(A). Logic bomb
(B). Ransomware
(C). Fileless virus
(D). Remote access Trojans
(E). Rootkit
Answer: A

NO.459 A security analyst is using a recently released security advisory to review historical logs,
looking for the specific activity that was outlined in the advisory. Which of the following is the analyst
doing?
(A). A packet capture
(B). A user behavior analysis
(C). Threat hunting
(D). Credentialed vulnerability scanning
Answer: C

NO.460 Which of the following controls would be the MOST cost-effective and time-efficient to
deter intrusions at the perimeter of a restricted, remote military training area?
(Select TWO).
Answer: A,E

NO.461 The SOC is reviewing process and procedures after a recent incident. The review indicates it
took more than 30 minutes to determine that quarantining an infected host was the best course of
action. The allowed the malware to spread to additional hosts before it was contained. Which of the
following would be BEST to improve the incident response process?
(A). Updating the playbooks with better decision points
(B). Dividing the network into trusted and untrusted zones
(C). Providing additional end-user training on acceptable use
(D). Implementing manual quarantining of infected hosts
Answer: A

NO.462 Rapidly infect computers. Once infected, computers are encrypted and held for ransom.
Which of the following would BEST prevent this attack from reoccurring?
(A). Configure the perimeter firewall to deny inbound external connections to SMB ports.
(B). Ensure endpoint detection and response systems are alerting on suspicious SMB connections.
(C). Deny unauthenticated users access to shared network folders.
(D). Verify computers are set to install monthly operating system, updates automatically
Answer: A

NO.463 During an incident response, a security analyst observes the following log entry on the web
server.
Which of the following BEST describes the type of attack the analyst is experience?
(A). SQL injection
(B). Cross-site scripting
(C). Pass-the-hash
(D). Directory traversal
Answer: D

NO.464 A Chief Security Officer is looking for a solution that can provide increased scalability and
flexibility for back-end infrastructure, allowing it to be updated and modified without disruption to
services. The security architect would like the solution selected to reduce the back-end server
resources and has highlighted that session persistence is not important for the applications running
on the back-end servers. Which of the following would BEST meet the requirements?
(A). Reverse proxy
(B). Automated patch management
(C). Snapshots
(D). NIC teaming
Answer: A

A reverse proxy would be the best solution for increased scalability and flexibility for back-end
infrastructure.
NO.465 A security engineer needs to implement an MDM solution that complies with the corporate
mobile device policy. The policy states that in order for mobile users to access corporate resources on
their devices the following requirements must be met:
* Mobile device OSs must be patched up to the latest release
* A screen lock must be enabled (passcode or biometric)
* Corporate data must be removed if the device is reported lost or stolen Which of the following
controls should the security engineer configure? (Select TWO)
(A). Containerization
(B). Storage segmentation
(C). Posturing
(D). Remote wipe
(E). Full-device encryption
(F). Geofencing
Answer: D,E

NO.466 An organization plans to transition the intrusion detection and prevention techniques on a
critical subnet to an anomaly-based system. Which of the following does the organization need to
determine for this to be successful?
(A). The baseline
(B). The endpoint configurations
(C). The adversary behavior profiles
(D). The IPS signatures
Answer: C

NO.467 A security analyst reviews a company's authentication logs and notices multiple
authentication failures. The authentication failures are from different usernames that share the same
source IP address. Which of the password attacks is MOST likely happening?
(A). Dictionary
(B). Rainbow table
(C). Spraying
(D). Brute-force
Answer: D

NO.468 A company recenty experienced an attack during which its main website was Girected to the
attacker's web server, allowing the attacker to harvest credentials trom unsuspecting customers,
Which of the following should the company implement lo prevent this type of attack from occurring
In the future?
(A). PSec
(B). SSL/TLS
(C). ONSSEC
(D). SMIME
Answer: B

NO.469 An attacked is attempting to exploit users by creating a fake website with the URL
www.validwebsite.com.
The attacker's intent is to imitate the look and feel of a legitimate website to obtain personal
information from unsuspecting users. Which of the following social-engineering attacks does this
describe?
(A). Information elicitation
(B). Type squatting
(C). Impersonation
(D). Watering-hole attack
Answer: D

NO.470 Which of the following in a forensic investigation should be priorities based on the order of
volatility? (Select TWO).
(A). Page files
(B). Event logs
(C). RAM
(D). Cache
(E). Stored files
(F). HDD
Answer: A,D

NO.471 Which of the following describes a social engineering technique that seeks to exploit a
person's sense of urgency?
(A). A phishing email stating a cash settlement has been awarded but will expire soon
(B). A smishing message stating a package is scheduled for pickup
(C). A vishing call that requests a donation be made to a local charity
(D). A SPIM notification claiming to be undercover law enforcement investigating a cybercrime
Answer: A

Phishing
As one of the most popular social engineering attack types, phishing scams are email and text
message campaigns aimed at creating a sense of urgency, curiosity or fear in victims. It then prods
them into revealing sensitive information, clicking on links to malicious websites, or opening
attachments that contain malware.
https://www.imperva.com/learn/application-security/social-engineeringattack/#:~:text=Phishing,curiosity%20or%20fear%20in%20victims.
NO.472 A security analyst needs to determine how an attacker was able to use User3 to gain a
foothold within a company's network. The company's lockout policy requires that an account be
locked out for a minimum of 15 minutes after three unsuccessful attempts. While reviewing the log
files, the analyst discovers the following:
(A). Dictionary
(B). Credential-stuffing
(C). Password-spraying
(D). Brute-forcea
Answer: D

NO.473 Per company security policy, IT staff members are required to have separate credentials to
perform administrative functions using just-in-time permissions. Which of the following solutions is
the company Implementing?
(A). Privileged access management
(B). SSO
(C). RADIUS
(D). Attribute-based access control
Answer: A

NO.474 An analyst is working onan email incident in which target opened an attachment containing
a worm. The analyst wants to implement mitigation techniques to prevent further spread. Which of
the following is the BEST course of action for the analyst to take?
(A). Apply a DLP solution
(B). Implement network segmentation.
(C). Utilize email content filtering.
(D). Isolate the infected attachment.
Answer: B

NO.475 Which of the following terms describes a broad range of information that is sensitive to a
specific organization?
(A). Public
(B). Top secret
(C). Proprietary
(D). Open-source
Answer: C

NO.476 A security engineer is reviewing log files after a third discovered usernames and passwords
for the organization's accounts. The engineer sees there was a change in the IP address for a vendor
website one earlier. This change lasted eight hours. Which of the following attacks was MOST likely
used?
(A). Man-in- the middle
(B). Spear-phishing
(C). Evil twin
(D). DNS poising
Answer: D

DNS spoofing, also referred to as DNS cache poisoning, is a form of computer security hacking in
which corrupt Domain Name System data is introduced into the DNS resolver's cache, causing the
name server to return an incorrect result record, e.g. an IP address. This results in traffic being
diverted to the attacker's computer (or any other computer).
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/DNS_spoofing
NO.477 A security assessment found that several embedded systems are running unsecure
protocols. These Systems were purchased two years ago and the company that developed them is no
longer in business Which of the following constraints BEST describes the reason the findings cannot
be remediated?
(A). inability to authenticate
(B). Implied trust
(C). Lack of computing power
(D). Unavailable patch
Answer: D

NO.478 After entering a username and password, and administrator must draw a gesture on a touch
screen. Which of the following demonstrates what the administrator is providing?
(A). Multifactor authentication
(B). Something you can do
(C). Biometric
(D). Two-factor authentication
Answer: D

NO.479 Which of the fofowing should an organization conskier implementing in the event
executives need to speak to the media after a publicized data breach?
(A). incident response pian
(B). Business continuity plan
(C). Communication pian
(D). Disaster recovery plan
Answer: C

NO.480 A company wants to restrict emailing of PHI documents. The company is implementing a
DLP solution In order to reslnct PHI documents which of the following should be performed FIRST?
Answer: C

NO.481 A smart retail business has a local store and a newly established and growing online
storefront. A recent storm caused a power outage to the business and the local ISP, resulting in
several hours of lost sales and delayed order processing. The business owner now needs to ensure
two things:
* Protection from power outages
* Always-available connectivity In case of an outage
The owner has decided to implement battery backups for the computer equipment Which of the
following would BEST fulfill the owner's second need?
(A). Lease a point-to-point circuit to provide dedicated access.
(B). Connect the business router to its own dedicated UPS.
(C). Purchase services from a cloud provider for high availability
(D). Replace the business's wired network with a wireless network
Answer: C

NO.482 Several large orders of merchandise were recently purchased on an e-commerce company's
website. The totals for each of the transactions were negative values, resulting in credits on the
customers?
accounts. Which of the following should be implemented to prevent similar situations in the future?
(A). Ensure input validation is in place to prevent the use of invalid characters and values.
(B). Calculate all possible values to be added together and ensure the use of the proper integer in the
code.
(C). Configure the web application firewall to look for and block session replay attacks.
(D). Make sure transactions that are submitted within very short time periods are prevented from
being processed.
Answer: A

NO.483 An incident, which is affecting dozens of systems, involves malware that reaches out to an
Internet service for rules and updates. The IP addresses for the Internet host appear to be different in
each case. The organization would like to determine a common IoC to support response and recovery
actions. Which of the following sources of information would BEST support this solution?
(A). Web log files
(B). Browser cache
(C). DNS query logs
(D). Antivirus
Answer: C

NO.484 A hospital's administration is concerned about a potential loss of patient data that is stored
on tablets. A security administrator needs to implement controls to alert the SOC any time the
devices are near exits. Which of the following would BEST achieve this objective?
(A). Geotargeting
(B). Geolocation
(C). Geotagging
(D). Geofencing
Answer: B

NO.485 A network administrator would like to configure a site-to-site VPN utilizing iPSec. The
administrator wants the tunnel to be established with data integrity encryption, authentication and
anti- replay functions Which of the following should the administrator use when configuring the VPN
?
(A). AH
(B). EDR
(C). ESP
(D). DNSSEC
Answer: C

https://www.hypr.com/encapsulating-security-payload-esp/
Encapsulating Security Payload (ESP) is a member of the Internet Protocol Security (IPsec) set of
protocols that encrypt and authenticate the packets of data between computers using a Virtual
Private Network (VPN). The focus and layer on which ESP operates makes it possible for VPNs to
function securely.
NO.486 A security analyst needs to implement an MDM solution for BYOD users that willallow the
company to retain control over company emails residing on the devices andlimit data exfiltration that
might occur if the devices are lost or stolen.Which of the following would BEST meet these
requirements? (Select TWO).
(A). Full-device encryption
(B). Network usage rules
(C). Geofencing
(D). Containerization
(E). Application whitelisting
(F). Remote control
Answer: A,B

NO.487 A major political party experienced a server breach. The hacker then publicly posted stolen
internal communications concerning campaign strategies to give the opposition party an advantage.
Which of the following BEST describes these threat actors?
(A). Semi-authorized hackers
(B). State actors
(C). Script kiddies
(D). Advanced persistent threats
Answer: B

NO.488 A network engineer at a company with a web server is building a new web environment
with the following requirements:
* Only one web server at a time can service requests.
* If the primary web server fails, a failover needs to occur to ensure the secondary web server
becomes the primary.
Which of the following load-balancing options BEST fits the requirements?
(A). Cookie-based
(B). Active-passive
(C). Persistence
(D). Round robin
Answer: A

NO.489 A technician enables full disk encryption on a laptop that will be taken on a business tnp.
Which of the following does this process BEST protect?
(A). Data in transit
(B). Data in processing
(C). Data at rest
(D). Data tokenization
Answer: C

Data at rest: Data at rest is data in its stored or resting state, which is typically on some type of
persistent storage such as a hard drive or tape. Symmetric encryption is used in this case.
NO.490 Administrators have allowed employees to access their company email from personal
computers. However, the administrators are concerned that these computers are another attack
Surface and can result in user accounts being breached by foreign actors. Which of the following
actions would provide the MOST secure solution?
Answer: A

NO.491 Which of the following represents a biometric FRR?
(A). Authorized users being denied access
(B). Users failing to enter the correct PIN
(C). The denied and authorized numbers being equal
(D). The number of unauthorized users being granted access
Answer: A

NO.492 Which of the following must be in place before implementing a BCP?
(A). SLA
(B). AUP
(C). NDA
(D). BIA
Answer: D

NO.493 A company needs to centralize its logs to create a baseline and have visibility on its security
events. Which of the following technologies will accomplish this objective?
(A). Security information and event management
(B). A web application firewall
(C). A vulnerability scanner
(D). A next-generation firewall
Answer: A

NO.494 A company's help desk received several AV alerts indicating Mimikatz attempted to run on
the remote systems. Several users also reported that the new company flash drives they picked up in
the break room only have 512KB of storage. Which of the following is MOST likely the cause?
(A). The GPO prevents the use of flash drives, which triggers a false positive AV indication and
restricts the drives to only 512KB of storage.
(B). The new flash drives need a driver that is being blocked by the AV software because the flash
drives are not on the application's allow list, temporarily restricting the drives to 512KB of storage.
(C). The new flash drives are incorrectly partitioned, and the systems are automatically trying to use
an unapproved application to repartition the drives.
(D). The GPO blocking the flash drives is being bypassed by a malicious flash drive that is attempting
to harvest plaintext credentials from memory.
Answer: D

NO.495 A network engineer needs to create a plan for upgrading the wireless infrastructure in a
large office Priority must be given to areas that are currently experiencing latency and connection
issues. Which of the following would be the BEST resource for determining the order of priority?
(A). Nmapn
(B). Heat maps
(C). Network diagrams
(D). Wireshark
Answer: C

NO.496 Select the appropriate attack and remediation from each drop-down list to label the
corresponding attack with its remediation.
INSTRUCTIONS
Not all attacks and remediation actions will be used.
If at any time you would like to bring back the initial state of the simulation, please click the Reset All
button.
Answer:

NO.497 A nationwide company is experiencing unauthorized logins at all hours of the day. The logins
appear to originate from countries in which the company has no employees. Which of the following
controls.
should the company consider using as part of its IAM strategy? (Select TWO).
(A). A complex password policy
(B). Geolocation
(C). An impossible travel policy
(D). Self-service password reset
(E). Geofencing
Answer: A,B

F Time-based logins
NO.498 Which of the following provides a catalog of security and privacy controls related to the
United States federal information systems?
(A). GDPR
(B). PCI DSS
(C). ISO 27000
(D). NIST 800-53
Answer: D

NO.499 A security analyst receives a SIEM alert that someone logged in to the appadmin test
account, which is only used for the early detection of attacks. The security analyst then reviews the
following application log:
Which of the following can the security analyst conclude?
(A). A replay attack is being conducted against the application.
(B). An injection attack is being conducted against a user authentication system.
(C). A service account password may have been changed, resulting in continuous failed logins within
the application.
(D). A credentialed vulnerability scanner attack is testing several CVEs against the application.
Answer: C

NO.500 A third party asked a user to share a public key for secure communication. Which of the
following file formats should the user choose to share the key?
(A). .pfx
(B). .csr
(C). .pvk
(D). .cer
Answer: A

NO.501 Certain users are reporting their accounts are being used to send unauthorized emails and
conduct suspicious activities After further investigation, a security analyst notices the following
* All users share workstations throughout the day
* Endpoint protection was disabled on several workstations throughout the network.
* Travel times on logins from the affected users are impossible
* Sensitive data is being uploaded to external sites
* All usee account passwords were forced lo be reset and the issue continued Which of the following
attacks is being used to compromise the user accounts?
(A). Brute-force
(B). Keylogger
(C). Dictionary
(D). Rainbow
Answer: C

NO.502 A small business just recovered from a ransomware attack against its file servers by
purchasing the decryption keys from the attackers. The issue was triggered by a phishing email and
the IT administrator wants to ensure it does not happen again. Which of the following should the IT
administrator do FIRST after recovery?
(A). Scan the NAS for residual or dormant malware and take new daily backups that are tested on a
frequent basis.
(B). Restrict administrative privileges and patch all systems and applications.
(C). Rebuild all workstations and install new antivirus software.
(D). Implement application whitelisting and perform user application hardening.
Answer: A

The reason the company had to pay the ransom is because they did not have valid backups,
otherwise they would have just restored their data. If your company just had to pay ransom and your
boss says, "Don't let this happen again", what is the first thing you are going to do. The only action
after a ransomware attack is "restore from backup".
NO.503 Which of the following environments would MOST likely be used to assess the execution of
component parts of a system at both the hardware and software levels and to measure performance
characteristics?
(A). Test
(B). Staging
(C). Development
(D). Production
Answer: A

NO.504 A recent security breach exploited software vulnerabilities in the firewall and within the
network management solution. Which of the following will MOST likely be used to identify when the
breach occurred through each device?
(A). SIEM correlation dashboards
(B). Firewall syslog event logs
(C). Network management solution login audit logs
(D). Bandwidth monitors and interface sensors
Answer: A

testing exercise?
(A). White team
(B). Purple team
(C). Green team
(D). Blue team
(E). Red team
Answer: D

NO.506 A report delivered to the Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) shows that some user
credentials could be exfilltrated. The report also indicates that users tend to choose the same
credentials on different systems and applications. Which of the following policies should the CISO use
to prevent someone from using the exfilltrated credentials?
(A). MFA
(B). Lockout
(C). Time-based logins
(D). Password history
Answer: B

NO.507 A company has a flat network in the cloud. The company needs to implement a solution to
segment its production and non-production servers without migrating servers to a new network.
Which of the following solutions should the company implement?
(A). internet
(B). Screened Subnet
(C). VLAN segmentation
(D). Zero Trust
Answer: C

NO.508 A store receives reports that shoppers' credit card information is being stolen. Upon further
analysis, those same shoppers also withdrew money from an ATM in that store.
The attackers are using the targeted shoppers' credit card information to make online purchases.
Which of the following attacks is the MOST probable cause?
(A). Identity theft
(B). RFID cloning
(C). Shoulder surfing
(D). Card skimming
Answer: D

NO.509 A external forensics investigator has been hired to investigate a data breach at a large
enterprise with numerous assets. It is known that the breach started in the DMZ and moved to the
sensitive information, generating multiple logs as the attacker traversed through the network. Which
of the following will BEST assist with this investigation?
(A). Perform e@ vulnerability scan to identify the weak spots.
(B). Use a packet analyzer to investigate the NetFlow traffic
(C). Check the SIEM to review the correlated logs.
(D). Require access to the routers to view current sessions,
Answer: C

NO.510 An employee received multiple messages on a mobile device. The messages instructing the
employee to pair the device to an unknown device. Which of the following BEST describes What a
malicious person might be doing to cause this issue to occur?
Answer: D

NO.511 An attacker was eavesdropping on a user who was shopping online. The attacker was able
to spoof the IP address associated with the shopping site. Later, the user received an email regarding
the credit card statement with unusual purchases. Which of the following attacks took place?
(A). On-path attack
(B). Protocol poisoning
(C). Domain hijacking
(D). Bluejacking
Answer: A

NO.512 Which of the following should an organization consider implementing In the event
executives need to speak to the media after a publicized data breach?
(A). Incident response plan
(B). Business continuity plan
(C). Communication plan
(D). Disaster recovery plan
Answer: D

NO.513 Which of the following supplies non-repudiation during a forensics investigation?
(A). Dumping volatile memory contents first
(B). Duplicating a drive with dd
(C). Using a SHA-2 signature of a drive image
(D). Logging everyone in contact with evidence
(E). Encrypting sensitive data
Answer: C

NO.514 Which of the following cryptographic concepts would a security engineer utilize while
implementing non-repudiation? (Select TWO)
(A). Block cipher
(B). Hashing
(C). Private key
(D). Perfect forward secrecy
(E). Salting
(F). Symmetric keys
Answer: B,C

NO.515 Which of the following techniques eliminates the use of rainbow tables for password
cracking?
(A). Hashing
(B). Tokenization
(C). Asymmetric encryption
(D). Salting
Answer: D

Rainbow table attacks can easily be prevented by using salt techniques, which is a random data that
is passed into the hash function along with the plain text.
NO.516 During an intemal penetration test, a security analyst identified a network device that had
accepted cleartext authentication and was configured with a default credential. Which of the
following recommendations should the security analyst make to secure this device?
(A). Configure SNMPv1.
(B). Configure SNMPv2c
(C). Configure SNMPv3.
(D). Configure the default community string.
Answer: D

NO.517 A security analyst is running a vulnerability scan to check for missing patches during a
suspected security rodent During which of the following phases of the response process is this
activity MOST likely occurring?
(A). Containment
(B). Identification
(C). Recovery
(D). Preparation
Answer: B

NO.518 The concept of connecting a user account across the systems of multiple enterprises is BEST
known as:
(A). federation.
(B). a remote access policy.
(C). multifactor authentication.
(D). single sign-on.
Answer: D

NO.519 Which of the following BEST explains the reason why a server administrator would place a
document named password.txt on the desktop of an administrator account on a server?
(A). The document is a honeyfile and is meant to attract the attention of a cyberintruder.
(B). The document is a backup file if the system needs to be recovered.
(C). The document is a standard file that the OS needs to verify the login credentials.
(D). The document is a keylogger that stores all keystrokes should the account be compromised.
Answer: A

NO.520 The human resources department of a large online retailer has received multiple customer
complaints about the rudeness of the automated chatbots it uses to interface and assist online
shoppers. The system, which continuously learns and adapts, was working fine when it was installed
a few months ago. Which of the following BEST describes the method being used to exploit the
system?
Answer: C

NO.521 Which of the following BEST describes the method a security analyst would use to confirm a
file that is downloaded from a trusted security website is not altered in transit or corrupted using a
verified checksum?
(A). Hashing
(B). Salting
(C). Integrity
(D). Digital signature
Answer: C

NO.522 Which of the following uses SAML for authentication?
(A). TOTP
(B). Federation
(C). Kerberos
(D). HOTP
Answer: B

NO.523 During an incident response, an analyst applied rules to all inbound traffic on the border
firewall and implemented ACLs on each critical server Following an investigation, the company
realizes it is still vulnerable because outbound traffic is not restricted and the adversary is able lo
maintain a presence in the network. In which of the following stages of the Cyber Kill Chain is the
adversary currently operating?
(A). Reconnaissance
(B). Command and control
(C). Actions on objective
(D). Exploitation
Answer: B

NO.524 A Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) needs to create a policy set that meets
international standards for data privacy and sharing. Which of the following should the CISO read and
understand before writing the policies?
(A). PCI DSS
(B). GDPR
(C). NIST
(D). ISO 31000
Answer: B

NO.525 A security assessment determines DES and 3DES at still being used on recently deployed
production servers. Which of the following did the assessment identify?
(A). Unsecme protocols
(B). Default settings
(C). Open permissions
(D). Weak encryption
Answer: D

NO.526 Which of the following is the correct order of volatility from MOST to LEAST volatile? >
(A). Memory, temporary filesystems, routing tables, disk, network storage
(B). Cache, memory, temporary filesystems, disk, archival media
(C). Memory, disk, temporary filesystems, cache, archival media
(D). Cache, disk, temporary filesystems, network storage, archival media
Answer: B

NO.527 A security analyst must detenmine If elther SSH er Telnet ts being used to lng in bo servers.
Which of the following should the analyst use?
(A). legger
(B). Metarup) ost
(C). tepdump
(D). netetat
Answer: D

NO.528 A security engineer at an offline government facility is concerned about the validity of an
SSL certificate. The engineer wants to perform the fastest check with the least delay to determine if
the certificate has been revoked. Which of the following would BEST these requirement?
(A). RA
(B). OCSP
(C). CRL
(D). CSR
Answer: C

NO.529 A security administrator checks the table of a network switch, which shows the following
output:
Which of the following is happening to this switch?
(A). MAC Flooding
(B). DNS poisoning
(C). MAC cloning
(D). ARP poisoning
Answer: A

NO.530 Which of the following should customers who are involved with Ul developer agreements
be concerned with when considering the use of these products on highly sensitive projects?
(A). Weak configurations
(B). Integration activities
(C). Unsecure user accounts
(D). Outsourced code development
Answer: A

Customers who are involved with Ul developer agreements should be concerned with weak
configurations when considering the use of these products on highly sensitive projects. Weak
configurations can lead to security vulnerabilities, which can be exploited by malicious actors. It is
important to ensure that all configurations are secure and up-to-date in order to protect sensitive
data. Source: UL
NO.531 Which of the following BEST describes a technique that compensates researchers for finding
vulnerabilities?
(A). Penetration testing
(B). Code review
(C). Wardriving
(D). Bug bounty
Answer: A

NO.532 A company is upgrading its wireless infrastructure to WPA2-Enterprise using EAP-TLS. Which
of the following must be part of the security architecture to achieve AAA? (Select TWO)
(A). DNSSEC
(B). Reverse proxy
(C). VPN concentrator
(D). PKI
(E). Active Directory
(F). RADIUS
Answer: E,F

NO.533 The help desk has received calls from users in multiple locations who are unable to access
core network services The network team has identified and turned off the network switches using
remote commands. Which of the following actions should the network team take NEXT?
(A). Disconnect all external network connections from the firewall
(B). Send response teams to the network switch locations to perform updates
(C). Turn on all the network switches by using the centralized management software
(D). Initiate the organization's incident response plan.
Answer: B

NO.534 Which of the following is the MOST relevant security check to be performed before
embedding third-parry libraries in developed code?
(A). Check to see if the third party has resources to create dedicated development and staging
environments.
(B). Verify the number of companies that downloaded the third-party code and the number of
contributions on the code repository.
(C). Assess existing vulnerabilities affecting the third-parry code and the remediation efficiency of the
libraries' developers.
(D). Read multiple penetration-testing reports for environments running software that reused the
library.
Answer: D

NO.535 Which of the following ISO standards is certified for privacy?
(A). ISO 9001
(B). ISO 27002
(C). ISO 27701
(D). ISO 31000
Answer: C

ISO 27701 also abbreviated as PIMS (Privacy Information Management System) outlines a framework
for Personally Identifiable Information (PII) Controllers and PII Processors to manage data privacy.
Privacy information management systems are sometimes referred to as personal information
management systems.
https://pecb.com/whitepaper/the-future-of-privacy-with-isoiec-27701
NO.536 A Chief Information Officer is concerned about employees using company-issued laptops to
steal data when accessing network shares. Which of the following should the company implement?
(A). DLP
(B). CASB
(C). HIDS
(D). EDR
(E). UEFI
Answer: A

NO.537 A penetration tester gains access to a network by exploiting a vulnerability on a publicfacing web server. Which of the following techniques will the tester most likely perform NEXT?
(A). Gather more Information about the target through passive reconnaissance.
(B). Establish rules of engagement before proceeding.
(C). Create a user account to maintain persistence.
(D). Move laterally throughout the network to search for sensitive information.
Answer: C

NO.538 A company is looking to migrate some servers to the cloud to minimize its technology
footprint. The company has 100 databases that are on premises. Which of the following solutions will
require the LEAST management and support from the company?
(A). SaaS
(B). IaaS
(C). PaaS
(D). SDN
Answer: A

In order from the least amount of management, to the most amount of management for the
company:
SaaS > PaaS > IaaS > On-site
SaaS - Basically everything is managed by the provider
PaaS - The provider manages everything other than applications and data IaaS - The middle-ground o
f services. The provider takes on half, while you take on the other half. Provider is responsible for
virtualization, networking, servers, and storage. The company is responsible for applications, data,
runtime, OS, and middleware.
On-site - There is no service provider. The company is responsible for the whole pie.
https://www.pcmag.com/picks/the-best-database-as-a-service-solutions
NO.539 A security analyst is performing a forensic investigation compromised account credentials.
Using the Event Viewer, the analyst able to detect the following message, ''Special privileges assigned
to new login.'' Several of these messages did not have a valid logon associated with the user before
these privileges were assigned.
Which of the following attacks is MOST likely being detected?
(A). Pass-the-hash
(B). Buffer overflow
(C). Cross-site scripting
(D). Session replay
Answer: A

NO.540 An organization maintains several environments in which patches are developed and tested
before deployed to an operation status. Which of the following is the environment in which patches
will be deployed just prior to being put into an operational status?
Answer: D

The staging environment is an optional environment, but it is commonly used when an organization
has multiple production environments. After passing testing, the system moves into staging, from
where it can be deployed to the different production systems.
NO.541 The Chief Executive Officer (CEO) of an organization would like staff members to have the
flexibility to work from home anytime during business hours, incident during a pandemic or crisis,
However, the CEO is concerned that some staff members may take advantage of the of the flexibility
and work from high-risk countries while on holidays work to a third-party organization in another
country. The Chief information Officer (CIO) believes the company can implement some basic to
mitigate the majority of the risk. Which of the following would be BEST to mitigate CEO's concern?
(Select TWO).
(A). Geolocation
(B). Time-of-day restrictions
(C). Certificates
(D). Tokens
(E). Geotagging
(F). Role-based access controls
Answer: A,E

NO.542 A company is under investigation for possible fraud. As part of the investigation. the
authorities need to review all emails and ensure data is not deleted.
Which of the following should the company implement to assist in the investigation?
(A). Legal hold
(B). Chain of custody
(C). Data loss prevention
(D). Content filter
Answer: A

NO.543 After a recent security breach, a security analyst reports that several administrative
usernames and passwords are being sent via cleartext across the network to access network devices
over port 23. Which of the following should be implemented so all credentials sent over the network
are encrypted when remotely accessing and configuring network devices?
(A). SSH
(B). SNMPv3
(C). SFTP
(D). Telnet
(E). FTP
Answer: A

NO.544 A security engineer at an offline government facility is concerned about the validity of an
SSL certificate. The engineer wants to perform the fastest check with the least delay to determine if
the certificate has been revoked. Which of the following would BEST meet these requirements?
(A). RA
(B). OcsP
(C). CRL
(D). CSR
Answer: C

NO.545 Which of the following are requirements that must be configured for PCI DSS compliance?
(Select TWO).
Testing security systems and processes regularly
(A). Installing and maintaining a web proxy to protect cardholder data
(B). Assigning a unique ID to each person with computer access
(C). Encrypting transmission of cardholder data across private networks
(D). Benchmarking security awareness training for contractors
(E). Using vendor-supplied default passwords for system passwords
Answer: B,D

NO.546 A user wanted to catch up on some work over the weekend but had issues logging in to the
corporate network using a VPN. On Monday, the user opened a ticket for this issue but was able to
log in successfully. Which of the following BEST describes the policy that is being implemented?
(A). Time-based logins
(B). Geofencing
(C). Network location
(D). Password history
Answer: A

NO.547 Which of the following is an example of transference of risk?
(A). Purchasing insurance
(B). Patching vulnerable servers
(C). Retiring outdated applications
(D). Application owner risk sign-off
Answer: A

NO.548 As part of annual audit requirements, the security team performed a review of exceptions
to the company policy that allows specific users the ability to use USB storage devices on their
laptops The review yielded the following results.
* The exception process and policy have been correctly followed by the majority of users
* A small number of users did not create tickets for the requests but were granted access
* All access had been approved by supervisors.
* Valid requests for the access sporadically occurred across multiple departments.
* Access, in most cases, had not been removed when it was no longer needed Which of the following
should the company do to ensure that appropriate access is not disrupted but unneeded access is
removed in a reasonable time frame?
(A). Create an automated, monthly attestation process that removes access if an employee's
supervisor denies the approval
(B). Remove access for all employees and only allow new access to be granted if the employee's
supervisor approves the request
(C). Perform a quarterly audit of all user accounts that have been granted access and verify the
exceptions with the management team
(D). Implement a ticketing system that tracks each request and generates reports listing which
employees actively use USB storage devices
Answer: C

NO.549 A SECURITY ANALYST NEEDS TO FIND REAL-TIME DATA ON THE LATEST MALWARE AND loCs
WHICH OF THE FOLLOWING BEST DESCRIBE THE SOLUTION THE ANALYST SHOULD PERSUE?
(A). ADVISORIES AND BULLETINS
(B). THREAT FEEDS
(C). SECURITY NEWS ARTICLES
(D). PEER-REVIEWED CONTENT
Answer: B

NO.550 A database administrator wants to grant access to an application that will be reading and
writing data to a database. The database is shared by other applications also used by the finance
department Which of the following account types Is MOST appropriate for this purpose?
Answer: A

NO.551 A new plug-and-play storage device was installed on a PC in the corporate environment.
Which of the following safeguards will BEST help to protect the PC from malicious files on the storage
device?
(A). Change the default settings on the PC.
(B). Define the PC firewall rules to limit access.
(C). Encrypt the disk on the storage device.
(D). Plug the storage device in to the UPS
Answer: B

NO.552 A company's public-facing website, https://www.organization.com, has an IP address of
166.18.75.6. However, over the past hour the SOC has received reports of the site's homepage
displaying incorrect information. A quick nslookup search shows hitps://;www.organization.com is
pointing to 151.191.122.115. Which of the following is occurring?
(A). DoS attack
(B). ARP poisoning
(C). DNS spoofing
(D). NXDOMAIN attack
Answer: C

NO.553 A security researcher has alerted an organization that its sensitive user data was found for
sale on a website. Which of the following should the organization use to inform the affected parties?
(A). An incident response plan
(B). A communications plan
(C). A business continuity plan
(D). A disaster recovery plan
Answer: D

NO.554 An organization would like to give remote workers the ability to use applications hosted
inside the corporate network Users will be allowed to use their personal computers or they will be
provided organization assets Either way no data or applications will be installed locally on any user
systems Which of the following mobile solutions would accomplish these goals?
(A). VDI
(B). MDM
(C). COPE
(D). UTM
Answer: A

MDM would require something to be installed. VDI, virtual desktop infrastructure, would allow
employees to use run apps on the company network without installing locally.
NO.555 Which of the following organizations sets frameworks and controls for optimal security
configuration on systems?
(A). ISO
(B). GDPR
(C). PCI DSS
(D). NIST
Answer: D

NO.556 An attacker is trying to gain access by installing malware on a website that is known to be
visited by the target victims. Which of the following is the attacker MOST likely attempting?
(A). A spear-phishing attack
(B). A watering-hole attack
(C). Typo squatting
(D). A phishing attack
Answer: B

NO.557 An organization discovered files with proprietary financial data have been deleted. The files
have been recovered from backup but every time the Chief Financial Officer logs in to the file server,
the same files are deleted again No other users are experiencing this issue. Which of the following
types of malware is MOST likely causing this behavior?
(A). Logic bomb
(B). Crypto malware
(C). Spyware
(D). Remote access Trojan
Answer: A

Logic bomb: a set of instructions secretly incorporated into a program so that if a particular condition
is satisfied they will be carried out, usually with harmful effects.
NO.558 Users at organization have been installing programs from the internet on their workstations
without first proper authorization. The organization maintains a portal from which users can install
standardized programs. However, some users have administrative access on their workstations to
enable legacy programs to function property. Which of the following should the security
administrator consider implementing to address this issue?
(A). Application code signing
(B). Application whitellsting
(C). Data loss prevention
(D). Web application firewalls
Answer: B

NO.559 Which of the following algorithms has the SMALLEST key size?
(A). DES
(B). Twofish
(C). RSA
(D). AES
Answer: B

NO.560 Which of the following is a cryptographic concept that operates on a fixed length of bits?
Answer: A

Single-key or symmetric-key encryption algorithms create a fixed length of bits known as a block
cipher with a secret key that the creator/sender uses to encipher data (encryption) and the receiver
uses to decipher it.
NO.561 Which of the following allows for functional test data to be used in new systems for testing
and training purposes to protect the real data?
(A). Data encryption
(B). Data masking
(C). Data deduplication
(D). Data minimization
Answer: B

https://ktechproducts.com/Datamask#:~:text=Data%20Masking%20is%20a%20method%20of%20creating%20a,partial%20data%20ba
sed%20on%20the%20user%E2%80%99s%20security%20permissions.
The main reason for applying masking to a data field is to protect data that is classified as personally
identifiable information, sensitive personal data, or commercially sensitive data. However, the data
must remain usable for the purposes of undertaking valid test cycles. It must also look real and
appear consistent. It is more common to have masking applied to data that is represented outside of
a corporate production system. In other words, where data is needed for the purpose of application
development, building program extensions and conducting various test cycles
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Data_masking
NO.562 An enterprise has hired an outside security firm to conduct penetration testing on its
network and applications. The firm has not received information about the internal architecture.
Which of the following BEST represents the type of testing that will occur?
(A). Gray-box
(B). White-box
(C). Bug bounty
(D). Black-box
Answer: D

NO.563 The Chief information Securtty Officer (CISO) has decided to reorganize security staff to
concentrate on incident response and to outsource outbound Internet URL categorization and
filtering to an outside cornpany. Additionally, the CISO would Ske this solution to provide the same
protections even when a company laptop or mobile device ts away from # home office. Which of the
following should the CISO choose?
(A). CASB
(B). Next-generation SWG
(C). NGFW
(D). Web-application firewall
Answer: A

NO.564 A user reports trouble using a corporate laptop. The laptop freezes and responds slowly
when writing documents and the mouse pointer occasional disappears.
The task list shows the following results
Which of the following is MOST likely the issue?
(A). RAT
(B). PUP
(C). Spyware
(D). Keylogger
Answer: A

NO.565 The Chief Technology Officer of a local college would like visitors to utilize the school's WiFi
but must be able to associate potential malicious activity to a specific person. Which of the following
would BEST allow this objective to be met?
(A). Requiring all new, on-site visitors to configure their devices to use WPS
(B). Implementing a new SSID for every event hosted by the college that has visitors
(C). Creating a unique PSK for every visitor when they arrive at the reception area
(D). Deploying a captive portal to capture visitors' MAC addresses and names
Answer: D

NO.566 A company provides mobile devices to its users to permit access to email and enterprise
applications. The company recently started allowing users to select from several different vendors
and device models. When configuring the MDM, which of the following is a key security implication
of this heterogeneous device approach?
(A). The most common set of MDM configurations will become the effective set of enterprise mobile
security controls.
(B). All devices will need to support SCEP-based enrollment; therefore, the heterogeneity of the
chosen architecture may unnecessarily expose private keys to adversaries.
(C). Certain devices are inherently less secure than others, so compensatory controls will be needed
to address the delta between device vendors.
(D). MDMs typically will not support heterogeneous deployment environments, so multiple MDMs
will need to be installed and configured.
Answer: C

NO.567 After a recent external audit, the compliance team provided a list of several non-compliant,
in-scope hosts that were not encrypting cardholder data at rest, Which of the following compliance
frameworks would address the compliance team's GREATEST concern?
(A). PCI DSS
(B). GDPR
(C). ISO 27001
(D). NIST CSF
Answer: A

NO.568 A security analyst is evaluating solutions to deploy an additional layer of protection for a
web application The goal is to allow only encrypted communications without relying on network
devices Which of the following can be implemented?
(A). HTTP security header
(B). DNSSEC implementation
(C). SRTP
(D). S/MIME
Answer: C

NO.569 An information security manager for an organization is completing a PCI DSS selfassessment for the first time. which of the is following MOST likely reason for this type of
assessment?
(A). An international expansion project is currently underway.
(B). Outside consultants utilize this tool to measure security maturity.
(C). The organization is expecting to process credit card information.
(D). A government regulator has requested this audit to be completed
Answer: C

NO.570 A security administrator suspects there may be unnecessary services running on a server.
Which of the following tools will the administrator MOST likely use to confirm the suspicions?
(A). Nmap
(B). Wireshark
(C). Autopsy
(D). DNSEnum
Answer: A

NO.571 Which of the technologies is used to actively monitor for specific file types being
transmitted on the network?
(A). File integrity monitoring
(B). Honeynets
(C). Tcpreplay
(D). Data loss prevention
Answer: B

NO.572 A company labeled some documents with the public sensitivity classification This means the
documents can be accessed by:
(A). employees of other companies and the press
(B). all members of the department that created the documents
(C). only the company's employees and those listed in the document
(D). only the individuate listed in the documents
Answer: A

NO.573 Which of the following BEST describes a social-engineering attack that relies on an executive
at a small business visiting a fake banking website where credit card and account details are
harvested?
(A). Whaling
(B). Spam
(C). Invoice scam
(D). Pharming
Answer: D

Pharming: Phishing attempt to trick a user to access a different or fake website (usually by modifying
hosts file)
NO.574 An organization is developing a plan in the event of a complete loss of critical systems and
dat a. Which of the following plans is the organization MOST likely developing?
(A). Incident response
(B). Communications
(C). Disaster recovery
(D). Data retention
Answer: C

NO.575 An organization's RPO for a critical system is two hours. The system is used Monday through
Friday, from 9:00 am to 5:00 pm. Currently, the organization performs a full backup every Saturday
that takes four hours to complete. Which of the following additional backup implementations would
be the BEST way for the analyst to meet the business requirements?
(A). Incremental backups Monday through Friday at 6:00 p.m and differential backups hourly
(B). Full backups Monday through Friday at 6:00 p.m and incremental backups hourly.
(C). incremental backups Monday through Friday at 6:00 p.m and full backups hourly.
(D). Full backups Monday through Friday at 6:00 p.m and differential backups hourly.
Answer: A

NO.576 A security analyst was called to investigate a file received directly from a hardware
manufacturer. The analyst is trying to determine whether odified in transit before installation on the
user's computer. Which of the following can be used to safely assess the file?
(A). Check the hash of the installation file
(B). Match the file names
(C). Verify the URL download location
(D). Verify the code-signing certificate
Answer: A

The hardware manufacturer will post the hash of the file publicly, and anyone who receives a copy of
that file will be able to run a checksum on the file themselves, and compare them to the official
manufacturer-provided checksum. Hashing is almost always the correct answer in these type of
questions. You'll see a lot of Github repositories using hashed checksums as well for verification, and I
recently just installed Java onto my new computer. Java provided me with a hashed checksum for the
setup executable.
NO.577 An organization has decided to host its web application and database in the cloud Which of
the following BEST describes the security concerns for this decision?
(A). Access to the organization's servers could be exposed to other cloud-provider clients
(B). The cloud vendor is a new attack vector within the supply chain
(C). Outsourcing the code development adds risk to the cloud provider
(D). Vendor support will cease when the hosting platforms reach EOL.
Answer: B

NO.578 To mitigate the impact of a single VM being compromised by another VM on the same
hypervisor, an administrator would like to utilize a technical control to further segregate the traffic.
Which of the following solutions would BEST accomplish this objective?
(A). Install a hypervisor firewall to filter east-west traffic.
(B). Add more VLANs to the hypervisor network switches.
(C). Move exposed or vulnerable VMs to the DMZ.
(D). Implement a zero-trust policy and physically segregate the hypervisor servers.
Answer: B

NO.579 Which of the following would a European company interested in implementing a technical,
hands-on set of security standards MOST likely choose?
(A). GOPR
(B). CIS controls
(C). . ISO 27001
(D). Is0 37000
Answer: A

NO.580 Which of the following BEST describes when an organization utilizes a ready-to-use
application from a cloud provider?
Answer: B

SaaS, or software as a service, is on-demand access to ready-to-use, cloud-hosted application
software.
https://www.ibm.com/cloud/learn/iaas-paas-saas
NO.581 Which of the following explains why RTO is included in a BIA?
(A). It identifies the amount of allowable downtime for an application or system,
(B). It prioritizes risks so the organization can allocate resources appropriately,
(C). It monetizes the loss of an asset and determines a break-even point for risk mitigation.
(D). It informs the backup approach so that the organization can recover data to a known time.
Answer: A

NO.582 A customer has reported that an organization's website displayed an image of a smiley (ace
rather than the expected web page for a short time two days earlier. A security analyst reviews log
tries and sees the following around the lime of the incident:
Which of the following is MOST likely occurring?
(A). Invalid trust chain
(B). Domain hijacking
(C). DNS poisoning
(D). URL redirection
Answer: C

NO.583 A security analyst discovers that a company username and password database was posted
on an internet forum. The username and passwords are stored in plan text. Which of the following
would mitigate the damage done by this type of data exfiltration in the future?
(A). Create DLP controls that prevent documents from leaving the network
(B). Implement salting and hashing
(C). Configure the web content filter to block access to the forum.
(D). Increase password complexity requirements
Answer: A

NO.584 Two hospitals merged into a single organization. The privacy officer requested a review of
all records to ensure encryption was used during record storage, in compliance with regulations.
During the review, the officer discovered thai medical diagnosis codes and patient names were left
unsecured. Which of the following types of data does this combination BEST represent?
(A). Personal health information
(B). Personally Identifiable Information
(C). ToKenized data
(D). Proprietary data
Answer: A

NO.585 During a forensic investigation, a security analyst discovered that the following command
was run on a compromised host:
Which of the following attacks occurred?
(A). Buffer overflow
(B). Pass the hash
(C). SQL injection
(D). Replay attack
Answer: B

NO.586 The Chief Security Officer (CSO) at a major hospital wants to implement SSO to help improve
in the environment patient data, particularly at shared terminals. The Chief Risk Officer (CRO) is
concerned that training and guidance have been provided to frontline staff, and a risk analysis has
not been performed. Which of the following is the MOST likely cause of the CRO's concerns?
(A). SSO would simplify username and password management, making it easier for hackers to pass
guess accounts.
(B). SSO would reduce password fatigue, but staff would still need to remember more complex
passwords.
(C). SSO would reduce the password complexity for frontline staff.
(D). SSO would reduce the resilience and availability of system if the provider goes offline.
Answer: D

NO.587 A systems administrator needs to install the same X.509 certificate on multiple servers.
Which of the following should the administrator use?
(A). Key escrow
(B). A self-signed certificate
(C). Certificate chaining
(D). An extended validation certificate
Answer: C

NO.588 An attacker is exploiting a vulnerability that does not have a patch available. Which of the
following is the attacker exploiting?
(A). Zero-day
(B). Default permissions
(C). Weak encryption
(D). Unsecure root accounts
Answer: A

NO.589 A nuclear plant was the victim of a recent attack, and all the networks were air gapped. A
subsequent investigation revealed a worm as the source of the issue. Which of the following BEST
explains what happened?
(A). A malicious USB was introduced by an unsuspecting employee.
(B). The ICS firmware was outdated
(C). A local machine has a RAT installed.
(D). The HVAC was connected to the maintenance vendor.
Answer: A

NO.590 Asecurity engineer needs to recommend a solution to defend against malicious actors
misusing protocols and being allowed through network defenses Which of the following will the
engineer MOST likely recommend?
(A). Acontent filter
(B). AWAF
(C). Anext-generation firewall
(D). An IDS
Answer: C

NO.591 Which of the following provides a calculated value for known vulnerabilities so
organizations can prioritize mitigation steps?
(A). CVSS
(B). SIEM
(C). SOAR
(D). CVE
Answer: A

CVSS is maintained by the Forum of Incident Response and Security Teams (first.org/cvss). CVSS
metrics generate a score from 0 to 10 based on characteristics of the vulnerability, such as whether it
can be triggered remotely or needs local access, whether user intervention is required, and so on
NO.592 Employees at a company are receiving unsolicited text messages on their corporate cell
phones. The unsolicited text messages contain a password reset Link. Which of the attacks is being
used to target the company?
(A). Phishing
(B). Vishing
(C). Smishing
(D). Spam
Answer: C

Smishing is a type of phishing attack which begins with an attacker sending a text message to an
individual. The message contains social engineering tactics to convince the person to click on a
malicious link or send sensitive information to the attacker. Criminals use smishing attacks for
purposes like:
Learn login credentials to accounts via credential phishing
Discover private data like social security numbers
Send money to the attacker
Install malware on a phone
Establish trust before using other forms of contact like phone calls or emails Attackers may pose as
trusted sources like a government organization, a person you know, or your bank. And messages
often come with manufactured urgency and time-sensitive threats. This can make it more difficult for
a victim to notice a scam.
Phone numbers are easy to spoof with VoIP texting, where users can create a virtual number to send
and receive texts. If a certain phone number is flagged for spam, criminals can simply recycle it and
use a new one.
NO.593 A security engineer is concerned about using an agent on devices that relies completely on
defined known-bad signatures. The security engineer wants to implement a tool with multiple
components including the ability to track, analyze, and monitor devices without reliance on
definitions alone. Which of the following solutions BEST fits this use case?
(A). EDR
(B). DLP
(C). NGFW
(D). HIPS
Answer: A

The acronym EDR stands for Endpoint Detection and Response and is also known as EDTR. It is an
endpoint security solution that is responsible for continuous monitoring of endpoints. This
permanent monitoring enables the technology to detect and respond to cyber threats such as
malware or ransomware at an early stage. The basis for this is always the analysis of context-related
information, which can be used to make corrective proposals for recovery.
NO.594 Which of the following would be BEST for a technician to review to determine the total risk
an organization can bear when assessing a "cloud-first" adoption strategy?
(A). Risk matrix
(B). Risk tolerance
(C). Risk register
(D). Risk appetite
Answer: D

NO.595 A security analyst has been tasked with finding the maximum amount of data loss that can
occur before ongoing business operations would be impacted. Which of the following terms BEST
defines this metric?
(A). MTTR
(B). RTO
(C). RPO
(D). MTBF
Answer: A

NO.596 A security administrator needs to inspect in-transit files on the enterprise network to search
for Pll, credit card data, and classification words. Which of the following would be the BEST to use?
(A). IDS solution
(B). EDR solution
(C). HIPS software solution
(D). Network DLP solution
Answer: D

NO.597 Which of the following is the BEST action to foster a consistent and auditable incident
response process?
(A). Incent new hires to constantly update the document with external knowledge.
(B). Publish the document in a central repository that is easily accessible to the organization.
(C). Restrict eligibility to comment on the process to subject matter experts of each IT silo.
(D). Rotate CIRT members to foster a shared responsibility model in the organization.
Answer: B

NO.598 it a current private key is compromised, which of the following would ensure it cannot be
used to decrypt ail historical data?
(A). Pertect forward secrecy
(B). Eiliptic-curve cryptography
(C). Key stretching
(D). Homomorphic encryption
Answer: B

NO.599 A security engineer is building a file transfer solution to send files to a business partner. The
users would like to drop off the files in a specific directory and have the server send to the business
partner. The connection to the business partner is over the internet and needs to be secure. Which of
the following can be used?
(A). S/MIME
(B). LDAPS
(C). SSH
(D). SRTP
Answer: B

NO.600 After a recent security breach a security analyst reports that several admimstratrve
usemames and passwords are being sent via cieartext across the network to access network devices
over prot 23 Which of the following should be implemented so all credentials sent over the network
are encrypted when remotely accessing and configunng network devices?
Answer: A

NO.601 An engineer wants to inspect traffic to a cluster of web servers in a cloud environment.
Which of the following solutions should the engineer implement?
(A). Proxy server
(B). WAF
(C). Load balancer
(D). VPN
Answer: B

NO.602 A Chief Executive Officer (CEO) is dissatisfied with the level of service from the company's
new service provider. The service provider is preventing the CEO from sending email from a work
account to a personal account. Which of the following types of service providers is being used?
(A). Telecommunications service provider
(B). Cloud service provider
(C). Master managed service provider
(D). Managed security service provider
Answer: B

NO.603 After gaining access to a dual-homed (i.e.. wired and wireless) multifunction device by
exploiting a vulnerability in the device's firmware, a penetration tester then gains shell access on
another networked asset This technique is an example of:
(A). privilege escalation
(B). footprinting
(C). persistence
(D). pivoting.
Answer: A

NO.604 Which of the following terms should be included in a contract to help a company monitor
the ongoing security maturity of a new vendor?
(A). A right-to-audit clause allowing for annual security audits
(B). Requirements for event logs to be kept for a minimum of 30 days
(C). Integration of threat intelligence in the company's AV
(D). A data-breach clause requiring disclosure of significant data loss
Answer: A

NO.605 A security analyst is receiving several alerts per user and is trying to determine If various
logins are malicious. The security analyst would like to create a baseline of normal operations and
reduce noise. Which of the following actions should the security analyst perform?
(A). Adjust the data flow from authentication sources to the SIEM.
(B). Disable email alerting and review the SIEM directly.
(C). Adjust the sensitivity levels of the SIEM correlation engine.
(D). Utilize behavioral analysis to enable the SIEM's learning mode.
Answer: D

NO.606 An organization is developing an authentication service for use at the entry and exit ports of
country borders.
The service will use data feeds obtained from passport systems, passenger manifests, and highdefinition video feeds from CCTV systems that are located at the ports. The service will incorporate
machine-learning techniques to eliminate biometric enrollment processes while still allowing
authorities to identify passengers with increasing accuracy over time. The more frequently
passengers travel, the more accurately the service will identify them. Which of the following
biometrics will MOST likely be used, without the need for enrollment? (Choose two.)
(A). Voice
(B). Gait
(C). Vein
(D). Facial
(E). Retina
(F). Fingerprint
Answer: B,D

NO.607 A security analyst is working on a project to implement a solution that monitors network
communications and provides alerts when abnormal behavior is detected Which of the following is
the security analyst MOST likely implementing?
(A). Vulnerability scans
(B). User behavior analysis
(C). Security orchestration, automation, and response
(D). Threat hunting
Answer: C

SOAR solutions automatically aggregate and validate data from various sources, including threat
intelligence, security information and event management (SIEM), and user and entity behavior
analytics (UEBA) tools. It helps make security operations centers (SOCs) intelligence-driven, providing
the context needed to make informed decisions and accelerate detection and response.
NO.608 A critical file server is being upgraded and the systems administrator must determine which
RAID level the new server will need to achieve parity and handle two simultaneous disk failures.
Which of the following RAID levels meets this requirements?
(A). RAID 0+1
(B). RAID 2
(C). RAID 5
(D). RAID 6
Answer: C

NO.609 Digital signatures use asymmetric encryption. This means the message is encrypted with:
(A). the sender's private key and decrypted with the sender's public key
(B). the sender's public key and decrypted with the sender's private key
(C). the sender's private key and decrypted with the recipient's public key.
(D). the sender's public key and decrypted with the recipient's private key
Answer: C

NO.610 A Chief Security Officer (CSO) is concerned about the volume and integrity of sensitive
information that is exchanged between the organization and a third party through email. The CSO is
particularly concerned about an unauthorized party who is intercepting information that is in transit
between the two organizations. Which of the following would address the CSO's concerns?
Answer: E

NO.611 A penetration tester was able to compromise an internal server and is now trying to pivot
the current session in a network lateral movement Which of the following tools if available on the
server, will provide the MOST useful information for the next assessment step?
(A). Autopsy
(B). Cuckoo
(C). Memdump
(D). Nmap
Answer: D

Nmap is basically mapping a network. The purpose of lateral pivoting is to gain a new perspective, or
new information that will allow you to either privilege escalate, or to achieve the goal of the attack. If
the compromised server the pen tester is exploiting has nmap enabled, the pen tester will be able to
get an in-depth inside view of the internal network structure.
NO.612 Which of the following types of attacks is specific to the individual it targets?
(A). Whaling
(B). Pharming
(C). Smishing
(D). Credential harvesting
Answer: A

NO.613 Which of the following often operates in a client-server architecture to act as a service
repository. provicing enterprise consumers access to structured threat intelligence data?
(A). STIX
(B). CIRT
(C). OSINT
(D). TAXII
Answer: B

NO.614 While reviewing the wireless router, a systems administrator of a small business determines
someone is spoofing the MAC address of an authorized device.
Given the table below:
Which of the following should be the administrator's NEXT step to detect if there is a rague system
without impacting availability?
(A). Conduct a ping sweep.
(B). Physically check each system.
(C). Deny Internet access to the "UNKNOWN" hostname.
(D). Apply MAC filtering.
Answer: D

NO.615 A security analyst is evaluating the risks of authorizing multiple security solutions to collect
data from the company's cloud environment Which of the following is an immediate consequence of
these integrations?
(A). Non-compliance with data sovereignty rules
(B). Loss of the vendor's interoperability support
(C). Mandatory deployment of a SIEM solution
(D). Increase in the attack surface
Answer: A

NO.616 A large financial services firm recently released information regarding a security breach
within its corporate network that began several years before. During the time frame in which the
breach occurred, indicators show an attacker gained administrative access to the network through a
file downloaded from a social media site and subsequently installed it without the user's knowledge.
Since the compromise, the attacker was able to take command and control the computer systems
anonymously while obtaining sensitive corporate and personal employee information. Which of the
following methods did the attacker MOST likely use to gain access?
(A). A bot
(B). A fileless virus
(C). A logic bomb
(D). A RAT
Answer: D

Remote access trojans (RATs) are malware designed to allow an attacker to remotely control an
infected computer. Once the RAT is running on a compromised system, the attacker can send
commands to it and receive data back in response.
NO.617 Which of the following is a reason why an organization would define an AUP?
(A). To define the lowest level of privileges needed for access and use of the organization's resources
(B). To define the set of rules and behaviors for users of the organization's IT systems
(C). To define the intended partnership between two organizations
(D). To define the availability and reliability characteristics between an IT provider and consumer
Answer: A

NO.618 A network administrator needs to determine Ihe sequence of a server farm's logs. Which of
the following should Ihe administrator consider? (Select TWO).
(A). Chain of custody
(B). Tags
(C). Reports
(D). Time stamps
(E). Hash values
(F). Time offset
Answer: A,D

NO.619 A security engineer needs to enhance MFA access to sensitive areas in a building. A key card
and fingerprint scan are already in use. Which of the following would add another factor of
authentication?
(A). Hard token
(B). Retina scan
(C). SMS text
(D). Keypad PIN
Answer: B

NO.620 Joe, a security analyst, recently performed a network discovery to fully understand his
organization's electronic footprint from a "public" perspective. Joe ran a set of commands and
received the following output:
Which of the following can be determined about the organization's public presence and security
posture? (Select TWO).
(A). Joe used Whois to produce this output.
(B). Joe used cURL to produce this output.
(C). Joe used Wireshark to produce this output.
(D). The organization has adequate information available in public registration.
E: The organization has too much information available in public registration.
(E). The organization has too little information available in public registration.
Answer: A,D

NO.621 A new vulnerability in the SMB protocol on the Windows systems was recently discovered,
but no patches are currently available to resolve the issue. The security administrator is concerned tf
servers in the company's DMZ will be vulnerable to external attack; however, the administrator
cannot disable the service on the servers, as SMB is used by a number of internal systems and
applications on the LAN. Which of the following TCP ports should be blocked for all external inbound
connections to the DMZ as a workaround to protect the servers? (Select TWO).
(A). 135
(B). 139
(C). 143
(D). 161
(E). 443
(F). 445
Answer: A,E

NO.622 A security analyst was asked to evaluate a potential attack that occurred on a publicly
accessible section of the company's website The malicious actor posted an entry in an attempt to
trick users into cltckmg the following:
Which of the following was MOST likely observed?
(A). DLL injection
(B). Session replay
(C). SOLI
(D). XSS
Answer: B

NO.623 A company reduced the area utilized in its datacenter by creating virtual networking
through automation and by creating provisioning routes and rules through scripting. Which of the
following does this example describe?
(A). laC
(B). MSSP
(C). Containers
(D). SaaS
Answer: A

NO.624 A recent audit cited a risk involving numerous low-criticality vulnerabilities created by a web
application using a third-party library. The development staff state there are still customers using the
application even though it is end of life and it would be a substantial burden to update the
application for compatibility with more secure libraries. Which of the following would be the MOST
prudent course of action?
(A). Accept the risk if there is a clear road map for timely decommission
(B). Deny the risk due to the end-of-life status of the application.
(C). Use containerization to segment the application from other applications to eliminate the risk
(D). Outsource the application to a third-party developer group
Answer: C

NO.625 Which of the following can be used by a monitoring tool to compare values and detect
password leaks without providing the actual credentials?
(A). Hashing
(B). Tokenization
(C). Masking
(D). Encryption
Answer: A

https://resources.infosecinstitute.com/topic/10-popular-password-cracking-tools/
NO.626 A vulnerability has been discovered and a known patch to address the vulnerability does not
exist. Which of the following controls works BEST until a proper fix is released?
(A). Detective
(B). Compensating
(C). Deterrent
(D). Corrective
Answer: A

NO.627 A security analyst is logged into a Windows file server and needs to see who is accessing
files and from which computers Which of the following tools should the analyst use?
(A). netstat
(B). net share
(C). netcat
(D). nbtstat
(E). net session
Answer: A

NO.628 A local coffee shop runs a small WiFi hot-spot for its customers that utilizes WPA2-PSK. The
coffee shop would like to stay current with security trends and wants to implement WPA3 to make its
WiFi even more secure. Which of the following technologies will the coffee shop MOST likely use in
place of PSK?
(A). WEP
(B). MSCHAP
(C). wes
(D). SAE
Answer: D

NO.629 A security administrator is setting up a SIEM to help monitor for notable events across the
enterprise. Which of the following control types does this BEST represent?
(A). Preventive
(B). Compensating
(C). Corrective
(D). Detective
Answer: D

NO.630 During a recent security assessment, a vulnerability was found in a common OS, The OS
vendor was unaware of the issue and promised to release a patch within next quarter, Which of the
following BEST describes this type of vulnerability?
(A). Legacy operating system
(B). Weak configuration
(C). Zero day
(D). Supply chain
Answer: C

NO.631 Company engineers regularly participate in a public Internet forum with other engineers
throughout the industry. Which of the following tactics would an attacker MOST likely use in this
scenario?
(A). Watering-hole attack
(B). Credential harvesting
(C). Hybrid warfare
(D). Pharming
Answer: A

An attack in which an attacker targets specific groups or organizations, discovers which websites they
frequent, and injects malicious code into those sites.
NO.632 Which of the following environments typically hosts the current version configurations and
code, compares user-story responses and workflow, and uses a modified version of actual data for
testing?
(A). Development
(B). Staging
(C). Production
(D). Test
Answer: B

NO.633 A security researcher is using an adversary's infrastructure and TTPs and creating a named
group to track those targeted Which of the following is the researcher MOST likely using?
(A). The Cyber Kill Chain
(B). The incident response process
(C). The Diamond Model of Intrusion Analysis
(D). MITRE ATT&CK
Answer: C

NO.634 Which of the following is a risk that is specifically associated with hosting applications in the
public cloud?
(A). Unsecured root accounts
(B). Zero-day
(C). Shared tenancy
(D). Insider threat
Answer: C

NO.635 A security manager for a retailer needs to reduce the scope of a project to comply with PCI
DSS. The PCI data is located in different offices than where credit cards are accepted. All the offices
are connected via MPLS back to the primary datacenter. Which of the following should the security
manager implement to achieve the objective?
(A). Segmentation
(B). Containment
(C). Geofencing
(D). Isolation
Answer: A

NO.636 A security analyst is investigating a phishing email that contains a malicious document
directed to the company's Chief Executive Officer (CEO). Which of the following should the analyst
perform to understand the threat and retrieve possible IoCs?
(A). Run a vulnerability scan against the CEOs computer to find possible vulnerabilities
(B). Install a sandbox to run the malicious payload in a safe environment
(C). Perform a traceroute to identify the communication path
(D). Use netstat to check whether communication has been made with a remote host
Answer: B

NO.637 A cybersecurity analyst reviews the log files from a web server and sees a series of files that
indicates a directory-traversal attack has occurred. Which of the following is the analyst MOST likely
seeing?
A)
B)
C)
D)
(A). Option A
(B). Option B
(C). Option C
(D). Option D
Answer: B

NO.638 An attacker has successfully exfiltrated several non-salted password hashes from an online
system. Given the logs below:
Which of the following BEST describes the type of password attack the attacker is performing?
(A). Dictionary
(B). Pass-the-hash
(C). Brute-force
(D). Password spraying
Answer: A

NO.639 A junior security analyst iss conducting an analysis after passwords were changed on
multiple accounts without users' interaction. The SIEM have multiple logtn entnes with the following
text:
Which of Ihe following is the MOST likely attack conducted on the environment?
(A). Malicious script
(B). Privilege escalation
(C). Doman hijacking
(D). DNS poisoning
Answer: A

NO.640 Several users have opened tickets with the help desk. The help desk has reassigned the
tickets to a secunty analyst for further review The security analyst reviews the following metrics:
Which of the following is MOST likely the result of the security analyst's review?
(A). The ISP is dropping outbound connections
(B). The user of the Sales-PC fell for a phishing attack
(C). Corporate PCs have been turned into a botnet
(D). An on-path attack is taking place between PCs and the router
Answer: D

NO.641 To secure an application after a large data breach, an e-commerce site will be resetting all
users' credentials.
Which of the following will BEST ensure the site's users are not compromised after the reset?
(A). A password reuse policy
(B). Account lockout after three failed attempts
(C). Encrypted credentials in transit
(D). A geofencing policy based on login history
Answer: C

NO.642 An organization suffered an outage and a critical system took 90 minutes to come back
online. Though there was no data loss during the outage, the expectation was that the critical system
would be available again within 60 minutes Which of the following is the 60-minute expectation an
example of:
(A). MTBF
(B). RPO
(C). MTTR
(D). RTO
Answer: D

https://www.enterprisestorageforum.com/management/rpo-and-rto-understanding-thedifferences/
NO.643 Which of the following is the GREATEST security concern when outsourcing code
development to third-party contractors for an internet-facing application?
(A). Intellectual property theft
(B). Elevated privileges
(C). Unknown backdoor
(D). Quality assurance
Answer: C

NO.644 Asecurity analyst is reviewing a penetration-testing report from a third-party contractor.
The penetration testers used the organization's new API to bypass a driver to perform privilege
escalation on the organization's web servers. Upon looking at the API, the security analyst realizes
the particular API call was to a legacy system running an outdated OS. Which of the following is the
MOST likely attack type?
(A). Request forgery
(B). Session replay
(C). DLL injection
(D). Shimming
Answer: A

NO.645 A COMPANY HAS DESCOVERED UNA mans DEVICE ARE USING ITS WIFI NETWORK, AND IT
WANTS TO HARDEN THE ACCESS POINT TO IMPROVE SECURITY WHICH OF THE FOLLOWING
CONFIGURATIONS SHOULD AN ANALYST ENABLE TO EMPROVE SECURITY? ( SELECT TWO)
(A). RADIUS
(B). PEAP
(C). WPS
(D). WEP-TKIP
(E). SSL
(F). WPA2-PSK
Answer: D,F

NO.646 Server administrator want to configure a cloud solution so that computing memory and
processor usage is maximized most efficiently acress a number of virtual servers. They also need to
avoid potential denial-of-service situations caused by availiability. Which of the following should
administrator configure to maximize system availability while efficiently utilizing available computing
power?
(A). Dynamic resource allocation
(B). High availability
(C). Segmentation
(D). Container security
Answer: C

NO.647 Which of the following would be indicative of a hidden audio file found inside of a piece of
source code?
(A). Steganography
(B). Homomotphic encryption
(C). Cipher surte
(D). Blockchain
Answer: A

Steganography is the technique of hiding secret data within an ordinary, non-secret, file or message
in order to avoid detection; the secret data is then extracted at its destination. The use of
steganography can be combined with encryption as an extra step for hiding or protecting data. The
word steganography is derived from the Greek words steganos (meaning hidden or covered) and the
Greek root graph (meaning to write).
NO.648 In which of the following common use cases would steganography be employed?
(A). Obfuscation
(B). Integrity
(C). Non-repudiation
(D). Blockchain
Answer: A

NO.649 A security team will be outsourcing several key functions to a third party and will require
that:
* Several of the functions will carry an audit burden.
* Attestations will be performed several times a year.
* Reports will be generated on a monthly basis.
Which of the following BEST describes the document that is used to define these requirements and
stipulate how and when they are performed by the third party?
(A). MOU
(B). AUP
(C). SLA
(D). MSA
Answer: C

A service level agreement (SLA) is a contract between a service provider and a customer that outlines
the services that are to be provided and the expected levels of performance. It is used to define the
requirements for the service, including any attestations and reports that must be generated, and the
timescales in which these must be completed. It also outlines any penalties for failing to meet these
requirements. SLAs are essential for ensuring that third-party services are meeting the agreed upon
performance levels.
Reference:
CompTIA Security+ Get Certified Get Ahead: SY0-601 Study Guide by Darril Gibson
https://www.amazon.com/CompTIA-Security-Certified-Ahead-SY0-601/dp/1260117558 Note: SLA is
the best document that is used to define these requirements and stipulate how and when they are
performed by the third party.
NO.650 Which of tre following would BEST identity and remediate a catatoss event in an enterprise
using third-pany, web-based services and file-sharing platanmns?
Answer: B

NO.651 Which of the following disaster recovery tests is The LEAST time-consuming for the disaster
recovery team?
(A). Tabletop
(B). Parallel
(C). Full interruption
(D). Simulation
Answer: D

NO.652 An organization is outlining data stewardship roles and responsibilities. Which of the
following employee roles would determine the purpose of data and how to process it?
(A). Data custodian
(B). Data controller
(C). Data proton officer
(D). Data processor
Answer: C

NO.653 A company was compromised, and a security analyst discovered the attacker was able to
get access to a service account. The following logs were discovered during the investigation:
Which of the following MOST likely would have prevented the attacker from learning the service
account name?
(A). Race condition testing
(B). Proper error handling
(C). Forward web server logs to a SIEM
(D). Input sanitization
Answer: B

NO.654 A software company is analyzing a process that detects software vulnerabilities at the
earliest stage possible. The goal is to scan the source looking for unsecure practices and weaknesses
before the application is deployed in a runtime environment. Which of the following would BEST
assist the company with this objective?
(A). Use fuzzing testing
(B). Use a web vulnerability scanner
(C). Use static code analysis
(D). Use a penetration-testing OS
Answer: C

NO.655 A security operations analyst is using the company's SIEM solution to correlate alerts. Which
of the following stages of the incident response process is this an example of?
(A). Eradication
(B). Recovery
(C). Identification
(D). Preparation
Answer: C

NO.656 Which of the following tools is effective in preventing a user from accessing unauthorized
removable media?
(A). USB data blocker
(B). Faraday cage
(C). Proximity reader
(D). Cable lock
Answer: B

NO.657 DURING A SECURITY ASSESSMENT. A SECURITY ANALYST FINDS A FILE WITH OVERLY
PERMISSIVE PERMISSION. WICH OF THE FOLLOWING TOOL WILL ALLOW THE ANALYST TO REDUCE
THR PERMISSONFOR THE EXIXTING USER AND GROUPS AND REMOVE THE SET-USER-ID BIT FROM
THE FILE?
(A). 1a
(B). Chflaga
(C). Chmod
(D). Leof
(E). aeuid
Answer: C

NO.658 A university with remote campuses, which all use different service providers, loses Internet
connectivity across all locations. After a few minutes, Internet and VoIP services are restored, only to
go offline again at random intervals, typically within four minutes of services being restored. Outages
continue throughout the day, impacting all inbound and outbound connections and services. Services
that are limited to the local LAN or WiFi network are not impacted, but all WAN and VoIP services are
affected.
Later that day, the edge-router manufacturer releases a CVE outlining the ability of an attacker to
exploit the SIP protocol handling on devices, leading to resource exhaustion and system reloads.
Which of the following BEST describe this type of attack? (Choose two.)
(A). DoS
(B). SSL stripping
(C). Memory leak
(D). Race condition
(E). Shimming
(F). Refactoring
Answer: A,D

NO.659 A cybersecurity administrator needs to implement a Layer 7 security control on a network
and block potential attacks. Which of the following can block an attack at Layer 7? (Select TWO).
(A). HIDS
(B). NIPS
(C). HSM
(D). WAF
(E). NAC
(F). NIDS
(G). Stateless firewall
Answer: B,D

NO.660 Which of the following would be BEST to establish between organizations to define the
responsibilities of each party outline the key deliverables and include monetary penalties for
breaches to manage third-party risk?
(A). An ARO
(B). An MOU
(C). An SLA
(D). A BPA
Answer: B

NO.661 hich of the following is the BEST method for ensuring non-repudiation?
(A). SSO
(B). Digital certificate
(C). Token
(D). SSH key
Answer: B

NO.662 A news article states hackers have been selling access to IoT camera feeds. Which of the
following is the Most likely reason for this issue?
(A). Outdated software
(B). Weak credentials
(C). Lack of encryption
(D). Backdoors
Answer: B

NO.663 Which of the following concepts BEST describes tracking and documenting changes to
software and managing access to files and systems?
(A). Version control
(B). Continuous monitoring
(C). Stored procedures
(D). Automation
Answer: A

https://www.perforce.com/blog/vcs/what-is-version-control
NO.664 A security monitoring company offers a service that alerts its customers if their credit cards
have been stolen. Which of the following is the MOST likely source of this information?
(A). STIX
(B). The dark web
(C). TAXI
(D). Social media
(E). PCI
Answer: B

NO.665 A company is implementing MFA for all applications that store sensitive dat a. The IT
manager wants MFA to be non-disruptive and user friendly. Which of the following technologies
should the IT manager use when implementing MFA?
(A). One-time passwords
(B). Email tokens
(C). Push notifications
(D). Hardware authentication
Answer: C

NO.666 A security administrator is seeking a solution to prevent unauthorized access to the internal
network. Which of the following security solutions should the administrator choose?
(A). MAC filtering
(B). Anti-malware
(C). Translation gateway
(D). VPN
Answer: D

A VPN (virtual private network) is a secure tunnel used to encrypt traffic and prevent unauthorized
access to the internal network. It is a secure way to extend a private network across public networks,
such as the Internet, and can be used to allow remote users to securely access resources on the
internal network. Additionally, a VPN can be used to prevent malicious traffic from entering the
internal network.
NO.667 A company is implementing a DLP solution on the file server. The file server has Pll. financial
information, and health information stored on it Depending on what type of data that is hosted on
the file server, the company wants different DLP rules assigned to the data Which of the following
should the company do to help accomplish this goal?
(A). Classify the data
(B). Mask the data
(C). Assign an application owner
(D). Perform a risk analysis
Answer: A

NO.668 A systems engineer is building a new system for production. Which of the following is the
FINAL step to be performed prior to promoting to production?
(A). Disable unneeded services.
(B). Install the latest security patches.
(C). Run a vulnerability scan.
(D). Encrypt all disks.
Answer: C

NO.669 When implementing automation with loT devices, which of the following should be
considered FIRST to keep the network secure?
(A). Z-Wave compatibility
(B). Network range
(C). Zigbee configuration
(D). Communication protocols
Answer: D

NO.670 A SOC is currently being outsourced. Which of the following is being used?
Answer: C

NO.671 A security analyst is investigating an incident to determine what an attacker was able to do
on a compromised laptop. The analyst reviews the following SIEM log:
Which of the following describes the method that was used to compromise the laptop?
(A). An attacker was able to move laterally from PC1 to PC2 using a pass-the-hash attack
(B). An attacker was able to bypass application whitelisting by emailing a spreadsheet attachment
with an embedded PowerShell in the file
(C). An attacker was able to install malware to the CAasdf234 folder and use it to gam administrator
nights and launch Outlook
(D). An attacker was able to phish user credentials successfully from an Outlook user profile
Answer: A

NO.672 A user enters a username and a password at the login screen for a web portal. A few
seconds later the following message appears on the screen: Please use a combination of numbers,
special characters, and letters in the password field. Which of the following concepts does this
message describe?
(A). Password complexity
(B). Password reuse
(C). Password history
(D). Password age
Answer: A

NO.673 After a recent security incident, a security analyst discovered that unnecessary ports were
open on a firewall policy for a web server. Which of the following firewall policies would be MOST
secure for a web server?
A)
B)
C)
D)
(A). Option A
(B). Option B
(C). Option C
(D). Option D
Answer: D

NO.674 A software developer needs to perform code-execution testing, black-box testing, and nonfunctional testing on a new product before its general release. Which of the following BEST describes
the tasks the developer is conducting?
(A). Verification
(B). Validation
(C). Normalization
(D). Staging
Answer: A

NO.675 Which of the following is a reason to publish files' hashes?
(A). To validate the integrity of the files
(B). To verify if the software was digitally signed
(C). To use the hash as a software activation key
(D). To use the hash as a decryption passphrase
Answer: A

NO.676 Accompany has a flat network that is deployed in the cloud. Security policy states that all
production and development servers must be segmented. Which of the following should be used to
design the network to meet the security requirements?
(A). CASB
(B). VPC
(C). Perimeter network
(D). WAF
Answer: A

NO.677 A security engineer is installing a WeAF io protect the company's website from malicious
wed requests over SSL, Which of the following is needed io meet the objective?
(A). A ere proxy
(B). A Geeryption certificate
(C). A gpill-tunnel VPN
(D). Load-balanced servere
Answer: B

NO.678 Multiple business accounts were compromised a few days after a public website had its
credentials database leaked on the internet No business emails were Identified in the breach, but the
security team thinks that the list of passwords exposed was later used to compromise business
accounls Which of Ihe following would mitigate the issue?
(A). Complexity requirements
(B). Password history
(C). Acceptable use policy
(D). Shared accounts
Answer: C

NO.679 A network administrator has been asked to install an IDS to improve the security posture of
an organization.
Which of the following control types is an IDS?
(A). Corrective
(B). Physical
(C). Detective
(D). Administrative
Answer: C

NO.680 A cloud service provider has created an environment where customers can connect existing
local networks to the cloud for additional computing resources and block internal HR applications
from reaching the cloud. Which of the following cloud models is being used?
(A). Public
(B). Community
(C). Hybrid
(D). Private
Answer: C

Hybrid cloud refers to a mixed computing, storage, and services environment made up of onpremises infrastructure, private cloud services, and a public cloud-such as Amazon Web Services
(AWS) or Microsoft Azure-with orchestration among the various platforms
NO.681 A new security engineer has started hardening systems. One of the hardening techniques
the engineer is using involves disabling remote logins to the NAS. Users are now reporting the
inability to use SCP to transfer files to the NAS, even though the data is still viewable from the users'
PCs. Which of the following is the MOST likely cause of this issue?
(A). TFTP was disabled on the local hosts
(B). SSH was turned off instead of modifying the configuration file
(C). Remote login was disabled in the networkd.conf instead of using the sshd.conf.
(D). Network services are no longer running on the NAS.
Answer: B

Disabling remote logins to the NAS likely involved turning off SSH instead of modifying the
configuration file. This would prevent users from using SCP to transfer files to the NAS, even though
the data is still viewable from the users' PCs. Source: TechTarget
NO.682 A security analyst is tasked with classifying data to be stored on company servers. Which of
the following should be classified as proprietary?
(A). Customers' dates of birth
(B). Customers' email addresses
(C). Marketing strategies
(D). Employee salaries
Answer: C

NO.683 A company would like to provide flexibility for employees on device preference. However,
the company is concerned about supporting too many different types of hardware. Which of the
following deployment models will provide the needed flexibility with the GREATEST amount of
control and security over company data and infrastructure?
(A). BYOD
(B). VDI
(C). COPE
(D). CYOD
Answer: A

NO.684 A company processes highly sensitive data and senior management wants to protect the
sensitive data by utilizing classification labels. Which of the following access control schemes would
be BEST for the company to implement?
(A). Discretionary
(B). Rule-based
(C). Role-based
(D). Mandatory
Answer: D

NO.685 A financial analyst is expecting an email containing sensitive information from a client.
When the email arrives, the analyst receives an error and is unable to open the encrypted message.
Which of the following is the MOST likely cause of the issue?
(A). The S/MME plug-in is not enabled.
(B). The SLL certificate has expired.
(C). Secure IMAP was not implemented
(D). POP3S is not supported
Answer: A

NO.686 An information security incident recently occurred at an organization, and the organization
was required to report the incident to authorities and notify the affected parties. When the
organization's customers became of aware of the incident, some reduced their orders or stopped
placing orders entirely. Which of the following is the organization experiencing?
(A). Reputation damage
(B). Identity theft
(C). Anonymlzation
(D). Interrupted supply chain
Answer: A

NO.687 A user must introduce a password and a USB key to authenticate against a secure computer,
and authentication is limited to the state in which the company resides. Which of the following
authentication concepts are in use?
(A). Something you know, something you have, and somewhere you are
(B). Something you know, something you can do, and somewhere you are
(C). Something you are, something you know, and something you can exhibit
(D). Something you have, somewhere you are, and someone you know
Answer: A

NO.688 A user is concerned that a web application will not be able to handle unexpected or random
input without crashing. Which of the following BEST describes the type of testing the user should
perform?
(A). Code signing
(B). Fuzzing
(C). Manual code review
(D). Dynamic code analysis
Answer: D

NO.689 A company has been experiencing very brief power outages from its utility company over
the last few months. These outages only last for one second each time. The utility company is aware
of the issue and Is working to replace a faulty transformer. Which of the following BEST describes
what the company should purchase to ensure its critical servers and network devices stay online?
(A). Dual power supplies
(B). AUPS
(C). A generator
(D). APDU
Answer: B

NO.690 A Chief Security Officer (CSO) is concerned about the amount of PII that is stored locally on
each salesperson's laptop. The sales department has a higher-than-average rate of lost equipment.
Which of the following recommendations would BEST address the CSO's concern?
Answer: B

NO.691 DRAG DROP
An attack has occurred against a company.
INSTRUCTIONS
You have been tasked to do the following:
Identify the type of attack that is occurring on the network by clicking on the attacker's tablet and
reviewing the output. (Answer Area 1).
Identify which compensating controls should be implemented on the assets, in order to reduce the
effectiveness of future attacks by dragging them to the correct server.
(Answer area 2) All objects will be used, but not all placeholders may be filled. Objects may only be
used once.
If at any time you would like to bring back the initial state of the simulation, please click the Reset All
button.
Answer:

NO.692 A security analyst is reviewing logs on a server and observes the following output:
Which of the following is the security analyst observing?
(A). A rainbow table attack
(B). A password-spraying attack
(C). A dictionary attack
(D). A keylogger attack
Answer: C

NO.693 An IT manager is estimating the mobile device budget for the upcoming year Over the last
five years, the number of devices that were replaced due to loss damage or theft steadily increased
by 10%. Which of the following would BEST describe the estimated number of devices to be replaced
next year?
(A). ALE
(B). ARO
(C). RPO
(D). SLE
Answer: A

NO.694 A security engi is cor that the gy tor on endpoints ts too heavily dependent on previously
defined attacks. The engineer would like a tool to monitor for changes to key Mes and network traffic
on the device. Which of the following tools BEST addresses both detection and prevention?
(A). NIDS
(B). HIPS
(C). AV
(D). NGFW
Answer: A

NO.695 A company installed several crosscut shredders as part of increased information security
practices targeting data leakage risks. Which of the following will this practice reduce?
(A). Dumpster diving
(B). Shoulder surfing
(C). Information elicitation
(D). Credential harvesting
Answer: A

NO.696 Which of the following typically uses a combination of human and artificial intelligence to
analyze event data and take action without intervention?
(A). TTP
(B). OSINT
(C). SOAR
(D). SIEM
Answer: C

NO.697 A security administrator currently spends a large amount of time on common security tasks,
such aa report generation, phishing investigations, and user provisioning and deprovisioning This
prevents the administrator from spending time on other security projects. The business does not
have the budget to add more staff members. Which of the following should the administrator
implement?
(A). DAC
(B). ABAC
(C). SCAP
(D). SOAR
Answer: D

NO.698 Which of the following distributes data among nodes, making it more difficult to manipulate
the data while also minimizing downtime?
(A). MSSP
(B). Public cloud
(C). Hybrid cloud
(D). Fog computing
Answer: C

NO.699 Aconbgany uses a drone for precise perimeter and boundary monitoring. Which of the
following should be MOST conceming to the company?
(A). Privacy
(B). Cloud storage of telemetry data
(C). GPS spoofing
(D). Weather events
Answer: C

NO.700 A website developer is working on a new e-commerce website and has asked an
information security expert for the most appropriate way to store credit card numbers to create an
easy reordering process. Which of the following methods would BEST accomplish this goal?
(A). Salting the magnetic strip information
(B). Encrypting the credit card information in transit.
(C). Hashing the credit card numbers upon entry.
(D). Tokenizing the credit cards in the database
Answer: C

NO.701 Employees are having issues accessing the company's website. Some employees report very
slow performance, while others cannot the website at all. The web and security administrators
search the logs and find millions of half-open connections to port 443 on the web server. Further
analysis reveals thousands of different source IPs initiating this traffic. Which of the following attacks
is MOST likely occurring?
(A). DDoS
(B). Man-in-the-middle
(C). MAC flooding
(D). Domain hijacking
Answer: A

NO.702 A security analyst is concerned about critical vulnerabilities that have been detected on
some applications running inside containers Which of the following is the BEST remediation strategy?
(A). Update the base container image and redeploy the environment
(B). Include the containers in the regular patching schedule for servers
(C). Patch each running container individually and test the application
(D). Update the host in which the containers are running
Answer: C

NO.703 A systoms administrator needs to instal the seme X.509 certificate on multiple servers.
Which of the following should the administrator use?
(A). Key escrow
(B). Asself-signed certificate
(C). Cerificate chaining
(D). An extended validation certificate
Answer: B

NO.704 Remote workers in an organization use company-provided laptops with locally installed
applications and locally stored data Users can store data on a remote server using an encrypted
connection. The organization discovered data stored on a laptop had been made available to the
public Which of the following security solutions would mitigate the risk of future data disclosures?
(A). FDE
(B). TPM
(C). HIDS
(D). VPN
Answer: A

NO.705 To reduce and limit software and infrastructure costs, the Chief Information Officer has
requested to move email services to the cloud. The cloud provider and the organization must have
security controls to protect sensitive dat a. Which of the following cloud services would BEST
accommodate the request?
(A). laas
(B). Paas
(C). Daas
(D). SaaS
Answer: D

NO.706 A user forwarded a suspicious email to the security team, Upon investigation, a malicious
URL was discovered. Which of the following should be done FIRST to prevent other users from
accessing the malicious URL?
(A). Configure the web content filter for the web address.
(B). Report the website to threat intelligence partners
(C). Set me SIEM to alert for any activity to the web address.
(D). Send out a corporate communication to warn all users Of the malicious email.
Answer: A

NO.707 A network administrator is concerned about users being exposed to malicious content when
accessing company cloud applications. The administrator wants to be able to block access to sites
based on the AUP. The users must also be protected because many of them work from home or at
remote locations, providing on-site customer support. Which of the following should the
administrator employ to meet these criteria?
(A). Implement NAC.
(B). Implement an SWG.
(C). Implement a URL filter.
(D). Implement an MDM.
Answer: B

NO.708 Which of the following environment utilizes dummy data and is MOST to be installed locally
on a system that allows to be assessed directly and modified easily wit each build?
(A). Production
(B). Test
(C). Staging
(D). Development
Answer: B

NO.709 An organization wants to participate in threat intelligence information sharing with peer
groups. Which of the following would MOST likely meet the organizations requirement?
(A). Perform OSINT investigations
(B). Subscribe to threat intelligence feeds
(C). Submit RFCs
(D). Implement a TAXII server
Answer: B

NO.710 A network administrator needs to build out a new datacenter, with a focus on resiliency and
uptime. Which of the following would BEST meet this objective? (Choose two.)
Answer: A,B

https://searchdatacenter.techtarget.com/definition/resiliency
NO.711 A security analyst has been reading about a newly discovered cyberattack from a known
threat actor. Which of the following would BEST support the analyst's review of the tactics,
techniques, and protocols the threat actor was observed using in previous campaigns?
(A). Security research publications
(B). The MITRE ATT&CK framework
(C). The Diamond Model of Intrusion Analysis
(D). The Cyber Kill Chain
Answer: B

NO.712 A network engineer notices the VPN concentrator overloaded and crashes on days when
there are a lot of remote workers. Senior management has placed greater importance on the
availability of VPN resources for the remote workers than the security of the end users' traffic. Which
of the following would be BEST to solve this issue?
(A). iPSec
(B). Always On
(C). Split tunneling
(D). L2TP
Answer: B

NO.713 Which of the following authentication methods is considered to be the LEAST secure?
(A). TOTP
(B). SMS
(C). HOTP
(D). Token key
Answer: B

NO.714 A security analyst needs to perform periodic vulnerability scans on production systems.
Which of the following scan Types would produce the BEST vulnerability scan report?
(A). Port
(B). Intrusive
(C). Host discovery
(D). Credentialed
Answer: D

NO.715 Which of the following would MOST likely be identified by a credentialed scan but would be
missed by an uncredentialed scan?
(A). Vulnerabilities with a CVSS score greater than 6.9.
(B). Critical infrastructure vulnerabilities on non-IP protocols.
(C). CVEs related to non-Microsoft systems such as printers and switches.
(D). Missing patches for third-party software on Windows workstations and servers.
Answer: B

NO.716 As part of a company's ongoing SOC maturation process, the company wants to implement
a method to share cyberthreat intelligence data with outside security partners. Which of the
following will the company MOST likely implement?
(A). TAXII
(B). TLP
(C). TTP
(D). STIX
Answer: C

NO.717 A financial analyst has been accused of violating the company's AUP and there is forensic
evidence to substantiate the allegation, Which of the following would dispute the analyst's claim of
innocence?
(A). Legal hold
(B). Order of volatility
(C). Non-repudiation
(D). Chain of custody
Answer: D

NO.718 A security administrator suspects an employee has been emailing proprietary information to
a competitor.
Company policy requires the administrator to capture an exact copy of the employee's hard disk.
Which of the following should the administrator use?
(A). dd
(B). chmod
(C). dnsenum
(D). logger
Answer: A

NO.719 Security analysts notice a server login from a user who has been on vacation for two weeks
The analysts confirm that the user did not log in to the system while on vacation After reviewing
packet capture logs, the analysts notice the following:
Which of the following occurred?
(A). A buffer overflow was exploited to gain unauthorized access
(B). The user's account was compromised, and an attacker changed the login credentials
(C). An attacker used a pass-the-hash attack to gain access
(D). An insider threat with username smithJA logged in to the account
Answer: B

NO.720 Which of the following is a team of people dedicated testing the effectiveness of
organizational security programs by emulating the techniques of potential attackers?
(A). Red team
(B). While team
(C). Blue team
(D). Purple team
Answer: A

Red team-performs the offensive role to try to infiltrate the target.
NO.721 A secutlly analyst needs to perform periodic vulnerabilly scans on produclion ayalems Which
of the following scan types would produce the BEST vulnerability scan report?
(A). Port
(B). Intrusive
(C). Host discovery
(D). Credentialed
Answer: D

NO.722 Developers are writing code and merging it into shared repositories several times a day,
where it is tested automatically. Which of the following concepts does this BEST represent?
(A). Functional testing
(B). Stored procedures
(C). Elasticity
(D). Continuous integration
Answer: C

NO.723 Against the recommendation of the IT security analyst, a company set all user passwords on
a server as "P@)55wOrD". Upon review of the /etc/pesswa file, an attacker found the following:
hich of the following BEST explains why the encrypted passwords do not match?
(A). Perfect forward secrecy
(B). Key stretching
(C). Salting
(D). Hashing
Answer: C

NO.724 When selecting a technical solution for identity management, an architect chooses to go
from an in-house to a third-party SaaS provider. Which of the following risk management strategies is
this an example of?
(A). Acceptance
(B). Mitigation
(C). Avoidance
(D). Transference
Answer: D

Risk Transference refers to the shifting of the burden of loss for a risk to another party through
legislation, contract, insurance or other means. https://www.bcmpedia.org/wiki/Risk_Transference
NO.725 A security analyst wants to fingerpnnt a web server Which of the following tools will the
security analyst MOST likely use to accomplish this task?
(A). nmap -p1-65S35 192.168.0.10
(B). dig 192.168.0.10
(C). cur1 --htad http://192.168.0.10
(D). ping 192.168.0.10
Answer: C

HTTP/1.1 301 Moved Permanently
Server: cloudflare
Date: Thu, 01 Sep 2022 22:36:50 GMT
Content-Type: text/html
Content-Length: 167
Connection: keep-alive
Location: https://1.1.1.1/
CF-RAY: 74417cb04d6b9a50-MFE
NO.726 A tax organization is working on a solution to validate the online submission of documents
The solution should be earned on a portable USB device that should be inserted on any computer
that is transmitting a transaction securely. Which of the following is the BEST certificate for these
requirements?
(A). User certificate
(B). Self-signed certificate
(C). Computer certificate
(D). Root certificate
Answer: D

NO.727 An analyst is trying to identify insecure services thal are running on the intemal network.
After performing a port scan, the analyst identifies that a server has some insecure services enabled
on default ports. Which of the following BEST describes the services that are currently running and
the secure alternatives for replacing them? (Select THREE)
(A). SFTP. FIPS
(B). SNMPv2, SNMPv3
(C). HTTP, HTTPS
D TFTP, FTP
(D). SNMPyt, SNMPy2
(E). Tenet, SSH
(F). TLS, SSL
(G). POP, IMAP
(H). Login, nogin
Answer: A,D,F

NO.728 A network analyst is setting up a wireless access point for a home office in a remote, rural
location. The requirement is that users need to connect to the access point securely but do not want
to have to remember passwords Which of the following should the network analyst enable to meet
the requirement?
(A). MAC address filtering
(B). 802.1X
(C). Captive portal
(D). WPS
Answer: D

NO.729 An attacker replaces a digitally signed document with another version that goes unnoticed
Upon reviewing the document's contents the author notices some additional verbiage that was not
originally in the document but cannot validate an integrity issue. Which of the following attacks was
used?
(A). Cryptomalware
(B). Hash substitution
(C). Collision
(D). Phishing
Answer: B

This type of attack occurs when an attacker replaces a digitally signed document with another version
that has a different hash value. The author would be able to notice the additional verbiage, however,
since the hash value would have changed, they would not be able to validate an integrity issue.
NO.730 A security engineering installing A WAF to protect the company's website from malicious
web requests over SSL. Which of the following is needed to meet the objective?
(A). A reverse proxy
(B). A decryption certificate
(C). A split-tunnel VPN
(D). Load-balanced servers
Answer: B

NO.731 As part of the lessons-learned phase, the SOC is tasked with building methods to detect if a
previous incident is happening again. Which of the following would allow the security analyst to alert
the SOC if an event is reoccurring?
(A). Creating a playbook within the SOAR
(B). Implementing rules in the NGFW
(C). Updating the DLP hash database
(D). Publishing a new CRL with revoked certificates
Answer: A

NO.732 Whiten of the folowing BEST describes the MFA atiribute tha requires6 calback on a
predefined landline?
(A). Something you exchibl
(B). Something you can do
(C). Someone you krcear
(D). Somnewehere pou are
Answer: D

NO.733 A security analyst needs to be able to search and correlate logs from multiple sources in a
single tool Which of the following would BEST allow a security analyst to have this ability?
(A). SOAR
(B). SIEM
(C). Log collectors
(D). Network-attached storage
Answer: B

SIEM event correlation is an essential part of any SIEM solution. It aggregates and analyzes log data
from across your network applications, systems, and devices, making it possible to discover security
threats and malicious patterns of behaviors that otherwise go unnoticed and can lead to compromise
or data loss.
NO.734 An untrusted SSL certificate was discovered during the most recent vulnerability scan. A
security analyst determines the certificate is signed properly and is a valid wildcard. This same
certificate is installed on other company servers without issue. Which of the following is the MOST
likely reason for this finding?
(A). The required intermediate certificate is not loaded as part of the certificate chain.
(B). The certificate is on the CRL and is no longer valid.
(C). The corporate CA has expired on every server, causing the certificate to fail verification.
(D). The scanner is incorrectly configured to not trust this certificate when detected on the server.
Answer: A

NO.735 A company wants to deploy decoy systems alongside production systems in order to entice
threat actors and to learn more about attackers. Which of the following BEST describes these
systems?
(A). DNS sinkholes
(B). Hafieypots
(C). Virtual machines
(D). Neural networks
Answer: B

NO.736 Following a prolonged datacenter outage that affected web-based sales, a company has
decided to move its operations to a private cloud solution. The security team has received the
following requirements:
* There must be visibility into how teams are using cloud-based services.
* The company must be able to identify when data related to payment cards is being sent to the
cloud.
* Data must be available regardless of the end user's geographic location
* Administrators need a single pane-of-glass view into traffic and trends.
Which of the following should the security analyst recommend?
(A). Create firewall rules to restrict traffic to other cloud service providers.
(B). Install a DLP solution to monitor data in transit.
(C). Implement a CASB solution.
(D). Configure a web-based content filter.
Answer: B

NO.737 A host was infected with malware. During the incident response, Joe, a user, reported that
he did not receive any emails with links, but he had been browsing the Internet all day. Which of the
following would MOST likely show where the malware originated?
(A). The DNS logs
(B). The web server logs
(C). The SIP traffic logs
(D). The SNMP logs
Answer: A

NO.738 A Chief Security Officer (CSO) was notified that a customer was able to access confidential
internal company files on a commonly used file-sharing service. The file-sharing service is the same
one used by company staff as one of its approved third-party applications. After further investigation,
the security team determines the sharing of confidential files was accidental and not malicious.
However, the CSO wants to implement changes to minimize this type of incident from reoccurring
but does not want to impact existing business processes. Which of the following would BEST meet
the CSO's objectives?
(A). DLP
(B). SWG
(C). CASB
(D). Virtual network segmentation
Answer: A

E; Container security
NO.739 An incident has occurred in the production environment.
Analyze the command outputs and identify the type of compromise.
If at any time you would like to bring back the initial state of the simulation, please click the Reset All
button.
Answer:

Answer as SQL injection
NO.740 A malicious actor recently penetration a company's network and moved laterally to the
datacenter. Upon investigation, a forensics firm wants to know was in the memory on the
compromised server. Which of the following files should be given to the forensics firm?
(A). Security
(B). Application
(C). Dump
(D). Syslog
Answer: C

Dump files are a special type of files that store information about your computer, the software on it,
and the data loaded in the memory when something bad happens. They are usually automatically
generated by Windows or by the apps that crash, but you can also manually generate them
https://www.digitalcitizen.life/view-contents-dump-file/
NO.741 Which of the following components can be used to consolidate and forward inbound
Internet traffic to multiple cloud environments though a single firewall?
(A). Transit gateway
(B). Cloud hot site
(C). Edge computing
(D). DNS sinkhole
Answer: A

NO.742 A multinational organization that offers web-based services has datacenters that are located
only in the United States; however, a large number of its customers are in Australia, Europe, and Chin
a. Payments for services are managed bya third party in the United Kingdom that specializes in
payment gateways. The management team is concerned the organization is not compliant with
privacy laws that cover some of its customers. Which of the following frameworks should the
management team follow?
(A). Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard
(B). Cloud Security Alliance Best Practices
(C). ISO/IEC 27032 Cybersecurity Guidelines
(D). General Data Protection Regulation
Answer: A

NO.743 An auditor is performing an assessment of a security appliance with an embedded OS that
was vulnerable during the last two assessments. Which of the following BEST explains the appliance's
vulnerable state?
(A). The system was configured with weak default security settings.
(B). The device uses weak encryption ciphers.
(C). The vendor has not supplied a patch for the appliance.
(D). The appliance requires administrative credentials for the assessment
Answer: C

NO.744 A administrator needs to allow mobele BYOD devices to access network resources, As the
devices are not enrolled to the domain and do not have policies applied to them, which of the
following are best practces for authentication and infrastructure security? (Select TWO)
(A). Create a new network for the mobile devices and block the commurycaton to the intemal
network and servers
(B). Use a captive portal for user authentication
(C). Authenticate users using OAuth for more resiliency.
(D). Implement SSO and allow communication to the intemal network.
(E). Use the existing network and allow communscation to the internal network and servers
(F). Use a new and updated RADIUS server to mamntain the best solution
Answer: B,C

NO.745 A global company is experiencing unauthorized logging due to credential theft and account
lockouts caused by brute-force attacks. The company is considering implementing a third-party
identity provider to help mitigate these attacks. Which of the following would be the BEST control for
the company to require from prospective vendors?
(A). IP restrictions
(B). Multifactor authentication
(C). A banned password list
(D). A complex password policy
Answer: B

NO.746 A security forensics analyst is examining a virtual server. The analyst wants to preserve the
present state of the virtual server, including memory contents Which of the following backup types
should be used?
(A). Snapshot
(B). Differential
(C). Cloud
(D). Full
(E). Incremental
Answer: A

NO.747 A security auditor is reviewing vulnerability scan data provided by an internal security team.
Which of the following BEST indicates that valid credentials were used?
(A). The scan results show open ports, protocols, and services exposed on the target host
(B). The scan enumerated software versions of installed programs
(C). The scan produced a list of vulnerabilities on the target host
(D). The scan identified expired SSL certificates
Answer: B

NO.748 An organization relies on third-party video conferencing to conduct daily business. Recent
security changes now require all remote workers to utilize a VPN to corporate resources. Which of
the following would BEST maintain high-quality video conferencing while minimizing latency when
connected to the VPN?
(A). Using geographic diversity to have VPN terminators closer to end users
(B). Utilizing split tunneling so only traffic for corporate resources is encrypted
(C). Purchasing higher-bandwidth connections to meet the increased demand
(D). Configuring QoS properly on the VPN accelerators
Answer: D

NO.749 A company recently experienced a major breach. An investigation concludes that customer
credit card data was stolen and exfiltrated through a dedicated business partner connection to a
vendor, who is not held to the same security contral standards. Which of the following is the MOST
likely source of the breach?
(A). Side channel
(B). Supply chain
(C). Cryptographic downgrade
(D). Malware
Answer: C

NO.750 A security analyst needs to generate a server certificate to be used for 802.1X and secure
RDP connections. The analyst is unsure what is required to perform the task and solicits help from a
senior colleague. Which of the following is the FIRST step the senior colleague will most likely tell the
analyst to perform to accomplish this task?
Answer: B

A certificate signing request (CSR) is one of the first steps towards getting your own SSL/TLS
certificate. Generated on the same server you plan to install the certificate on, the CSR contains
information (e.g. common name, organization, country) the Certificate Authority (CA) will use to
create your certificate. It also contains the public key that will be included in your certificate and is
signed with the corresponding private key. We'll go into more details on the roles of these keys
below.
NO.751 A security incident has been resolved Which of the following BEST describes the importance
of the final phase of the incident response plan?
(A). It examines and documents how well the team responded discovers what caused the incident,
and determines how the incident can be avoided in the future
(B). It returns the affected systems back into production once systems have been fully patched, data
restored and vulnerabilities addressed
(C). It identifies the incident and the scope of the breach how it affects the production environment,
and the ingress point
(D). It contains the affected systems and disconnects them from the network, preventing further
spread of the attack or breach
Answer: A

NO.752 After a hardware incident, an unplanned emergency maintenance activity was conducted to
rectify the issue. Multiple alerts were generated on the SIEM during this period of time. Which of the
following BEST explains what happened?
(A). The unexpected traffic correlated against multiple rules, generating multiple alerts.
(B). Multiple alerts were generated due to an attack occurring at the same time.
(C). An error in the correlation rules triggered multiple alerts.
(D). The SIEM was unable to correlate the rules, triggering the alerts.
Answer: A

NO.753 A systems administrator is looking for a solution that will help prevent OAuth applications
from being leveraged by hackers to tick users into authonzing the use of their corporate credentials.
Which of the following BEST describes this solution?
(A). CASB
(B). UEM
(C). WAF
(D). VPC
Answer: B

NO.754 A company wants to simplify the certificate management process. The company has a single
domain with several dozen subdomains, all of which are publicly accessible on the internet. Which of
the following BEST describes the type of certificate the company should implement?
(A). Subject alternative name
(B). Wildcard
(C). Self-signed
(D). Domain validation
Answer: B

Wildcard SSL certificates are for a single domain and all its subdomains. A subdomain is under the
umbrella of the main domain. Usually subdomains will have an address that begins with something
other than 'www.' For example, www.cloudflare.com has a number of subdomains, including
blog.cloudflare.com, support.cloudflare.com, and developers.cloudflare.com. Each is a subdomain
under the main cloudflare.com domain.
A single Wildcard SSL certificate can apply to all of these subdomains. Any subdomain will be listed in
the SSL certificate. Users can see a list of subdomains covered by a particular certificate by clicking on
the padlock in the URL bar of their browser, then clicking on "Certificate" (in Chrome) to view the
certificate's details.
https://www.cloudflare.com/learning/ssl/types-of-ssl-certificates/
NO.755 A company recently added a DR site and is redesigning the network. Users at the DR site are
having issues browsing websites.
INSTRUCTIONS
Click on each firewall to do the following:
Deny cleartext web traffic.
Ensure secure management protocols are used. Please Resolve issues at the DR site.
The ruleset order cannot be modified due to outside constraints.
If at any time you would like to bring back the initial state of the simulation, please click the Reset All
button.
Answer:

Firewall 1:
DNS Rule - ANY --> ANY --> DNS --> PERMIT
HTTPS Outbound - 10.0.0.1/24 --> ANY --> HTTPS --> PERMIT
Management - ANY --> ANY --> SSH --> PERMIT
HTTPS Inbound - ANY --> ANY --> HTTPS --> PERMIT
HTTP Inbound - ANY --> ANY --> HTTP --> DENY
Firewall 2: No changes should be made to this firewall
Firewall 3:
DNS Rule - ANY --> ANY --> DNS --> PERMIT
HTTPS Outbound - 192.168.0.1/24 --> ANY --> HTTPS --> PERMIT
Management - ANY --> ANY --> SSH --> PERMIT
HTTPS Inbound - ANY --> ANY --> HTTPS --> PERMIT
HTTP Inbound - ANY --> ANY --> HTTP --> DENY
NO.756 user's PC was recently infected by malware. The user has a legacy printer without vendor
support, and the user's OS is fully patched. The user downloaded a driver package from the Internet.
No threats were found on the downloaded file, but during file installation, a malicious runtime threat
was detected. Which of the following is the MOST likely cause of the infection?
(A). The dnver had malware installed and was refactored upon download to avoid detection
(B). The user's computer had a rootkit installed that had avoided detection until the new dnver
overwrote key files.
(C). The user's antivirus software definitions were out of date and were damaged by the installation
of the driver.
(D). The user's computer had been infected with a logic bomb set to run when new dnver was
installed.
Answer: A

NO.757 Which of the following describes the ability of code to target a hypervisor from inside
(A). Fog computing
(B). VM escape
(C). Software-defined networking
(D). Image forgery
(E). Container breakout
Answer: B

Virtual machine escape is an exploit in which the attacker runs code on a VM that allows an operating
system running within it to break out and interact directly with the hypervisor.
https://whatis.techtarget.com/definition/virtual-machineescape#:~:text=Virtual%20machine%20escape%20is%20an,VMs)%20running%20on%20that%20host.
NO.758 During an incident response process involving a laptop, a host was identified as the entry
point for malware. The management team would like to have the laptop restored and given back to
the user. The cybersecurity analyst would like to continue investigating the intrusion on the host.
Which of the following would allow the analyst to continue the investigation and also return the
laptop to the user as soon as possible?
(A). dd
(B). memdump
(C). tcpdump
(D). head
Answer: A

NO.759 A new security engineer has started hardening systems. One of the hardening techniques
the engineer is using involves disabling remote logins to the NAS. Users are now reporting the
inability to use SCP to transfer files to the NAS, even through the data is still viewable from the user's
PCs. Which of the following is the most likely cause of this issue?
(A). TFTP was disabled on the local hosts
(B). SSH was turned off instead of modifying the configuration file
(C). Remote login was disabled in the networkd.config instead of using the sshd.conf
(D). Network services are no longer running on the NAS
Answer: C

NO.760 A business is looking for a cloud service provider that offers a la carte services, including
cloud backups, VM elasticity, and secure networking. Which of the following cloud service provider
types should business engage?
(A). A laaS
(B). PaaS
(C). XaaS
(D). SaaS
Answer: B

NO.761 A public relations team will be taking a group of guest on a tour through the facility of a
large e-commerce company. The day before the tour, the company sends out an email to employees
to ensure all whiteboars are cleaned and all desks are cleared. The company is MOST likely trying to
protect against.
(A). Loss of proprietary information
(B). Damage to the company's reputation
(C). Social engineering
(D). Credential exposure
Answer: C

NO.762 Business partners are working on a secunty mechanism lo validate transactions securely.
The requirement is for one company to be responsible for deploying a trusted solution that will
register and issue artifacts used to sign encrypt, and decrypt transaction files. Which of the following
is the BEST solution to adopt?
(A). PKI
(B). Blockchain
(C). SAML
(D). OAuth
Answer: A

NO.763 A large bank with two geographically dispersed data centers is concerned about major
power disruptions at both locations Every day each location expenences very bnef outages that last
for a few seconds However dunng the summer a high risk of intentional brownouts that last up to an
hour exists particularly at one of the locations near an jndustnal smelter. Which of the following is
the BEST solution to reduce the risk of data loss?
(A). Dual supply
(B). Generator
(C). PDU
(D). Daily backups
Answer: B

NO.764 An organization is concerned that is hosted web servers are not running the most updated
version of the software. Which of the following would work BEST to help identify potential
vulnerabilities?
(A). Hping3 -s comptia, org -p 80
(B). Nc -1 -v comptia, org -p 80
(C). nmp comptia, org -p 80 -aV
(D). nslookup -port=80 comtia.org
Answer: C

Nmap is used to discover hosts and services on a computer network by sending packets and analyzing
the responses. Nmap provides a number of features for probing computer networks, including host
discovery and service and operating system detection.
NO.765 A security engineer was assigned to implement a solution to prevent attackers from gaining
access by pretending to be authorized users. Which of the following technologies meets the
requirement?
(A). SSO
(B). IDS
(C). MFA
(D). TPM
Answer: C

NO.766 Which of the following statements BEST describes zero-day exploits'?
(A). When a zero-day exploit is discovered, the system cannot be protected by any means
(B). Zero-day exploits have their own scoring category in CVSS
(C). A zero-day exploit is initially undetectable and no patch for it exists
(D). Discovering zero-day exploits is always performed via bug bounty programs
Answer: C

NO.767 Which of the following is used to ensure that evidence is admissible in legal proceedings
when it is collected and provided to the authorities?
(A). Chain of custody
(B). Legal hold
(C). Event log
(D). Artifacts
Answer: A

NO.768 The cost of removable media and the security risks of transporting data have become too
great for a laboratory. The laboratory has decided to interconnect with partner laboratories to make
data transfers easier and more secure.
The Chief Security Officer (CSO) has several concerns about proprietary data being exposed once the
interconnections are established. Which of the following security features should the network
administrator implement to prevent unwanted data exposure to users in partner laboratories?
(A). VLAN zoning with a file-transfer server in an external-facing zone
(B). DLP running on hosts to prevent file transfers between networks
(C). NAC that permits only data-transfer agents to move data between networks
(D). VPN with full tunneling and NAS authenticating through the Active Directory
Answer: B

NO.769 A Chief Executive Officer's (CEO) personal information was stolen in a social engineering
attack. Which of the following sources would reveal if the CEO's personal information is for sale?
(A). Automated information sharing
(B). Open-source intelligence
(C). The dark web
(D). Vulnerability databases
Answer: C

NO.770 A bad actor tries to persuade someone to provide financial information over the phone in
order to gain access to funds. Which of the following types of attacks does this scenario describe?
Answer: A

NO.771 An organization just implemented a new security system. Local laws state that citizens must
be notified prior to encountering the detection mechanism to deter malicious activities. Which of the
following is being implemented?
(A). Proximity cards with guards
(B). Fence with electricity
(C). Drones with alarms
(D). Motion sensors with signage
Answer: D

NO.772 A security analyst reports a company policy violation in a case in which a large amount of
sensitive data is being downloaded after hours from various mobile devices to an external site. Upon
further investiga-tion, the analyst notices that successful login attempts are being conducted with
impossible travel times during the same time periods when the unauthorized downloads are
occurring. The analyst also discov-ers a couple of WAPs are using the same SSID, but they have nonstandard DHCP configurations and an overlapping channel. Which of the following attacks is being
conducted?
(A). Evil twin
(B). Jamming
(C). DNS poisoning
(D). Bluesnarfing
(E). DDoS
Answer: A

NO.773 In which of the following situations would it be BEST to use a detective control type for
mitigation?
(A). A company implemented a network load balancer to ensure 99.999% availability of its web
application.
(B). A company designed a backup solution to increase the chances of restoring services in case of a
natural disaster.
(C). A company purchased an application-level firewall to isolate traffic between the accounting
department and the information technology department.
(D). A company purchased an IPS system, but after reviewing the requirements, the appliance was
supposed to monitor, not block, any traffic.
(E). A company purchased liability insurance for flood protection on all capital assets.
Answer: D

NO.774 Atocompany wants to modify its current backup strategy to modity its current backup
strategy to minenize the number of backups that would need to be restored in case of data loss.
Which of the following would be the BEST backup strategy
(A). Incremental backups followed by differential backups
(B). Full backups followed by incremental backups
(C). Delta backups followed by differental backups
(D). Incremental backups followed by delta backups
(E). Full backup followed by different backups
Answer: A

NO.775 A user enters a password to log in to a workstation and is then prompted to enter an
authentication code.
Which of the following MFA factors or attributes are being utilized in the authentication process?
(Select TWO).
(A). Something you know
(B). Something you have
(C). Somewhere you are
(D). Someone you are
(E). Something you are
(F). Something you can do
Answer: B,E

NO.776 A routine audit of medical billing claims revealed that several claims were submitted
without the subscriber's knowledge. A review of the audit logs for the medical billing company's
system indicated a company employee downloaded customer records and adjusted the direct
deposit information to a personal bank account. Which of the following does this action describe?
(A). Insider threat
(B). Social engineering
(C). Third-party risk
(D). Data breach
Answer: A

NO.777 A Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) is concerned about the organization's ability to
continue business operation in the event of a prolonged DDoS attack on its local datacenter that
consumes database resources.
Which of the following will the CISO MOST likely recommend to mitigate this risk?
(A). Upgrade the bandwidth available into the datacenter
(B). Implement a hot-site failover location
(C). Switch to a complete SaaS offering to customers
(D). Implement a challenge response test on all end-user queries
Answer: B

NO.778 Which of the following control types is focused primarily on reducing risk before an incident
occurs?
(A). Preventive
(B). Deterrent
(C). Corrective
(D). Detective
Answer: D

NO.779 A user downloaded an extension for a browser, and the user's device later became infected.
The analyst who is investigating the incident saw various logs where the attacker was hiding activity
by deleting dat a. The following was observed running:
Which of the following is the malware using to execute the attack?
(A). PowerShell
(B). Python
(C). Bash
(D). Macros
Answer: A

NO.780 An organization has a growing workforce that is mostly driven by additions to the sales
department. Each newly hired salesperson relies on a mobile device to conduct business. The Chief
Information Officer (CIO) is wondering it the organization may need to scale down just as quickly as it
scaled up. The ClO is also concerned about the organization's security and customer privacy. Which of
the following would be BEST to address the ClO's concerns?
(A). Disallow new hires from using mobile devices for six months
(B). Select four devices for the sales department to use in a CYOD model
(C). Implement BYOD for the sates department while leveraging the MDM
(D). Deploy mobile devices using the COPE methodology
Answer: C

NO.781 A security analyst generated a file named host1.pcap and shared it with a team member
who is going to use it for further incident analysis. Which of the following tools will the other team
member MOST likely use to open this file?
(A). Autopsy
(B). Memdump
(C). FTK imager
(D). Wireshark
Answer: D

Some common applications that can open .pcap files are Wireshark, WinDump, tcpdump, Packet
Square - Capedit and Ethereal.
NO.782 During a Chiet Information Securty Officer (CISO) comvenbon to discuss security awareness,
the affendees are provided with a network connection to use as a resource. As the Convention
progresses. ane of the attendees starts to notice delays in the connection. and the HTTPS ste
requests are reverting to HTTP. Which of the folowing BEST describes what is happening?
(A). Birtuday colfisices on the cartificate key
(B). DNS hijackeng to reroute tratic
(C). Brute force 1 tho access point
(D). A SSL/TLS downgrade
Answer: D

NO.783 An organization implemented a process that compares the settings currently configured on
systems against secure configuration guidelines in order to identify any gaps Which of the following
control types has the organization implemented?
(A). Compensating
(B). Corrective
(C). Preventive
(D). Detective
Answer: C

the control acts to eliminate or reduce the likelihood that an attack can succeed. A preventative
control operates before an attack can take place. Compensating means to substitute one control with
another (not happened here), Corrective means the attack has already happened (no mentioning),
and detective is incorrect because the detective control detects ATTACKS, not vulnerabilities.
NO.784 An organization has activated an incident response plan due to a malware outbreak on its
network The organization has brought in a forensics team that has identified an internet-facing
Windows server as the likely point of initial compromise The malware family that was detected is
known to be distributed by manually logging on to servers and running the malicious code Which of
the following actions would be BEST to prevent reinfection from the initial infection vector?
(A). Prevent connections over TFTP from the internal network
(B). Create a firewall rule that blocks port 22 from the internet to the server
(C). Disable file shanng over port 445 to the server
(D). Block port 3389 inbound from untrusted networks
Answer: A

NO.785 The Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) of a bank recently updated the incident
response policy. The CISO is concerned that members of the incident response team do not
understand their roles. The bank wants to test the policy but with the least amount of resources or
impact. Which of the following BEST meets the requirements?
(A). Warm site failover
(B). Tabletop walk-through
(C). Parallel path testing
(D). Full outage simulation
Answer: B

NO.786 An organization is planning lo open other data centers to sustain operations in the event of
a natural disaster. Which of the following considerations would BEST support the organization's
resiliency?
(A). Geographic dispersal
(B). Generator power
(C). Fire suppression
(D). Facility automation
Answer: A

NO.787 A company was recently breached. Part of the company's new cybersecurity strategy is to
centralize the logs from all security devices. Which of the following components forwards the logs to
a central source?
(A). Log enrichment
(B). Log aggregation
(C). Log parser
(D). Log collector
Answer: D

NO.788 Which of the following job roles would sponsor data quality and data entry initiatives that
ensure business and regulatory requirements are met?
(A). The data owner
(B). The data processor
(C). The data steward
(D). The data privacy officer.
Answer: C

NO.789 A security audit has revealed that a process control terminal is vulnerable to malicious users
installing and executing software on the system. The terminal is beyond end-of-life support and
cannot be upgraded, so it is placed on a projected network segment. Which of the following would be
MOST effective to implement to further mitigate the reported vulnerability?
(A). DNS sinkholding
(B). DLP rules on the terminal
(C). An IP blacklist
(D). Application whitelisting
Answer: D

NO.790 Ann a forensic analyst. needs to prove that the data she originally acquired has remained
unchanged while in her custody. Which of the following should Ann use?
Answer: A

NO.791 A major palitical party experienced a server breach. The hacker then publicly posted stolen
intemal cammunications compeming campaign strategies to give the oppasitian party an advantage.
Which of the following BEST describes these threat actors?
(A). Semi-aulhorized hackers
(B). State actors
(C). Script kiddies
(D). Advanced persistent threats
Answer: B

NO.792 A company suspects that some corporate accounts were compromised. The number of
suspicious logins from locations not recognized by the users is increasing Employees who travel need
their accounts protected without the nsk of blocking legitimate login requests that may be made over
new sign-in properties. Which of the following security controls can be implemented?
(A). Enforce MFA when an account request reaches a nsk threshold
(B). Implement geofencing to only allow access from headquarters
(C). Enforce time-based login requests that align with business hours
(D). Shift the access control scheme to a discretionary access control
Answer: B

NO.793 A recent security assessment revealed that an actor explolied a vuinerable workstation
willvin an organization and has persisted on the network for several months. The organization
realizes the need to reassess Its seourlty strategy for mitigating risks within the perimeter Which of
the following solutions woukl BEST support the organization's strategy?
(A). FIM
(B). OOP
(C). EOR
(D). DUT
Answer: A

The best solution to support the organization's security strategy in this situation is File Integrity
Monitoring (FIM). FIM is a technique used to detect and monitor unauthorized changes to critical
files and system configurations on a computer or network. It is used to detect malicious activity such
as malware, unauthorized modifications, and malicious user activity. FIM can also be used to detect
and monitor compliance with security policies and procedures.
NO.794 A security analyst Is hardening a Linux workstation and must ensure It has public keys
forwarded to remote systems for secure login Which of the following steps should the analyst
perform to meet these requirements?
(Select TWO).
(A). Forward the keys using ssh-copy-id.
(B). Forward the keys using scp.
(C). Forward the keys using ash -i.
(D). Forward the keys using openssl -s.
(E). Forward the keys using ssh-keyger.
Answer: A,D

NO.795 A desktop support technician recently installed a new document-scanning software program
on a computer. However, when the end user tried to launch the program, it did not respond. Which
of the following is MOST likely the cause?
(A). A new firewal rule is needed to access the application.
(B). The system was quarantined for missing software updates.
(C). The software was not added to the application whitelist.
(D). The system was isolated from the network due to infected software
Answer: C

NO.796 Which of the following is a benefit of including a risk management framework into an
organization's security approach?
(A). It defines expected service levels from participating supply chain partners to ensure system
outages are remediated in a timely manner
(B). It identifies specific vendor products that have been tested and approved for use in a secure
environment.
(C). It provides legal assurances and remedies in the event a data breach occurs
(D). It incorporates control, development, policy, and management activities into IT operations.
Answer: D

NO.797 Which of the following is an example of risk avoidance?
(A). Installing security updates directly in production to expedite vulnerability fixes
(B). Buying insurance to prepare for financial loss associated with exploits
(C). Not installing new software to prevent compatibility errors
(D). Not taking preventive measures to stop the theft of equipment
Answer: C

NO.798 Ahelp desk technician receives an email from the Chief Information Officer (C/O) asking for
documents. The technician knows the CIO is on vacation for a few weeks. Which of the following
should the technician do to validate the authenticity of the email?
(A). Check the metadata in the email header of the received path in reverse order to follaw the
email's path.
(B). Hover the mouse over the CIO's email address to verify the email address.
(C). Look at the metadata in the email header and verify the "From." line matches the CIO's email
address.
(D). Forward the email to the CIO and ask if the CIO sent the email requesting the documents.
Answer: B

NO.799 Several universities are participating m a collaborative research project and need to share
compute and storage resources Which of the following cloud deployment strategies would BEST
meet this need?
(A). Community
(B). Private
(C). Public
(D). Hybrid
Answer: A

Community cloud storage is a variation of the private cloud storage model, which offers cloud
solutions for specific businesses or communities. In this model, cloud storage providers offer their
cloud architecture, software and other development tools to meet the requirements of the
community. A community cloud in computing is a collaborative effort in which infrastructure is
shared between several organizations from a specific community with common concerns (security,
compliance, jurisdiction, etc.), whether managed internally or by a third-party and hosted internally
or externally.
NO.800 An organization hired a consultant to assist with an active attack, and the consultant was
able to identify the compromised accounts and computers. Which of the following is the consultant
MOST likely to recommend to prepare for eradication?
Answer: B

NO.801 Which of the following BEST describes a security exploit for which a vendor patch is not
readily available?
(A). Integer overflow
(B). Zero-day
(C). End of life
(D). Race condition
Answer: B

NO.802 Which of the following cloud models provides clients with servers, storage, and networks
but nothing else?
(A). SaaS
(B). PaaS
(C). IaaS
(D). DaaS
Answer: C

NO.803 The process of passively gathering information poor to launching a cyberattack is called:
(A). tailgating
(B). reconnaissance
(C). pharming
(D). prepending
Answer: B

NO.804 An analyst is trying to identify insecure services that are running on the internal network.
After performing a port scan, the analyst identifies that a server has sont insecure services enabled
on default ports. Which of the following BEST describes the services that are currently running and
the secure alternatives for replacing them? (Select THREE).
(A). SFTP, FTPS
(B). SNMPv2, SNMPv3
(C). HTTP, HTTPS
(D). TEIP, FIP
(E). SNMPv1, SNMPv2
(F). Telnet, SSH
(G). TLS, SSL
(H). POP, IMAP
(I). Login, rlogin
Answer: A,E,G

NO.805 A root cause analysis reveals that a web application outage was caused by one of the
company's developers uploading a newer version of the third-party libraries that were shared among
several applications. Which of the following implementations would be BEST to prevent the issue
from reoccurring?
(A). CASB
(B). SWG
(C). Containerization
(D). Automated failover
Answer: C

Containerization is defined as a form of operating system virtualization, through which applications
are run in isolated user spaces called containers, all using the same shared operating system (OS).
NO.806 The compliance team requires an annual recertification of privileged and non-privileged
user access. However, multiple users who left the company six months ago still have access. Which of
the following would have prevented this compliance violation?
(A). Account audits
(B). AUP
(C). Password reuse
(D). SSO
Answer: A

Account audits are periodic reviews of user accounts to ensure that they are being used
appropriately and that access is being granted and revoked in accordance with the organization's
policies and procedures. If the compliance team had been conducting regular account audits, they
would have identified the users who left the company six months ago and ensured that their access
was revoked in a timely manner. This would have prevented the compliance violation caused by
these users still having access to the company's systems.
To prevent this compliance violation, the company should implement account audits. An account
audit is a regular review of all user accounts to ensure that they are being used properly and that
they are in compliance with the company's security policies. By conducting regular account audits,
the company can identify inactive or unused accounts and remove access for those users. This will
help to prevent compliance violations and ensure that only authorized users have access to the
company's systems and data.
NO.807 Which of the following prevents an employee from seeing a colleague who is visiting an
inappropriate website?
(A). Job rotation policy
(B). NDA
(C). AUP
(D). Separation Of duties policy
Answer: A

NO.808 An organization would like to remediate the risk associated with its cloud service provider
not meeting its advertised 99.999% availability metrics. Which of the following should the
organization consult for the exact requirements for the cloud provider?
(A). SLA
(B). BPA
(C). NDA
(D). MOU
Answer: A

NO.809 A network administrator at a large organization is reviewing methods to improve the
security of the wired LAN. Any security improvement must be centrally managed and allow
corporateowned devices to have access to the intranet but limit others to internet access only, Which
of the following should the administrator recommend?
(A). 802.1X utilizing the current PKI infrastructure
(B). SSO to authenticate corporate users
(C). MAC address filtering with ACLS on the router
(D). PAM for user account management
Answer: A

NO.810 A financial nstitution wauid like to stare its customer data in a coud but still allaw the data
ta he accessed and manipulated while encrypted. Doing so would prevent the claud servine provider
from heing adle ta decipher the data due ta its sensitivity. The financial institutan is not concernec
about computational averheads and slow speeds, Which of the follawing cryotographic techniques
would BEST meet the requirement?
Answer: A

NO.811 Several employees return to work the day after attending an industry trade show. That
same day, the security manager notices several malware alerts coming from each of the employee's
workstations. The security manager investigates but finds no signs of an attack on the perimeter
firewall or the NIDS. Which of the following is MOST likely causing the malware alerts?
(A). A worm that has propagated itself across the intranet, which was initiated by presentation media
(B). A fileless virus that is contained on a vCard that is attempting to execute an attack
(C). A Trojan that has passed through and executed malicious code on the hosts
(D). A USB flash drive that is trying to run malicious code but is being blocked by the host firewall
Answer: A

NO.812 A company completed a vulnerability scan. The scan found malware on several systems that
were running older versions of Windows. Which of the following is MOST likely the cause of the
malware infection?
(A). Open permissions
(B). Improper or weak patch management
(C). Unsecure root accounts
(D). Default settings
Answer: B

The reason for this is that older versions of Windows may have known vulnerabilities that have been
patched in more recent versions. If a company is not regularly patching their systems, they are
leaving those vulnerabilities open to exploit, which can allow malware to infect the systems.
It is important to regularly update and patch systems to address known vulnerabilities and protect
against potential malware infections. This is an important aspect of proper security management.
Here is a reference to the CompTIA Security+ certification guide which states that "Properly
configuring and maintaining software, including patch management, is critical to protecting systems
and data."
NO.813 While investigating a recent security incident, a security analyst decides to view all network
connections on a particular server, Which of the following would provide the desired information?
(A). arp
(B). nslookup
(C). netstat
(D). nmap
Answer: C

NO.814 A cybersecurity administrator has a reduced team and needs to operate an on-premises
network and security infrastructure efficiently. To help with the situation, the administrator decides
to hire a service provider. Which of the following should the administrator use?
(A). SDP
(B). AAA
(C). IaaS
(D). MSSP
(E). Microservices
Answer: D

https://www.techtarget.com/searchitchannel/definition/MSSP
NO.815 Which of the following BEST describes data streams that are compiled through artificial
intelligence that provides insight on current cyberintrusions, phishing, and other malicious
cyberactivity?
(A). Intelligence fusion
(B). Review reports
(C). Log reviews
(D). Threat feeds
Answer: A

NO.816 he SIEM at an organization has detected suspicious traffic coming from a workstation in its
internal network. An analyst in the SOC investigates the workstation and discovers malware that is
associated with a botnet is installed on the device. A review of the logs on the workstation reveals
that the privileges of the local account were escalated to a local administrator. To which of the
following groups should the analyst report this real-world event?
(A). The NOC team
(B). The vulnerability management team
(C). The CIRT
Answer: C

D, The red team
NO.817 An engineer is setting up a VDI environment for a factory tocation, and the business wants
to deploy a low-cost solution to enadle users on the shop floor to log in to the VDI environment
directly. Which of the following should the engineer select to meet these requirements?
(A). Laptops
(B). Containers
(C). Thin clients
(D). Workstations
Answer: C

NO.818 Which of the following is assured when a user signs an email using a private key?
(A). Non-repudiation
(B). Confidentiality
(C). Availably
(D). Authentication
Answer: A

Non Repudiation is your virtual John Hancock. It's a way of virtually stamping any data or document
with "I am who I say I am". Only way to break this would be if the private key owners' private key
became compromised. Which at that point you got bigger problems than Non Repudiation.
NO.819 Whictpof the following will MOST likely cause machine-learning and Al-enabled systems to
operate with unintended consequences?
(A). Stored procedures
(B). Buffer overflows
(C). Data bias
(D). Code reuse
Answer: A

NO.820 A security architect is working on an email solution that will send sensitive dat a. However,
funds are not currently available in the budget for building additional infrastructure. Which of the
following should the architect choose?
Answer: D

PGP (Pretty Good Privacy) is a commonly used encryption method for email communications to
secure the sensitive data being sent. It allows for the encryption of the entire message or just the
sensitive parts. It would be an appropriate solution in this case as it doesn't require additional
infrastructure to implement.
NO.821 An organization has implemented a two-step verification process to protect user access to
data that s stored in the coud Ic scssnncsitcibin a vdiemiietanebins code to access the dat a. Which of
the following authentication methods did the organization implement?
(A). Token key
(B). B Static code
(C). Push notification
Answer: A

'D. HOTP
NO.822 A company is auditing the manner in which its European customers' personal information is
handled Which of the following should the company consult?
(A). GDPR
(B). ISO
(C). NIST
(D). PCI DSS
Answer: A

NO.823 An ofgantzation has decided to purchase an insurance policy because a risk assessment
determined that the cost to remediate the risk is greater than the five-year cost of the insurance
policy. The organization is enabling risk
(A). avoidance
(B). acceptance
(C). mitigation
(D). transference
Answer: D

NO.824 hich of the following ofien operaics in a clent-server architecture to act aa a sendoe
repombory, providing entenprise consumers access to structured threal Intelligence data?
(A). STIX
(B). CIRT
(C). OSINT
(D). TARII
Answer: B

NO.825 A company is adopting a BYOD policy and is looking for a comprehensive solution to protect
company.
information on user devices. Which of the following solutions would BEST support the policy?
(A). Mobile device management
(B). Full-device encryption
(C). Remote wipe
(D). Biometrics
Answer: A

NO.826 Which of the following policies establishes rules to measure third-party work tasks and
ensure deliverables are provided within a specific time line?
(A). SLA
(B). MOU
(C). AUP
(D). NDA
Answer: A

NO.827 The Chief Information Security Officer directed a risk reduction in shadow IT and created a
policy requiring all unsanctioned high-risk SaaS applications to be blocked from user access Which of
the following is the BEST security solution to reduce this risk?
(A). CASB
(B). VPN concentrator
(C). MFA
(D). VPC endpoint
Answer: A

NO.828 Which of the following is the MOST likely reason for securing an air-gapped laboratory HVAC
system?
(A). To avoid data leakage
(B). To protect surveillance logs
(C). To ensure availability
(D). To facilitate third-party access
Answer: C

NO.829 Which of the following would be the BEST way to analyze diskless malware that has infected
a VDI?
(A). Shut down the VDI and copy off the event logs.
(B). Take a memory snapshot of the running system.
(C). Use NetFlow to identify command-and-control IPs.
(D). Run a full on-demand scan of the root volume.
Answer: B

NO.830 Which of the following technical controls is BEST suited for the detection and prevention of
buffer overflows on hosts?
Answer: C

NO.831 Which of the following documents provides expectations at a technical level for quality,
availability, and responsibilities?
(A). EOL
(B). SLA
(C). MOU
(D). EOSL
Answer: B

NO.832 A user reports falling for a phishing email to an analyst. Which of the following system logs
would the analyst check FIRST?
(A). DNS
(B). Message gateway
(C). Network
(D). Authentication
Answer: B

NO.833 Field workers in an organization are issued mobile phones on a daily basis All the work is
performed within one city and the mobile phones are not used for any purpose other than work The
organization does not want these pnones used for personal purposes. The organization would like to
issue the phones to workers as permanent devices so the pnones do not need to be reissued every
day Qven the conditions described, which of the following technologies would BEST meet these
requirements'
(A). Geofencing
(B). Mobile device management
(C). Containenzation
(D). Remote wiping
Answer: B

NO.834 A financial organization has adopted a new secure, encrypted document-sharing application
to help with its customer loan process. Some important PII needs to be shared across this new
platform, but it is getting blocked by the DLP systems. Which of the following actions will BEST allow
the PII to be shared with the secure application without compromising the organization's security
posture?
(A). Configure the DLP policies to allow all PII
(B). Configure the firewall to allow all ports that are used by this application
(C). Configure the antivirus software to allow the application
(D). Configure the DLP policies to whitelist this application with the specific PII
(E). Configure the application to encrypt the PII
Answer: D

NO.835 While troubleshooting a service disruption on a mission-critical server, a technician
discovered the user account that was configured to run automated processes was disabled because
the user's password failed to meet password complexity requirements. Which of the following would
be the BEST solution to securely prevent future issues?
(A). Using an administrator account to run the processes and disabling the account when it is not in
use
(B). Implementing a shared account the team can use to run automated processes
(C). Configuring a service account to run the processes
(D). Removing the password complexity requirements for the user account
Answer: C

A service account is a user account that is created specifically to run automated processes and
services. These accounts are typically not associated with an individual user, and are used for running
background services and scheduled tasks. By configuring a service account to run the automated
processes, you can ensure that the account will not be disabled due to password complexity
requirements and other user-related issues.
NO.836 A security administrator needs to create a RAID configuration that is focused on high read
speeds and fault tolerance. It is unlikely that multiple drivers will fail simultaneously. Which of the
following RAID configurations should the administration use?
(A). RA1D 0
(B). RAID1
(C). RAID 5
(D). RAID 10
Answer: A

https://techgenix.com/raid-10-vs-raid-5/
NO.837 A security engineer is deploying a new wireless for a company. The company shares office
space with multiple tenants. Which of the following should the engineer configured on the wireless
network to ensure that confidential data is not exposed to unauthorized users?
(A). EAP
(B). TLS
(C). HTTPS
(D). AES
Answer: C

NO.838 A mae Clotting company recently lost 4 aege amount of propeetary wvformaton The
security olficer must fied a solution t ensure frs never happens agan tht 8 the BEST tachrycal
implementation tp prevent thes fom happening agai?
(A). Configure OLP soktons
(B). Disable peer-to-peer sharing
(C). Enable role-based access controls.
(D). Mandate job rotabon
(E). Implement content ters
Answer: B

NO.839 Which of the following should be put in place when negotiating with a new vendor about
the timeliness of the response to a significant outage or incident?
(A). MOU
(B). MTTR
(C). SLA
(D). NDA
Answer: C

NO.840 A news article states that a popular web browser deployed on all corporate PCs is
vulnerable to a zero-day attack. Which of the following MOST concerns the Chief Information
Security Officer about the information in the news article?
Answer: D

NO.841 A company is designing the layout of a new datacenter so it will have an optimal
environmental temperature Which of the following must be included? (Select TWO)
(A). An air gap
(B). A cold aisle
(C). Removable doors
(D). A hot aisle
(E). An loT thermostat
(F). A humidity monitor
Answer: E,F

NO.842 A cybersecurity administrator is using iptables as an enterprise firewall. The administrator
created some rules, but the network now seems to be unresponsive All connections are being
dropped by the firewall. Which of the following would be the BEST option to remove the rules?
(A). # iptables -t mangle -X
(B). # iptables -F
(C). # iptables -Z
(D). # iptables -P INPUT -j DROP
Answer: D

NO.843 A security analyst needs an overview of vulnerabilities for a host on the network. Which of
the following is the BEST type of scan for the analyst to run to discover which vulnerable services are
running?
(A). Non-credentialed
(B). Web application
(C). Privileged
(D). Internal
Answer: B

NO.844 A security analyst is designing the appropnate controls to limit unauthorized access to a
physical site The analyst has a directive to utilize the lowest possible budget Which of the following
would BEST meet the requirements?
(A). Preventive controls
(B). Compensating controls
(C). Deterrent controls
(D). Detective controls
Answer: C

Deterrent makes sense on further thought. The question just states unauthorized access. It doesn't
state the intent of any unauthorized intruders. Deterrence is designed to reduce the occurrence of
unintentional bystanders or unmotivated malicious agents from entering the site. Should the agent
be motivated enough, a preventative measure is needed. But again, the question doesn't list
intentions. Therefore this method works to limit the number of unauthorized visitors by weeding out
everyone but the motivated, and the truly stupid.
NO.845 Which of the following should be monitored by threat intelligence researchers who search
for leaked credentials?
(A). Common Weakness Enumeration
(B). OSINT
(C). Dark web
(D). Vulnerability databases
Answer: C

NO.846 The database administration team is requesting guidance for a secure solution that will
ensure confidentiality of cardholder data at rest only in certain fields in the database schem a. The
requirement is to substitute a sensitive data field with a non-sensitive field that is rendered useless if
a data breach occurs Which of the following is the BEST solution to meet the requirement?
(A). Tokenization
(B). Masking
(C). Full disk encryption
(D). Mirroring
Answer: B

NO.847 A penetration tester successfully gained access ta a company's network, The investigating
analyst detarmines malicious traffic connacted through the WAP despite filtering rules being in place,
Logging in to the connected switch, the analyst sees the folowing in the ARP table:
Which of the following cid the penetration tester MOST liely use?
(A). ARP poisoning
(B). MAG eioning
(C). Man in the middle
(D). Evil twin
Answer: B

NO.848 A security analyst has been asked by the Chief Information Security Officer to
* develop a secure method of providing centralized management of infrastructure
* reduce the need to constantly replace aging end user machines
* provide a consistent user desktop expenence
Which of the following BEST meets these requirements?
(A). BYOD
(B). Mobile device management
(C). VDI
(D). Containers ation
Answer: C

NO.849 A RAT that was used to compromise an organization's banking credentials was found on a
user's computer.
The RAT evaded antivirus detection. It was installed by a user who has local administrator rights to
the system as part of a remote management tool set. Which of the following recommendations
would BEST prevent this from reoccurring?
(A). Create a new acceptable use policy.
(B). Segment the network into trusted and untrusted zones.
(C). Enforce application whitelisting.
(D). Implement DLP at the network boundary
Answer: C

NO.850 Which of the following types of controls is a CCTV camera that is not being monitored?
(A). Detective
(B). Deterrent
(C). Physical
(D). Preventive
Answer: B

NO.851 wo organizations are discussing a possible merger, Both organizations' Chief Financial
Officers would like to safely share payroll data with each other to determine if the pay scales for
different roles are similar at both organizations. Which of the following techniques would be BEST to
protect employee data while allowing the companies to successfully share this information?
(A). Pseudo-anonymization
(B). Tokenization
(C). Data masking
(D). Encryption
Answer: C

NO.852 A large industrial system's smart generator monitors the system status and sends alerts to
third-party maintenance personnel when critical failures occur. While reviewing the network logs the
company's security manager notices the generator's IP is sending packets to an internal file server's
IP. Which of the following mitigations would be BEST for the security manager to implement while
maintaining alerting capabilities?
(A). Segmentation
(B). Firewall whitelisting
(C). Containment
(D). isolation
Answer: A

NO.853 An amusement park is implementing a btomelnc system that validates customers'
fingerpnnts to ensure they are not sharing tickets The park's owner values customers above all and
would prefer customers' convenience over security For this reason which of the following features
should the security team prioritize FIRST?
(A). Low FAR
(B). Low efficacy
(C). Low FRR
(D). Low CER
Answer: C

FAR (False Acceptance Rate)
FRR (False Rejection Rate)
CER (Crossover Error Rate) AKA ERR (Equal Error Rate)
since he is willing to sacrifice Security for Customer Service, Best way to understand this is.
FAR has to go up in order for FRR to go down.
typical business practice is in the middle of both which would be near the CER.
NO.854 A company recently set up an e-commerce portal to sell its product online. The company
wants to start accepting credit cards for payment, which requires compliance with a security
standard. Which of the following standards must the company comply with before accepting credit
cards on its e-commerce platform?
(A). PCI DSS
(B). ISO 22301
(C). ISO 27001
(D). NIST CSF
Answer: A

Additionally, many organizations should abide by certain standards. For example, organizations
handling credit card information need to comply with the Payment Card Industry Data Security
Standard (PCI DSS). PCI DSS includes six control objectives and 12 specific requirementsthat help
prevent fraud
NO.855 A security analyst reviews the datacenter access logs for a fingerprint scanner and notices
an abundance of errors that correlate with users' reports of issues accessing the facility. Which of the
following MOST likely the cause of the cause of the access issues?
(A). False rejection
(B). Cross-over error rate
(C). Efficacy rale
(D). Attestation
Answer: A

where a legitimate user is not recognized. This is also referred to as a Type I error or false non-match
rate (FNMR). FRR is measured as a percentage.
NO.856 A security engineer is reviewing the logs from a SAML application that is configured to use
MFA, during this review the engineer notices a high volume of successful logins that did not require
MFA from users who were traveling internationally. The application, which can be accessed without a
VPB, has a policy that allows time-based tokens to be generated. Users who changed locations should
be required to reauthenticate but have been Which of the following statements BEST explains the
issue?
(A). OpenID is mandatory to make the MFA requirements work
(B). An incorrect browser has been detected by the SAML application
(C). The access device has a trusted certificate installed that is overwriting the session token
(D). The user's IP address is changing between logins, bur the application is not invalidating the token
Answer: D

NO.857 A security analyst is using OSINT to gather information to verity whether company data is
available publicly. Which of the following is the BEST application for the analyst to use?
(A). theHarvester
B Cuckoo
(B). Nmap
(C). Nessus
Answer: A

TheHarvester is a reconnaissance tool that is used to gather information about a target organization,
such as email addresses, subdomains, and IP addresses. It can also be used to gather information
about a target individual, such as email addresses, phone numbers, and social media profiles.
TheHarvester is specifically designed for OSINT (Open-Source Intelligence) and it can be used to
discover publicly available information about a target organization or individual.
NO.858 A company discovered that terabytes of data have been exfiltrated over the past year after
an employee clicked on an email link. The threat continued to evolve and remain undetected until a
security analyst noticed an abnormal amount of external connections when the employee was not
working. Which of the following is the MOST likely threat actor?
(A). Shadow IT
(B). Script kiddies
(C). APT
(D). Insider threat
Answer: C

An APT attack is characterized by using toolkits to achieve a presence on a target network and then,
instead of just moving to steal information, focusing on the long game by maintaining a persistent
presence on the target network. The tactics, tools, and procedures of APTs are focused on
maintaining administrative access to the target network and avoiding detection. Then, over the long
haul, the attacker can remove intellectual property and more from the organization, typically
undetected.
NO.859 Two hospitals merged into a single organization. The privacy officer requested a review of
ait records to ensure encryption was used Guring record storage, in compliance with regulations.
During the review, the officer discovered that medical diagnosis codes and patient names were left
unsecured. Which of the following types of data does this combination BEST represent?
(A). Personal heath information
(B). Personally Kentifiable information
(C). Tokenized data
(D). Proprietary data
Answer: B

NO.860 fier segmenting the network, the network manager wants to control the traffic between the
segments. Which of the following should the manager use to control the network traffic?
Answer: D

NO.861 A company has determined that if its computer-based manufacturing is not functioning for
12 consecutive hours, it will lose more money that it costs to maintain the equipment. Which of the
following must be less than 12 hours to maintain a positive total cost of ownership?
(A). MTBF
(B). RPO
(C). RTO
(D). MTTR
Answer: C

NO.862 An organization's Chief Security Officer (CSO) wants to validate the business's involvement
in the incident response plan to ensure its validity and thoroughness. Which of the following will the
CSO MOST likely use?
(A). An external security assessment
(B). A bug bounty program
(C). A tabletop exercise
(D). A red-team engagement
Answer: C

NO.863 Which of the following is the FIRST environment in which proper, secure coding should be
practiced?
(A). Stage
(B). Development
(C). Production
(D). Test
Answer: B

The developer has to start writing secure code from beginning itself. Which will then be tested,
staged and finally production
NO.864 Which of the following would BEST provide detective and corrective controls for thermal
regulation?
(A). A smoke detector
(B). A fire alarm
(C). An HVAC system
(D). A fire suppression system
(E). Guards
Answer: C

What are the functions of an HVAC system?
An HVAC system is designed to control the environment in which it works. It achieves this by
controlling the temperature (THERMAL) of a room through heating and cooling. It also controls the
humidity level in that environment by controlling the movement and distribution of air inside the
room. So it provides detective and corrective controls for THERMAL regulation.
NO.865 A network analyst is investigating compromised corporate information. The analyst leads to
a theory that network traffic was intercepted before being transmitted to the internet. The following
output was captured on an internal host:
Based on the IoCS, which of the following was the MOST likely attack used to compromise the
network communication?
(A). Denial of service
(B). ARP poisoning
(C). Command injection
(D). MAC flooding
Answer: D

NO.866 A security engineer is hardening existing solutions to reduce application vulnerabilities.
Which of the following solutions should the engineer implement FIRST? (Select TWO)
(A). Auto-update
(B). HTTP headers
(C). Secure cookies
(D). Third-party updates
(E). Full disk encryption
(F). Sandboxing
(G). Hardware encryption
Answer: A,G

NO.867 A recent security audit reveaied that @ popular website with IP address 172.16 1 also has
an FTP service thal employees were using to store sensitive corporate dat a. The organization's
outbound firewall processes rules top-down. Which of the following would permit HTTP and HTTPS,
while denying all other services for this host?
(A).
(B).
(C).
(D).
Answer: A

NO.868 Which of the following identifies the point in time when an organization will recover data in
the event of an outage?
(A). ALE
(B). RPO
(C). MTBF
(D). ARO
Answer: B

NO.869 ecent changes toa company's BYOD policy require all personal mobile devices to use a twofactor authentication method that Is not something you know or have. Which of the following will
meet this requirement?
(A). Facial recognition
(B). Six-digit PIN
(C). PKI certificate
(D). Smart card
Answer: C

NO.870 A cybersecunty administrator needs to implement a Layer 7 security control on a network
and block potential attacks. Which of the following can block an attack at Layer 7? (Select TWO)
(A). HIDS
(B). NIPS
(C). HSM
(D). WAF
(E). HIPS
(F). NIDS
(G). Stateless firewall
Answer: B,D

NO.871 An administrator is experiencing issues when trying to upload a support file to a vendor A
pop-up message reveals that a payment card number was found in the file, and the file upload was
Mocked. Which of the following controls is most likely causing this issue and should be checked
FIRST?
(A). DLP
(B). Firewall rule
(C). Content filter
(D). MDM
(E). Application allow list
Answer: A

NO.872 The new Chief Executive Officer (CEO) of a large company has announced a partnership with
a vendor that will provide multiple collaboration applications t make remote work easier. The
company has a geographically dispersed staff located in numerous remote offices in different
countries. The company's IT administrators are concerned about network traffic and load if all users
simultaneously download the application. Which of the following would work BEST to allow each
geographic region to download the software without negatively impacting the corporate network?
(A). Update the host IDS rules.
(B). Enable application whitelisting.
(C). Modify the corporate firewall rules.
(D). Deploy all applications simultaneously.
Answer: B

NO.873 After multiple on premises security solutions were migrated to the cloud, the incident
response time increased. The analyst are spending a long time to trace information on different cloud
consoles and correlating data in different formats. Which of the following can be used to optimize
the incident response time?
(A). CASB
(B). VPC
(C). SWG
(D). CMS
Answer: A

NO.874 A security analyst is investigating a vulnerability in which a default file permission was set
incorrectly. The company uses non-credentialed scanning for vulnerability management.
Which of the following tools can the analyst use to verify the permissions?
(A). ssh
(B). chmod
(C). 1s
(D). setuid
(E). nessus
(F). ne
Answer: B

NO.875 Which of the following can work as an authentication method and as an alerting mechanism
for unauthorized access attempts?
(A). Smart card
(B). push notifications
(C). Attestation service
(D). HMAC-based, one-time password
Answer: B

NO.876 An information security officer at a credit card transaction company is conducting a
framework-mapping exercise with the internal controls. The company recently established a new
office in Europe. To which of the following frameworks should the security officer map the existing
controls? (Select TWO).
(A). Iso
(B). PCI DSS
(C). soc
(D). GDPR
(E). CSA
(F). NIST
Answer: B,D

NO.877 A company has decovered unauthorized devices are using its WiFi network, and it wants to
harden the access point to imporve security. Which f the following configuration shoujld an analysis
enable To improve security? (Select TWO.)
(A). RADIUS
(B). PEAP
(C). WPS
(D). WEP-EKIP
(E). SSL
(F). WPA2-PSK
Answer: D,F

NO.878 A security administrator checks the table of a network switch, which shows the following
output:
Which of the following is happening to this switch?
(A). MAC Flooding
(B). DNS poisoning
(C). MAC cloning
(D). ARP poisoning
Answer: A

NO.879 A security administrator has noticed unusual activity occurring between different global
instances and workloads and needs to identify the source of the unusual traffic. Which of the
following log sources would be BEST to show the source of the unusual traffic?
(A). HIDS
(B). UEBA
(C). CASB
(D). VPC
Answer: C

NO.880 A customer called a company's security team to report that all invoices the customer has
received over the last five days from the company appear to have fraudulent banking details. An
investigation into the matter reveals the following
* The manager of the accounts payable department is using the same password across multiple
external websites and the corporate account.
* One of the websites the manager used recently experienced a data breach
* The manager's corporate email account was successfully accessed in the last fve days by an IP
address located in a foreign country Which of the following attacks has MOST hkely been used to
compromise the manager's corporate account?
Answer: D

NO.881 A security analyst was deploying a new website and found a connection attempting to
authenticate on the site's portal. While Investigating The incident, the analyst identified the following
Input in the username field:
Which of the following BEST explains this type of attack?
(A). DLL injection to hijack administrator services
(B). SQLi on the field to bypass authentication
(C). Execution of a stored XSS on the website
(D). Code to execute a race condition on the server
Answer: C

NO.882 Which of the following roles would MOST likely have direct access to the senior
management team?
(A). Data custodian
(B). Data owner
(C). Data protection officer
(D). Data controller
Answer: D

NO.883 Accompany deployed a WiFi access point in a public area and wants to harden the
configuration to make it more secure. After performing an assessment, an analyst identifies that the
access point is configured to use WPA3, AES, WPS, and RADIUS. Which of the following should the
analyst disable to enhance the access point security?
(A). WPA3
(B). AES
(C). RADIUS
(D). WPS
Answer: D

NO.884 An organization has implemented a policy requiring the use of conductive metal lockboxes
for personal electronic devices outside of a secure research lab. Which of the following did the
organization determine to be the GREATEST risk to intellectual property when creating this policy?
(A). The theft of portable electronic devices
(B). Geotagging in the metadata of images
(C). Bluesnarfing of mobile devices
(D). Data exfiltration over a mobile hot-spot
Answer: D

NO.885 ir security team received a report of copyright infringement from the IP space of the
corporate network. The report provided a precise time stamp for the incident as well as the name of
the copyrighted file"sThe analyst has been tasked with determining the infringing source machine
and instructed to implement measures to prevent such incidents from occurring again. Which of the
following is MOST capable of accomplishing both tasks?
(A). HIDS
(B). Allow list
(C). TPM
(D). NGFW
Answer: C

NO.886 Which biometric error would allow an unauthorized user to access a system?
(A). False acceptance
(B). False entrance
(C). False rejection
(D). False denial
Answer: C

NO.887 A symmetric encryption algorithm Is BEST suited for:
(A). key-exchange scalability.
(B). protecting large amounts of data.
(C). providing hashing capabilities,
(D). implementing non-repudiation.
Answer: D

NO.888 While reviewing an alert that shows a malicious request on one web application, a
cybersecurity analyst is alerted to a subsequent token reuse moments later on a different service
using the same single sign-on method. Which of the following would BEST detect a malicious actor?
(A). Utilizing SIEM correlation engines
(B). Deploying Netflow at the network border
(C). Disabling session tokens for all sites
(D). Deploying a WAF for the web server
Answer: A

The initial compromise was a malicious request on a web server. Moments later the token created
with SSO was used on another service, the question does not specify what type of service. Deploying
a WAF on the web server will detect the attacker but only on that server. If the attacker issues the
same malicious request to get another SSO token correlating that event with using that SSO token in
other services would allows to detect the malicious activity.
NO.889 Which of the following should a technician consider when selecting an encryption method
for data that needs to remain confidential for a specific length of time?
(A). The key length of the encryption algorithm
(B). The encryption algorithm's longevity
(C). A method of introducing entropy into key calculations
(D). The computational overhead of calculating the encryption key
Answer: B

NO.890 Which of the following types of controls is a turnstile?
(A). Physical
(B). Detective
(C). Corrective
(D). Technical
Answer: A

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Turnstile#:~:text=A%20turnstile%20(also%20called%20a,%2C%20a%20
pass%2C%20or%20similar.
NO.891 Given the following logs:
Which of the following BEST describes the type of attack that is occurring?
(A). Rainbow table
(B). Dictionary
(C). Password spraying
(D). Pass-the-hash
Answer: C

NO.892 While checking logs, a security engineer notices a number of end users suddenly
downloading files with the .tar.gz extension. Closer examination of the files reveals they are PE32
files. The end users state they did not initiate any of the downloads. Further investigation reveals the
end users all clicked on an external email containing an infected MHT file with an href link a week
prior. Which of the following is MOST likely occurring?
(A). A RAT was installed and is transferring additional exploit tools.
(B). The workstations are beaconing to a command-and-control server.
(C). A logic bomb was executed and is responsible for the data transfers.
(D). A fireless virus is spreading in the local network environment
Answer: A

NO.893 Adynamic application vulnerability scan identified that code injection could be performed
using a web form. Which of the following will be the BEST remediation to prevent this vulnerability?
(A). Implement input validations.
(B). Deploy MFA.
(C). Utilize a WAF.
(D). Configure HIPS.
Answer: B

NO.894 An organization is repairing the damage after an incident, Which of the following controls es
being implemented?
(A). Detective
(B). Preventive
(C). Corrective
(D). Compensating
Answer: C

NO.895 Which of the following Is the BEST reason to maintain a functional and effective asset
management policy that aids in ensuring the security of an organization?
(A). To provide data to quantify risk based on the organization's systems
(B). To keep all software and hardware fully patched for known vulnerabilities
(C). To only allow approved, organization-owned devices onto the business network
(D). To standardize by selecting one laptop model for all users in the organization
Answer: A

An effective asset management policy helps an organization understand and manage the systems,
hardware, and software it uses, and how they are used, including their vulnerabilities and risks. This
information is crucial for accurately identifying and assessing risks to the organization, and making
informed decisions about how to mitigate those risks. This is the best reason to maintain an effective
asset management policy.
